World Cup winner's medal in the coffin of Pietro Lombardi, who had been the kitman of the Italian national team in the 2006 World Cup. 
On 9 April 2021, it was announced that De Rossi had become hospitalised in Rome due to COVID-19 symptoms; by 13 April, he had been discharged, and by 26 April, he had recovered. 
The 'Novopay debacle' as it was called received almost daily media attention, causing embarrassment for the new Minister of Education Hekia Parata, and contributed to the resignation of newly recruited Education secretary Leslie Longstone. 
The error rate for payments is now less than 0.2 per cent, less than half the 0.5 per cent acceptable error rate as defined by the Novopay technical review. 
Talent2 was started by two Australian entrepreneurs, Andrew Banks and Geoff Morgan. Banks and Morgan founded the Australian recruitment company Morgan and Banks in 1985. In 1994 the company was listed on the Australian stock exchange and sold four years later for $470 million. 
Banks and Morgan launched Talent2 in 2003 focusing on recruitment and payroll management. The company grew rapidly and soon had 1700 staff in 19 countries and a turnover of more than $300 million a year. It claimed to have 2400 clients in the Asia Pacific region with more than 740,000 employees whose pay was managed by the company. The chief executive of Talent2 is John Rawlinson, a former physical education teacher. He has been at the head of the company from its incorporation. 
During the period the Novopay contract was being negotiated with the Government, the company was having financial problems and was later delisted from the Australian stock exchange. 
Datacom lost the contract to Talent 2, the creators of Novopay, in a competitive tender in 2005. Talent2 won the contract ahead of ten other tenderers. The Novopay contract was initially signed off by the Labour Government in 2008. It was subsequently renegotiated by National twice. 
Because of delays in the development of the programme, it was not until August 2012 that Novopay was finally rolled out. When Steven Joyce was appointed to sort out problems with Novopay in 2013, he initiated discussions with Datacom in case the contract with Talent2 had to be scrapped. 
Talent2 was also selected to provide a new payroll system at New Zealand Post. The Australian company was awarded the NZ Post contract in 2010 to create a centralised payroll programme to replace the existing regional system. After it went live in 2011, thousands of NZ Post workers were also under-paid or over-paid. 
NZ Post took Talent2 to task over the mistakes but the software had to be re-written and it took nearly two years before the system began to improve. Steven Joyce, who was subsequently tasked with sorting out problems with Novopay, said in January 2013 he was aware of NZ Post's payroll problems but could not yet comment on "the similarities or otherwise" between the two. 
In the pay period 9 Jan 2013 through to 22 Jan 2013, $139 million was the total gross payroll, 176 were underpaid or not paid, giving an error rate of 0.29% according to the Ministry. This figure does not include teachers who were overpaid. 
Five months after its implementation (mid-December 2012), a survey showed only 16% of schools had no errors that pay round, compared to 36% a month before, suggesting Novopay's performance was getting worse, rather than better. On 15 November the Ministry of Education said it would be taking legal action against Talent2, seeking financial compensation for the errors, which would be used to pay teachers. 
The error rate for payments is now less than 0.2 per cent, less than half the 0.5 per cent acceptable error rate as defined by the Novopay technical review. 
In March, further concerns arose when it was reported that Novopay had called in debt collectors to get back overpayments made to teachers, even for as little as $22. A new glitch also appeared in the system, with 100 teachers having their contracts wrongly 'terminated' by Novopay at the end of the first school term. 
One of the main problems identified by Mr Joyce was that Talent2 had "no senior management bandwidth" in New Zealand. It seems the lack of senior executives meant the company was unable to make decisions about increasing its financial investment to bolster the service when it got into difficulty. Behind the scenes, Talent2's share price had dropped dramatically and in September 2012, the company was delisted from the Australian stock exchange. 
By the end of April 2013, the cost to the Government of fixing Novopay had risen to $11 million and was still climbing. In May the Ministry of Education revealed it had spent an extra $1.7 million paying 12 consultants to help sort out problems with Novopay. 
In July 2014, the Ministry of Education and Talent2 mutually agreed to a new service delivery model which saw the operation of the Novopay payroll service transition to a government owned company, Education Payroll Ltd. 
The transition occurred on 17 October 2014, and saw the government assume full responsibility for the provision of the education payroll service and also the responsibility for customisations of the software. 
The error rate for payments is now less than 0.2 per cent, less than half the 0.5 per cent acceptable error rate as defined by the Novopay technical review. 
Espino was originally signed by the Cincinnati Reds as an undrafted free agent infielder in 1999. He played for the Gulf Coast Reds from 2000 to 2002, earning Gulf Coast League All-Star honors in 2002 as a third baseman when he hit .332 in 58 games. 
Espino was traded by the Royals to the Cleveland Indians on June 12, 2008 for cash.  Espino was invited to Spring Training for the 2010 season but did not make the club and was assigned to the Triple-A Columbus Clippers. He remained with the Indians through 2010, playing for the AA Akron Aeros and Columbus. 
Espino signed a minor league contract with the Los Angeles Dodgers on January 26, 2011 and received an invitation to major league camp. He was assigned to the AAA Albuquerque Isotopes, where he appeared in 65 games and hit .292. On November 2, 2011, he elected free agency. 
On January 17, 2012, Espino signed a minor league contract with the Chicago White Sox. In 66 games with the AA Birmingham Barons, he hit .284. He also played in 3 games with AAA Charlotte in 2012. On November 2, 2012, he elected free agency. On December 18, 2012, Espino re-signed with the White Sox on a minor league contract and appeared in 1 game at Charlotte in 2013 before he was released. 
Espino signed a minor league contract with the Los Angeles Dodgers on June 23, 2013 and reported to AAA Albuquerque, where he appeared in 19 games and batted .333. On November 4, 2013, he elected free agency. 
On April 1, 2014, Espino signed with the Somerset Patriots of the Atlantic League of Professional Baseball. In 2014, Espino slashed .252/.274/.298 with 1 home run and 18 RBI in 70 games. 
On January 19, 2015, Espino retired from professional baseball and joined the St. Louis Cardinals organization as an international scout. He is currently a Panama-based scout and international crosschecker, and was involved in the signing of Cardinals catching prospect Ivan Herrera. 
Espino's cousin Paolo plays for the Washington Nationals. Espino played in the World Baseball Classic for Panama in both 2006 and 2009, with a total of three at-bats in the two series. Paolo was also on Panama's roster for the World Baseball Classic. 
Kelso & Company is an American private equity firm focusing on leveraged buyouts, recapitalizations and growth capital transactions.  Kelso invests in a variety of sectors, including communication, manufacturing and restaurants. Kelso is based in New York City. 
Founded in 1971 as Kelso Bangert & Company, the firm acted as both an advisor and merchant bank, both making investments and advising on mergers and acquisitions.  Kelso was founded by Louis O. Kelso, a lawyer and economist who is given credit for developing the concept for employee stock ownership plans, in 1956.  Kelso, alongside a sister company Louis O. Kelso Inc., focused initially on M&A activity involving Employee Stock Ownership Plans. 
Kelso raised its first private equity fund and has had a dedicated private equity investment platform since 1980.  Louis O. Kelso who died in 1991 transitioned management of the firm to Joseph Schuchert to focus on writing and lecturing. 
Kelso & Company has invested in energy, materials, retailing, industrial and consumer products, telecommunication services, financial services, and healthcare sectors.  The company typically invests in North America with a focus on the United States. It targets investing between $50 million and $600 million in firms that have a value of between $250 million and $2.5 billion. 
This eclipse is a member of a semester series. An eclipse in a semester series of solar eclipses repeats approximately every 177 days and 4 hours (a semester) at alternating nodes of the Moon's orbit. 
The metonic series repeats eclipses every 19 years (6939.69 days), lasting about 5 cycles. Eclipses occur in nearly the same calendar date. In addition, the octon subseries repeats 1/5 of that or every 3.8 years (1387.94 days). All eclipses in this table occur at the Moon's ascending node. 
Klattia is a genus of flowering plants in the family Iridaceae first described as a genus in 1877. The entire genus is endemic to Cape Province in South Africa. The genus name is a tribute to the German botanist Friedrich Wilhelm Klatt, who significantly advanced the body of knowledge of the family Iridaceae in the 19th century. 
"Dance Little Jean" is a song written by Jimmy Ibbotson, and recorded by American country music group Nitty Gritty Dirt Band.  It was released in October 1983 as the second single from the album Let's Go.  The song reached number 9 on the Billboard Hot Country Singles & Tracks chart. 
Jimmy Ibbotson wrote the song hoping the charm and romance of the story would convince his ex-wife that they should get back together. Little Jean was named for his real life daughter who would always dance when he played guitar. When he played it for his ex-wife for the first time, Little Jean danced, but his ex-wife's response was not what he had hoped for. She told him he would be able to afford child support now, because that song would be a hit. 
The song is about a musician disillusioned about marriage, whose heart is softened by a daughter dancing to his band at her parents' wedding reception whilst wearing crinolines and a calico skirt. 
Texas toast is a toasted bread that is typically made from sliced bread that has been sliced at double the usual thickness of packaged bread. Texas toast is prepared by spreading butter on both sides of the bread and broiling or grilling it until it is a light golden brown. Commonly, garlic is added to the butter, yielding a form of garlic bread. The toast may include cheese on one or both sides, similar to an open-faced grilled cheese sandwich.  
Popular in Texas and its bordering states, Texas toast is often served as a side with southern-style dishes such as chicken fried steak, fried catfish, or barbecue. 
Thick-sliced bread sold for making Texas toast can be used in the same manner as ordinary bread slices, such as in sandwiches, and it is especially useful for dishes involving liquids or where extra thickness could improve the product, such as French toast. While most varieties sold for Texas toast are white bread, whole wheat varieties also exist. 
Frozen Texas toast brands are also popular, with best sellers including the New York Brand of the T. Marzetti Company, Pepperidge Farm, and Coles. 
This article related to a Soviet film of the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Indiana"  is a single by Polish singer Sarsa. The song was released as the second single from her debut studio album Zapomnij mi on 14 August 2015, and was written by Sarsa with production by Sarsa along with Tomasz Konfederak. 
Till 8 March 2020, This train was running up to Chandigarh and thereafter the destination station changed to Daulatpur Chowk for direct connectivity to another tourist spots in Himachal Pradesh. 
Both trains are hauled by an Abu Road Loco Shed based WDM-2 diesel locomotive from Jaipur to Chandigarh and vice versa. 
A semantic class contains words that share a semantic feature.  For example within nouns there are two sub classes, concrete nouns and abstract nouns. The concrete nouns include people, plants, animals, materials and objects while the abstract nouns refer to concepts such as qualities, actions, and processes. According to the nature of the noun, they are categorized into different semantic classes. Semantic classes may intersect. The intersection of female and young can be girl. 
This biographical article relating to Syrian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Joan Sebastian is a Mexican singer-songwriter who has received awards and nominations for his contributions to the music industry. 
The ASCAP Awards are awarded annually by the American Society of Composers, Authors and Publishers in the United States. Sebastian has received 43 awards from 43 nominations. 
The Billboard Latin Music Awards are awarded annually by the Billboard magazine in the United States. Sebastian has received 4 awards from 17 nominations. 
The Grammy Awards are awarded annually by the National Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences in the United States. Sebastian has received four awards from six nominations.  
The Latin Grammy Awards are awarded annually by the Latin Academy of Recording Arts & Sciences in the United States. Sebastian has received 
The Lo Nuestro Awards are awarded annually by television network Univision in the United States. Sebastian has received thirteen awards from twenty-nine nominations. 
Minocqua is a town in northwestern Oneida County, Wisconsin, United States. The population was 4,388 as of 2017. The census-designated place of Minocqua and the unincorporated community of Rantz are both located in the town. Minocqua is commonly referred to as "The Island City." 
Minocqua was officially organized in the year 1889. Although there are varying explanations regarding the meaning of the word "Minocqua", most credit its origin to the Island's first inhabitants, the Ojibwe. The town Minocqua is named after, "Ninocqua", the Ojibwe name that is defined as "noon-day-rest". 
In the late 1800s, Minocqua was a logging town. Minocqua Clawson was the first white child born in the town. Clawson Hill was a famous landmark in town, and it is now the current location of the Pointe Resort & Hotel at the south end of the Highway 51 bridge. 
The construction of railroads was a critical component of Minocqua's early growth. The Milwaukee Road originally came to the area to provide access to timber. Later, railroads catered to sportsmen and tourists, transforming Minocqua into the vacation getaway it remains to this day. The two railroad trestles that brought trains to the Island are still intact and serve as the trailhead for the Bearskin State Trail that provides hiking and biking in summer, and snowmobiling in winter. 
Landmarks on the Island include Torpy Park, the Belle-Isle building, the Minocqua Community Center, Bosacki's Boathouse (now The Boathouse), T Murtaugh's Pub, and the Thirsty Whale. Town offices and the Minocqua Public Library are located in the Minocqua Community Center. Bosacki's Boat House burned to the ground in 1972. Although state regulations prohibited the structure being rebuilt over water, a public outcry convinced the DNR to allow it to be rebuilt where it had originally stood.  
Termed the "Island City," a portion of the town is situated on what was an actual island, which is accessible by bridge on Highway 51 and "the fill" to the north. Much of Minocqua has sandy soil, although areas of the far northwest and the northeast are clay. The majority of the soil is highly acidic and many areas are covered by forests. 
The community of Bo-di-Lac (short for "Booth-Diamond-Lac du Flambeau) is located in the western portion of the town bordered by Squirrel Lake, Diamond Lake, Booth Lake, and the town of Lac du Flambeau. 
As of the census of 2010, there are 4,385 people living in the town occupying 2,079 households. There are a total of 4,835 housing units in town of which 2,493 are seasonal in nature. 
The racial makeup of the town is 96.1% White, 0.2% African American, 1.7% Native American, 0.8% Asian, 0.1% from other races, and 1.2% from two or more races. 0.8% of the population are Hispanic or Latino of any race. 
26.4% of the town's population is age 65 or older while 16.3% is below the age of 18. The median age is 51.6 years. 
The Lakeland Airport (KARV) is located 3 miles northwest of the central business district of Minocqua. 
The Rhinelander-Oneida County Airport (KRHI) located 25 miles to the southeast serves Minocqua, Oneida county and surrounding communities with both scheduled commercial jet service and general aviation services. 
The town board, consisting of a town chairman and four supervisors, is responsible for governing the citizens of Minocqua. There have been 30 town chairmen in the history of Minocqua. The list of early town chairmen include A.O. Dorwin, Lincoln Abraham, Jacob Huber, Thomas Bolger, William Schlecht, and Dr. Torpy. 
Minocqua is entirely located in Wisconsin's 34th Assembly, 12th Senate, and 7th Congressional District, and is represented by State Representative Rob Swearingen and Congressman Tom Tiffany. The 12th Senate district is current open following the election of Senator Tom Tiffany to the US Congress on May 12, 2020.  
Minocqua has a public elementary school, Minocqua-Hazelhurst-Lake Tomahawk Elementary School, a private Lutheran elementary/middle school, Trinity Lutheran School, and a high school, Lakeland Union High School. 
Tourism plays a substantial role in the economy of Minocqua. As a forested lake community, there are many outdoor summer activities, such as fishing, camping, waterskiing, boating, hiking, bike riding, berry collecting, and swimming. 
A business strip runs through the downtown ("The Island"), with tourist attractions and shopping. Minocqua's nightlife includes bars hosting live music in the summer. A Fourth of July parade is presented annually. Events include dancing, live music, fireworks, and a Min-Aqua Bat waterski and boat show. 
During the fall, rifle and bow hunting draw many visitors, as does the annual downtown merchants' Beef-a-Rama held the last Saturday in September. Winter activities include snowmobile festivals, Nordic (cross country) skiing, ice fishing, downhill skiing in nearby hills, snow tubing, sleigh rides, and snowmobiling. Minocqua is home to Minocqua Winter Park, a cross-country skiing venue, as well as a sledding hill and ice-skating pond. 
Minocqua is home to one of the world's oldest amateur water ski teams, the Min-Aqua Bats. The Min-Aqua bats have been performing at the Aqua Bowl for 70 summers now, as a nonprofit organization and will open up the 71st season in June 2020.  
Arts activities include the Campanile Center for the Arts which operates year-round, offering an array of high quality artists to captivate, intrigue and inspire audiences. The Campanile also provides music, theater, and visual art instruction. 
The U.S. flag that was lowered by the last U.S. soldiers to depart from the Vietnam War is on exhibit at the American Legion Post in Minocqua. 
Joanna Rogers Macy (born May 2, 1929) is an environmental activist, author, and scholar of Buddhism, general systems theory, and deep ecology. She is the author of twelve books. 
She was married to the late Francis Underhill Macy, the activist and Russian scholar who founded the Center for Safe Energy. 
Macy first encountered Buddhism in 1965 while working with Tibetan refugees in northern India, particularly the Ven. 8th Khamtrul Rinpoche, Sister Karma Khechog Palmo, Ven. Dugu Choegyal Rinpoche, and Tokden Antrim of the Tashi Jong community.  Her spiritual practice is drawn from the Theravada tradition of Nyanaponika Thera and Rev. Sivali of Sri Lanka, Munindraji of West Bengal, and Dhiravamsa of Thailand. 
Parents with disabilities are people with certain disorders (mental, physical, or other types) who are raising young children or being care for by their young children. 
Disability brings various problems to the parents themselves, their children and the whole family. Researchers have studying the effects and issues raised by disabled parents. Aiming at helping parents with disabilities, organizations and governments have delivered relevant strategies to provide support. 
Physical disability is the relatively more commonly occurring one. The data states that among the children living with a disabled parent, 91% of them have a physically disabled parent while 11% have a parent with mental or behavioral disabilities. 
Deaf parents face communication barrier which lead to the limitation in participating in social network. Visually impaired parents face difficulties in insuring the safe environment surrounding both their children and themselves, as well as the restriction in capable activities for them to take part in with their children. 
Visually impaired parents face difficulties in insuring the safe environment surrounding both their children and themselves, as well as the restriction in capable activities for them to take part in with their children. 
Parents with learning difficulties need help to process information and manage objectives. The way in which they gain and understand information is different from normal parents, which puts them under social criticism and stigma. 
Comparing to children in young age, more children in high school age are taking the responsibility of caring for their disabled parents, which reflects that whether higher-aged children are more possible to have disabled parents or children of higher age are more often asked to provide their parents with assistance thanks to their higher-levelled capacity. 
School teachers play crucial role in identifying young carers in early age and offering help. The young carers identified by teachers are in averagely younger age than those identified by doctors, which makes it important for primary teaching institutions especially to identify young carers. 
Participants from a Young Carers workshop held in Wellington, New Zealand in 2005 indicated that New Zealand children and young people become young carers mainly because of cultural expectations, nature of disability, awareness and acceptance of services, and other reasons relating to the family unit like no one else is taking the responsibility. 
The lack of relative research in this area leads to the prejudice that disabled parents bring negative effect, which is inaccurate. As high-quality studies state, the sources of problems happening in parenting with disability is the same as that in non-disabled parenting, which include parents' former experience of being abused physically, sexual, or on substance, poverty, lack of appropriate support and so on. The disability in parenting alone, is not the cause of negative impact to children. 
Little difference is found between the household tasks done by children with or without disabled parents. And life details of children with disabled parents like the number of friend and activities they do with parents are almost same with those of children with non-disabled parents. 
Researchers at Israel's Bar Ilan University has delivered a study and the result shows that children who have parents with sensory impairment are more empathic and shows higher awareness of emotions of others than other children from normal families. Other advantages of children with disabled parents like greater maturity, higher sensitivity and more abundant life experience were also reported by earlier research. 
The facilities and environment of school should be accessible to all including disabled and normal parents, students and staffs. Inaccessible school facilities lead to lack of participation in children's school life for physically disabled parents. For parents with sensory impairment, appropriate way of communication with school is essential. 
Parents of physical disability mention difficulties in taking care of children without proper equipment and with restriction in mobility. Deaf parents need equipment to be alerted when children are in need of help. 
Parents with disabilities face barrier when attempt to get access to health care, especially women. Professionals in health care hold negative attitudes towards disabled parents, and underestimate life quality of disabled people. Depression is another significant issue faced by disabled parents. Women with disability have six times more chance than normal women to have depression. Appropriate service and support is necessary for disabled mothers under the effect of depression. 
Large number of disabled parents reported the need of assistant in daily living activities like cooking, toileting and cleaning. Assistance in parenting tasks including taking recreational activities with children, carrying and holding children and so on are also reported as needed by parents with disabilities. 
The Faculty of Conflict and Catastrophe Medicine operates under the Society of Apothecaries though it is considered a separate organisation with its own registered charity status. It was established in 2005, shortly after the London bombings where on review it was felt that medical organisations would benefit from training in dealing with extreme situations i.e. Conflict and Catastrophe Medicine. 
The main focus of the Faculty is the provision of education through its year-long postgraduate diploma Conflict and Catastrophe course. 
The Faculty of Conflict and Catastrophe hold two lectures each year which are open to the public; the Audrey Few Lecture and their Spring Lecture. 
Through both telephone and SMS voting, viewers vote for the duo they think should remain in tche competition. Judges scores which are half weight of the total scores, are also taken into account and are combined with the viewer votes when determining which duos stay and go each week. 
Atar, Pehlivan and prince of Sistan thought he had set out on a journey to discover his heritage and family, but he will soon find out that his past and future are closely tied to the battle that has long since started among the forces of good and evil, divinity and flesh. He will have to unite old enemies in order to save his people from a deep fall into chaos, and he will find very soon that sometimes evil can only be defeated by evil. 
RaiSat was a subsidiary of RAI created in 1997 to produce thematic TV channels for satellite television that are now available in IPTV and digital terrestrial television with various providers. 
Rai Sat was created as external company in 1997 to create the first satellite channels of public service. 
In July 1999, with the transfer from Rai's staff that was employed towards thematic channels, the company began to produce the first pay satellite platform networks for Tele+, then reorganized under Sky. 
In 2009, following the non-renewal of the contract with Sky (Platform for which RaiSat produced exclusively its channels) it was announced that the parent company was preparing to fold RaiSat. 
In 2003, when Sky launched, Rai Sat reorganized its channels. Raisat Art, Raisat Fiction, Raisat Album and Raisat Show were sacrificed. 
On 1 November 2006, RaiSat Cinema World reverted to the old name RaiSat Cinema, and RaiSat Ragazzi and was divided into: 
On 18 May 2010, Rai absorbed the company, and reorganized all channels by changing their name (with the removal of the word Sat) and directly overseeing the program schedules, as a result: 
Meteoro Brasil's videos include pop culture, science and philosophy. This YouTube channel also discusses societal attitudes to misinformation. 
On April 9, 2017, Meteoro Brasil was created on YouTube to provide viewers with culture and entertainment about science, philosophy and pop culture. 
After the 2018 Brazilian presidential election this channel was identified with a new wave of Brazilian liberal or left-wing channels and YouTubers, such as Sabrina Fernandes, Felipe Neto, Lilia Schwarcz, Henry Bugalho, Caue Moura, Pirula, Jones Manoel. 
The main organic fertilizers are, peat, animal wastes, plant wastes from agriculture, and treated sewage sludge. 
Processed organic fertilizers include compost, humic acid, grain meal, amino acids, and seaweed extracts. Other examples are natural enzyme-digested proteins. Decomposing crop residue (green manure) from prior years is another source of fertility. 
Compost provides little in the means of nutrients to plants, but it does provide soil stability through increasing organic matter.Compost does help microorganisms proliferate which in turn breaks down decaying plant material into substantial bioavailable nutrients for plant to easily assimilate.  
With concerns about human borne pathogens coupled with a growing preference for flush toilets and centralized sewage treatment, biosolids have been replacing night soil (from human excreta), a traditional organic fertilizer that is minimally processed. 
The Warren Correctional Institution is a prison operated by the Ohio Department of Rehabilitation and Correction in Warren County's Turtlecreek Township in Lebanon, Ohio. 
Laura Whitcomb (born December 19, 1958) is an American novelist and teacher. She is best known for her book A Certain Slant of Light, which has been optioned for a film by Summit Entertainment. Whitcomb has won three Kay Snow awards and was runner-up in the Bulwer-Lytton Writing Contest.[when?] 
This Turning Point is not to be confused with an ABC dramatic anthology series of the same title which ran during the 1952-53 television season. 
This article about a non-fiction television series is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a television show originating in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about an organisation based in Norway is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Spring Fling Open Studios (also known as Spring Fling) is an open studio event based in Dumfries and Galloway, Scotland. 
Every Spring since 2003, 70 - 100 selected artists, makers and designers across the region open their studios for visitors to visit, speak with the artists and purchase contemporary artwork and design. It is the most successful event of its kind in Scotland. 
Spring Fling develops new and creative projects for each year's main event as well as manages a year-round programme of workshops, talks and networking events. 
Since 2003, Spring Fling has grown from a small local event initialled by the Dumfries and Galloway council's arts team to a well-recognised, artist-run premier contemporary art and craft event in Scotland. 
Spring Fling started its residency programme with the WASPS artist studios in Kirkcudbright in 2009 and has been running a residency programme with the Wigtown Book Festival since 2010. 
Each year, an artist is selected to be the residency artist at Wigtown Book Festival in Autumn and at Spring Fling in Spring the following year. Artist Astrid Jaekel was the artist-in-residence at the Wigtown Book Festival in September/October 2013 and will be a participating artist at Spring Fling 2014 in May. 
An alleged attempt to assassinate Cox in 1869 in reprisal for the killing marked the first time that Frank James and Jesse James were publicly identified as outlaws. 
In 1861 Cox joined the Missouri Militia with the rank of major.  During this time he was elected in absentia circuit clerk of Daviess County in 1862.  He resigned in 1863, citing ill health, and returned to Gallatin. In 1864 he returned to the Missouri Militia, this time as a lieutenant colonel of the Thirty-third Regiment of Missouri State Militia. 
The attacking Confederate force only had included Anderson and five or six men (although some reports say 20) and the Confederate losses in the battle including the attacking line as well as those in the rear was just 7.  Four Union soldiers were shot but no injuries were fatal. 
After the Civil War Cox returned to Gallatin, where he formed the mercantile firm of Ballinger, Cox & Kemper.  Ballinger was another military officer and J.M. Kemper, a businessman who was the father of William Thornton Kemper, Sr. who went on to found two of the largest banks headquartered in Missouri (Commerce Bancshares and UMB Financial Corporation).  Cox's business relationship with Kemper only lasted one year, dissolving in 1866. 
When Cox had first joined the Missouri Militia, his commanding officer was James H.B. McFerran who would found the Daviess County Savings Association. 
On December 7, 1869, two men (reported to be Frank and Jesse James) robbed the Daviess County Savings Association Bank and in the process shot the cashier John W. Sheets in the head and heart.  Although there was $700 in the bank the robbers left with only $5 in fractional currency.  The men were encountered near Kidder, Missouri where one of the men (believed to be Jesse) said that he was the brother of Bill Anderson and that he had avenged Anderson's murder by Cox. 
The Gallatin Bank Robbery marked the first time that Frank and Jesse were formally identified as bank robbers.  A reward of $3,000 was raised for their capture.  Jesse sent a letter to the Kansas City Times saying that he was innocent and could prove he was not in the area.  He said he would surrender but was concerned that he would be lynched before he could prove his innocence. 
After Jesse James was killed in 1882, Frank James surrendered to the authorities.  Frank was not tried for the bank murder however he was tried in 1883 in Gallatin for an 1881 murder of a Rock Island Railroad employee at nearby Winston, Missouri. A jury acquitted him. 
Cox was reported to have been in California in 1869 visiting his parents and did not return until 1870 when he continued to operate other business including a hotel, livery and a different mercantile until formally retiring in 1871.  He is buried in Brown Cemetery in Gallatin. 
The practice has been revived more recently among other groups, including Anglicans, as well as the American house church movement. The modern lovefeast has often been used in ecumenical settings, such as between Methodists and Anglicans. 
Augustine of Hippo also objected to the continuance in his native North Africa of the custom of such meals, in which some indulged to the point of drunkenness, and he distinguished them from proper celebration of the Eucharist: "Let us take the body of Christ in communion with those with whom we are forbidden to eat even the bread which sustains our bodies." He reports that even before the time of his stay in Milan, the custom had already been forbidden there. 
The ancient Saint Thomas Christians of India continued to celebrate their agapa feasts, using their typical dish called appam. 
In the medieval Georgian Orthodox Church, the term agapi referred to a commemorative meal or distribution of victuals, offered to clergymen, the poor, or passers-by, accompanying the funeral service on the anniversary of the deceased. The permanent celebration of these meals was assured by legacies and foundations. 
The Schwarzenau Brethren groups (the largest being the Church of the Brethren) regularly practice agape feasts (called "Love Feast"), which include feetwashing, a supper, and communion, with hymns and brief scriptural meditations interspersed throughout the worship service. 
A Moravian congregation may hold a lovefeast on any special occasion, such as the date their church was founded, but there are certain established dates that Lovefeasts are regularly observed. Some of these notable dates include Watch Night, Good Friday, the Festival of 13 August (the 1727 date on which the Moravian Church was renewed or reborn), and Christmas Eve, where each member of the congregation receives a lighted candle at the end of the service in addition to the bun and coffee. 
In certain Methodist connexions, such as the Missionary Methodist Church and the New Congregational Methodist Church, footwashing is practiced too. 
In the Wesleyan Methodist Church, lovefeasts consisted of bread and water that filled the loving-cup. These lovefeasts were said to "promote piety, mutual affection and zeal". Unlike the Eucharist in the Methodist tradition, lovefeasts are traditionally fenced, being only for members of Methodist churches, though non-members are permitted to attend once. Several Methodist hymns were written for this Christian ritual, including Charles Wesley's "The Love-Feast", penned in 1740: 
Come and let us sweetly join  Christ to praise in hymns divine; Give we all, with one accord. Glory to our common Lord. Hands and hearts and voices raise; Sing as in the ancient days; Antedate the joys above, Celebrate the feast of love. 
The Christian liturgical books of the African Methodist Episcopal Church, African Methodist Episcopal Zion Church, Christian Methodist Episcopal Church, and United Methodist Church all have services for the Lovefeast. 
Congregations of the Primitive Methodist Church hold Lovefeasts in the form of large potluck-style meals among members of their congregations. 
The agape is a common feature used by the Catholic Neocatechumenal Way in which members of the Way participate in a light feast after the celebration of the Eucharist on certain occasions. 
The Creation Seventh Day Adventists partake of an agape feast as a part of their New Moon observances, taking the form of a formal, all-natural meal held after the communion supper. 
Neighboring districts are (from the east clockwise): Pak Khat and So Phisai of Bueng Kan Province; Fao Rai and Phon Phisai of Nong Khai Province; and Bolikhamxai Province of Laos. 
On 15 May 2007, all 81 minor districts were upgraded to full districts. On 24 August the upgrade became official. 
The district is divided into five sub-districts (tambons), which are further subdivided into 61 villages (mubans). There are no municipal (thesaban) areas. There are five tambon administrative organizations (TAO). 
Q Center is an LGBT community center and non-profit organization located in Portland, Oregon, in the United States.  
According to its website, the center "provides a safe space to support and celebrate LGBTQ diversity, visibility and community building".  Q Center is a registered 501(c)(3) organization which offers programs and services related to arts and culture, education and training, health and wellness, and advocacy. 
The community center was established in 2005, championed by then-city Commissioner Sam Adams. Kendall Clawson, an African American lesbian, served as its first executive director. The center relocated to North Mississippi Avenue in 2009. 
The Flag of Balochistan is the flag of the Province of Balochistan within Pakistan. The Balochistan provincial flag shows stylised mountains of this barren province and the principal mode of transport - the camel, also the "provincial animal". Displaying Pakistani national colours, white and dark Green, with a Crescent and star to represent the Muslim-majority all of which shows its Islamic heritage and strong ties with the Federation of Pakistan respectively. 
Yoon has been awarded various honors, including the US Legion of Merit and the Korean Order of National Security Merit. 
Frederik 'Freddy' Tylicki (born c.1986) is a German-born former flat racing jockey in Great Britain. He was British flat racing Champion Apprentice in 2009, when he also won the Lester Award for Apprentice Jockey of the Year. His Polish-born father Andrzej Tylicki was three times champion jockey in Germany. 
Less than a year after becoming champion apprentice, his career was put on hold after a serious shoulder injury. He finished the year with just 26 winners. 
On 31 October 2016 he was involved in a serious four horse accident at Kempton Park which ended with him in intensive care at St George's Hospital in Tooting. He was later diagnosed with T7 paralysis meaning he is paralysed from the waist down. 
Julie met with a local police officer whose name was Nick Parrish. Subsequent upon that, in that same year, Sophie met David when she and Sally were trying to rescue a cockatoo. 
There came a misunderstanding between in 1993 between Angel and Shane as she (Angel) ran up on Shane and accused him of wanting just one thing. 
While it was proceeding, another bitter moment happened in 1996 when Shannon met Geoff at the surf club and Curtis to accuse her of peevish on him. 
Sally met Scott Irwin later during 1997 in the Surf Club requesting she play a game of pool with him. 
In 2000, Harley met Noah in the club when she was about to be attacked by some boys, warning her off the boys who gave her the wrong kind of attention. It was during this period, he saved her before the gang of boys run up on her outside. 
Another meeting that took place in 2000 was Leah meeting Vinnie when she ran away from her wedding, then picked her up by the roadside and took her to a bay. 
It was in 2003, Dani and Scott met when he showed up in the beach riding a white horse. Subsequent upon that, Tasha met Robbie when he showed up at the bay, but she ignored him when he tried to introduce himself to her. 
Leah met Dan Baker when he visited the hospital to check up on his brother, Peter who was attacked by Sarah Lewis. 
While Gypsy and Vinnie were both in the same beach at the same time, he came up to introduce himself to her. 
Cassie met Ric on the beach while he was sunbathing and they went skinny dipping, she tricked him and stole his clothes. 
When Shannon and Lachlan went on a date, while on a date, his car broke down, then it began to rain.  On their second date that was on a boat, Lachan couldn't find the breaks. 
Gypsy accidentally spilt wine on Jesse, while she was getting him some clean clothes, her parents returned to meet him half naked, so they assumed the worst. 
Kirsty and Kane took a boat out but when they spotted Alf, Kirsty jumped into the water.  On a second date Sally and Flynn found them hiding in the back of a van. 
Dan asked Leah out, she assumed to wear something formal but he turned up wearing the opposite.  It rained while they were in their picnic. 
Hayley and Kim's date got to a bad start when the bottle of wine was smashed, so they got bitten by ants, the rain fell and their car broke down on their way home. 
When Zoe and Kim went on a date, Zoe heard noises in the bushes, when Kim went to check out, Zoe got stabbed on the arm. 
Before being separated, Hispania Balearica was the fourth district of the Tarraconensis with a native local government headed by a council. It served to provide for local needs and as a link directly to Rome. During the reign of Augustus the Balearicans requested help in stopping a plague of rabbits for which the Emperor dispatched troops. 
The notes used in this scale are shadjam, chathusruthi rishabham, antara gandharam, panchamam and chathusruthi dhaivatham in ascending scale, with kakali nishadham and prati madhyamam included in descending scale. For the details of the notations and terms, see swaras in Carnatic music. 
This cycling race article related to Spanish cycling is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The society was founded by Central and East European Historian Jack Hanley in 2005 to fill the knowledge gap of its member nations and the university community.  SACEEC is a plural society committed to the growth, advocacy, and dissemination of C&E European affairs and to improving society by educational and cultural means. 
SACEEC's missions are to advance and promote the historical, cultural, and collective experiences of Central and Eastern European nations; to recognize their re-emergence and relevance on the contemporary geo-political landscape; and to celebrate their diversity and enriching contributions to the cultures, philosophies, and histories upon the narrative of civilization. 
The Selangor pygmy flying squirrel (Petaurillus kinlochii) is a species of rodent in the family Sciuridae. It is endemic to Malaysia where it has only been found in the State of Selangor. 
Gevor was born on March 16, 1980, in Etchmiadzin, Armenia. He moved to Hamburg, Germany when he was 16 and currently fights out of there. He is known for his good technique and speed. 
Gevor started boxing at the age of 12. He had a very successful amateur career with 72 wins in 75 fights and won six national Armenian titles. He turned pro in 2000 and signed a contract with Universum Box Promotion. He is currently managed by Klaus-Peter Kohl. 
Gevor won his first professional titles when, on December 3, 2005, he stopped Mexican Gustavo Magallanes in the eighth round and won the vacant IBF and WBO Inter-Continental middleweight titles. He defended both titles against Sergey Khomitsky before vacating them soon after. 
Gevor fought against compatriot Arthur Abraham for the IBF Middleweight title on August 18, 2007. Gevor was defeated by an 11th-round knockout from a powerful left hook. 
On November 28, 2008, Gevor beat Finn Amin Asikainen in his hometown of Helsinki by 7th-round knockout and won the European championship belt. 
Gevor lost a controversial bout to WBA Middleweight Champion Felix Sturm by unanimous decision on July 11, 2009. 
Gevor fought Baker Barakat in a six-round bout on December 10, 2011. The whole fight was fairly even. As soon as Barakat was announced the winner by decision, Gevor turned to the referee and punched him in the face. Barakat and people from both corners tried to hold Gevor back. Later in the dressing rooms, the fighting continued and police had to be called in to break it up. 
Gevor has with Nenel Gevorgyan two sons and a daughter. Both his sons are also boxers, fighting for a club in Hamburg, and have become Northern Germany champions. In his free time, Khoren enjoys radio-controlled cars and motor racing. 
Emily Nicholl (born 24 May 1994) is a Scottish netball player. She was selected to represent the Scotland netball team at the 2019 Netball World Cup. 
This biographical article related to Scottish netball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 2011, Pasha was hired to rewrite a movie screenplay entitled "The Immaculate" for Sidney Kimmel Entertainment and producer Charles Segars. The film follows an agnostic government agent assigned to protect a 17-year-old boy who some people believe is the Messiah. 
Pasha wrote his first video game for the hip hop artist 50 Cent in 2008. The game, 50 Cent: Blood on the Sand, is the sequel to the bestselling 50 Cent: Bulletproof and is distributed by Vivendi Games. 
Pasha was born on 3 April 1972 in Karachi, Pakistan, and migrated to the United States at the age of three. He was raised in Brooklyn in the predominantly Hasidic Jewish neighborhood of Borough Park. He attended Stuyvesant High School in New York, graduating in 1989. He went on to Dartmouth College, where he majored in comparative religion and was an editor of the college newspaper, The Dartmouth. 
After graduating, Pasha worked as a journalist for the Wall Street publisher Institutional Investor and the Knight Ridder financial newswire. During his tenure as a reporter, he interviewed international leaders such as the Israeli prime minister Shimon Peres, the Pakistani prime minister Benazir Bhutto, and the Peruvian president, Alberto Fujimori. 
He left journalism in 1996 and attended Cornell Law School. He subsequently enrolled in the MBA program at the Tuck School of Business at Dartmouth, and graduated with a joint law/business degree in 2000. 
Pasha briefly worked as an attorney at the New York law firm of Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison before moving to Los Angeles to pursue a career in film making. He attended the MFA Producers Program at the UCLA School of Theater, Film and Television and graduated in 2003. 
His first television writing job was as a staff writer on UPN's remake of the classic series The Twilight Zone. 
In 2003, Pasha set up his first feature film project, a historical epic on the love story of the Taj Mahal, at Warner Brothers Pictures. He subsequently wrote a screen adaptation of the Japanese anime Kite in collaboration with the director Rob Cohen and the producer Anant Singh. He has also written screen adaptations of the Japanese horror film Ghost Actress by the director Hideo Nakata and adapted Deepak Chopra's novel Soulmate. 
Pasha spent two years as a writer and co-producer for Sleeper Cell. In 2007, he signed on as a producer of NBC's Bionic Woman. 
Pasha wrote and directed the short film Miriam, which won the Gaia Award at the Moondance International Film Festival in August 2008. The award is given to those who "elucidate and improve the spiritual quality of all life on the planet, and contribute[...] to the betterment of the world spirit". 
In 2008, Pasha accompanied his mother on the hajj, the traditional Islamic pilgrimage to Mecca. Pasha blogs regularly for the Huffington Post. 
Pasha sold his first two novels to Simon & Schuster in 2007. The books are entitled Mother of the Believers, a historical epic that follows the birth of Islam from the eyes of the Islamic prophet Muhammad's wife Aisha, and Shadow of the Swords, a love story set amidst the showdown of Richard the Lionheart and Saladin during the Third Crusade. 
There are Neolithic archaeological sites near the mouth of the river where ancient ceramic remains belonging to the Ust-Karenga Culture have been found. 
Andreia Machado (born 1 April 1995) is a Luxembourger footballer who plays as a forward for Dames Ligue 1 club Racing FC and the Luxembourg women's national team. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Luxembourg is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ed Greenwood (born July 21, 1959) is a Canadian fantasy writer and the original creator of the Forgotten Realms game world. He began writing articles about the Forgotten Realms for Dragon magazine beginning in 1979, and subsequently sold the rights to the setting to TSR, the creators of the Dungeons & Dragons roleplaying game, in 1986. He has written many Forgotten Realms novels, as well as numerous articles and D&D game supplement books. 
Ed Greenwood grew up in the upscale Toronto suburb of Don Mills. He began writing stories about the Forgotten Realms as a child, starting in the mid 1960s; they were his "dream space for swords and sorcery stories". Greenwood conceived of the Forgotten Realms as one world in a "multiverse" of parallel worlds which includes the Earth. He imagined such worlds as being the source of humanity's myths and legends. 
Greenwood agreed to work on the project, and began to prepare his Forgotten Realms material for official publication. He sent TSR a few dozen cardboard boxes stuffed with pencil notes and maps, and sold all rights to the Realms for a token fee. The following year, Greenwood used this material as a basis for writing the Forgotten Realms Campaign Set along with coauthor Jeff Grubb.[citation needed] 
The campaign setting was a major success, and Greenwood continued to be involved with all subsequent incarnations of the Forgotten Realms in D&D. He retained the rights to his fictional universe and went on to write numerous Forgotten Realms novels. Many of these center around the wizard Elminster, whom Greenwood has frequently portrayed at conventions and gaming events.[citation needed] 
In addition to all these activities, Greenwood works as a library clerk (and sometimes as a librarian) and has edited over a dozen small press magazines. When not appearing at conventions, he lives in an old farmhouse in the countryside of Ontario. 
As of 1998, Greenwood lived in applegrowing country on Lake Ontario, still working full-time at the North York Community Library, as he had since 1974, and continued to run his original Waterdeep campaign with the same core group he started with, albeit meeting only sporadically. He has stated that it is important for people who do freelance writing for roleplaying games to be active as both players and as dungeon masters. 
Greenwood won "best player" at the 1984 Gen Con AD&D Open tournament and several Gamer's Choice Awards and Origins Awards for his game design. He was inducted into the Gamer's Choice Hall of Fame in 1992 and the Academy of Adventure Gaming's Hall of Fame in 2003. Order of Cramahe 2017. He received the Port Hope Civic Awards Arts & Culture Award 2019. 
Ed Greenwood has appeared in the following podcasts, newspaper and magazine articles, websites, and podcasts. 
In Iziaslav's absence, Prince Sviatoslav managed to defeat a much larger Cuman army on November 1, 1068 and stem the tide of Cuman raids. A small skirmish in 1071 was the only disturbance by the Cumans for the next two decades. Thus, while the Battle of Alta River was a disgrace for Kievan Rus', Sviatoslav's victory the following year relieved the Cumans' threat to Kiev and Chernigov for a considerable period. 
BenchPrep is an American company that provides cloud-based study guides for standardized tests, professional certifications, and K-12 classroom learning. It has partnered with educational publishers such as McGraw Hill, John Wiley & Sons, and the Princeton Review to create interactive, digitized courses. 
BenchPrep, formerly known as Watermelon Express, was founded in 2009 by Ashish Rangnekar and Ujjwal Gupta, after Ashish Rangnekar won the New Venture Challenge at the University of Chicago. Shortly thereafter, BenchPrep received $2.2 million in seed funding from Lightbank, the executives behind Groupon. In July 2012, the company announced a $6 million round of funding from New Enterprise Associates and Revolution LLC. 
"Chuck Versus the Other Guy" is the thirteenth episode of Chuck's third season, and originally aired on April 5, 2010. Sarah and Shaw are ordered to track down the Director by Beckman, but Chuck has misgivings over whether Shaw can be trusted after the revelation that Sarah killed his wife. 
Back at Castle, Chuck is reprimanded by Beckman for his unauthorized use of the strike team, although Shaw defends his actions to protect his partner. Nonetheless, Beckman benches Chuck and orders Sarah and Shaw to Washington to head up the search for the Director. Shaw finds the director, and Sarah chooses Chuck to help them apprehend him. 
The next day, Chuck explains everything to Sarah who is not disappointed that he killed Shaw to save her. 
Chuck goes home and gets drunk after being benched, and flashes and ties up Morgan when the latter tries to take away the bottle. Sarah arrives to discuss the situation and Chuck asks her if she loves him. Sarah says yes, and that she fell for him from the first time they met. Sarah then tells him they have a mission and takes him to meet Shaw to capture the Director. 
Morgan believes that he is going to be made a full member of Team Bartowski, much to Casey's envy. Morgan subsequently tenders his resignation to Big Mike, and tells Casey to enjoy "my old life," a sentiment Casey mirrors. However, Beckman later proves displeased with Chuck involving Morgan in the mission when he recognized Shaw's fight with the Ring was staged, and suspends Chuck instead. 
Meanwhile, Casey is still largely paralyzed by his dismissal and initially unwilling to help when Morgan and Chuck arrive to enlist him in their off-book operation to save Sarah. However, Morgan is able to appeal to his sense of duty and convinces him to help. On the flight, Chuck's ability to flash is of no use in determining Shaw's destination, however Casey reminds Chuck of his own intelligence without the need of the Intersect. 
In Paris, Casey apprehends the Director and uses him as a bargaining chip with Beckman to get himself reinstated, and also convinces her to make Morgan an official part of the team. Morgan receives her call just after he returns to working at the Buy More. Morgan goes to quit again but Beckman reminds him that he has to stay to maintain his cover. 
He played 3 seasons in the Russian Football National League for FC Luch-Energiya Vladivostok and FC Rotor Volgograd. 
This biographical article related to a Russian association football defender born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Poliaenus volitans is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by John Lawrence LeConte in 1873. It is known from Guatemala and Mexico. 
Dumfries is an unincorporated community in Glasgow Township, Wabasha County, Minnesota, United States. 
The community is located between Wabasha and Zumbro Falls along State Highway 60 (MN 60). Wabasha County Roads 20, 30, and 86 are also in the immediate area. Trout Brook and the Zumbro River meet near Dumfries. Other nearby places include Wabasha, West Albany, Theilman, Kellogg, and Zumbro Falls. 
A post office called Dumfries was established in 1894, and remained in operation until 1912. The community was named after Dumfries in Scotland. 
This article about a location in Wabasha County, Minnesota is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The garden was one of the four (public) gardens that formed a core of the original garden festival of New Plymouth. It has also been named as one of Top 50 New Zealand Gardens by a garden guide book. 
The New Hampshire Historical Society is an independent nonprofit in Concord that saves, preserves, and shares New Hampshire history. 
The New Hampshire Historical Society was founded in 1823. The society has an extensive collection of objects and archives related to New Hampshire's history. Each year, the society uses its collections to serve members and visitors through its research library, museum, publications, and outreach programs. The society's education programs reach children from communities across the state. 
The society is an independent, non-profit organization. The society depends on contributions from private sources to fund its operations. 
The society is the state's primary organization for collecting, preserving, and sharing Granite State history. Its museum and library offer extensive collections of resources and materials related to New Hampshire history. 
The society collects objects, books, manuscripts, and images that document New Hampshire's history. The collections include approximately 33,000 museum objects, 50,000 printed volumes, 1.5 million pages of manuscripts, 800,000 pages of newspapers, 250,000 photographic images, 10,000 broadsides and ephemera items. Ranging in date from pre-contact to the present day, the Society's holdings reflect broadly the state's economic, political, social, and cultural history. 
The New Hampshire Historical Society's staff is prepared to assist in general research on New Hampshire history and genealogy by using any sources found in their library or museum. Research services can be requested by contacting the society. 
The society offers changing exhibitions on a variety of topics and long-term displays of selected objects including paintings, New Hampshire-made furniture, the original eagle from the New Hampshire State House, and Revolutionary War flags. 
The society offers a variety of educational programs, including school tours at the museum, outreach programs to classrooms across the state, workshops, lectures, demonstrations, courses, family days, and technical workshops for local historical societies and libraries. The society published a New Hampshire history curriculum for grades K-12. 
The society publishes a semi-annual journal, Historical New Hampshire, and a quarterly newsletter featuring information on the society's events and activities. Additional special publications include exhibition catalogs, gallery brochures, and school activity guides. The society's publications have received awards from the American Association for State and Local History. 
The society is governed by a 20-member board of trustees. The society employs 13 full-time and 25 part-time staff, assisted by 80 volunteers. 
Along with 18 other cultural organizations, the New Hampshire Historical Society is a member of the New England Regional Fellowship Consortium, which offers grants for projects that draw on the collections and resources of the collaborating organizations. 
All of the New Hampshire Historical Society's programs and services are made possible by membership dues and contributions from individuals, foundations, and businesses. 
This is a list of toll roads in Indonesia grouped per province. Only toll roads that are either completely or partially operational are included. Partially opened toll roads are listed in italics. 
Toll roads are operated by state-owned company Jasa Marga and various private companies. All operators are under the auspices of Toll Road Regulatory Agency (Badan Pengatur Jalan Tol, BPJT) of the Ministry of Public Works and People's Housing. 
A Personnel Certification Body is an organization that awards credentials to individuals meeting specific competence requirements relating to a profession, an occupation, a job or a portion of a job. A personnel certification body develops criteria against which an individual needs to demonstrate competencies and ensures that these criteria are held by applicants before certifying them.  
Most personnel certification bodies offer professional certification if an individual meets requirements such as a minimum number of years of related working experience, minimum education level and having passed a certification exam or equivalent. 
Many personnel certification bodies are accredited by accrediting bodies to the ISO/IEC 17024 standard, which was designed to harmonize the personnel certification process worldwide. Most are not. Accreditation means having gone through a validation process or assessment from a national accreditation body such as the American National Standards Institute ANSI,  German Accreditation Body DAkkS, International Accreditation Service IAS, or the United Kingdom Accreditation Service UKAS (UK)). 
Many accredited personnel certifications bodies are members of the International Personnel Certification Association. 
Paolo Beatrizzotti (born 3 November 1992 in Parma, Italy) is an Italian football player who is currently playing for Santarcangelo on loan from Parma. 
In July 2011, Beatrizzotti moved from Parma to Santarcangelo on a co-ownership deal, but full ownership returned to Parma in January 2012. In July 2012, he returned to Santarcangelo on a year's loan. 
This biographical article related to association football in Italy, about a defender born in the 1990s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
As of 2001[update] India census, Krishnapuram  had a population of 25927 with 12305 males and 13622 females. 
The season was divided into two tournaments: the Apertura and the Clausura. In each tournament, the teams played against each other in a single round-robin format. Whoever plays at home against an opponent in the Apertura played the same opponent as a visitor in the Clausura. The champion of the Copa Uruguaya could have been decided in three ways: 
Since Nacional won the initial playoff, an additional two matches was contested to crown the champion. The points system was used for the two matches. The team with the most points at the end of the second game was declared the champion. If there was a tie in points after the second game, goal difference would be used to break the tie, followed by two fifteen-minute extra periods, followed by a penalty shootout if necessary.  
Libinia ferreirae is a species of tropical spider crab in the family Epialtidae. It is found on the seabed in shallow waters off the Atlantic coast of South America. 
Like other spider crabs, Libinia ferreirae has a roughly circular spiny carapace that extends forwards into a rostrum between the two, stalked eyes. It has five pairs of walking limbs. 
The larvae of Libinia ferreirae are planktonic and have one prezoeal stage, two zoeal stages and one megalopa stage. The carapace of the zoea has one short rostral and one curved dorsal spine and some of the abdominal segments have spiny projections. The post-larval megalopa has a downturned rostrum, a carapace with various protuberances and four pairs of abdominal appendages. 
Adult Libinia ferreirae often have faunal epibionts growing on their carapace. These include algae, polychaete worms, sea anemones, barnacles, bryozoans and hydroids. The most common species growing on the carapace was the sea anemone, Calliactis tricolor, which seems to be used by the crabs as camouflage. Bryozoans colonised the legs as well as the carapace. 
Hello I Must Be Going is a 2012 American comedy-drama film written by Sarah Koskoff and directed by Todd Louiso. It stars Melanie Lynskey, Christopher Abbott and Blythe Danner. The film had its world premiere at the 2012 Sundance Film Festival, and was released theatrically in the United States on September 7, 2012. The title is a reference to a song from the Marx Brothers' film Animal Crackers. 
Speaking of the casting decision of Lynskey in the lead, director Todd Louiso said, "I knew if I cast her, the film had the potential to resonate on a thousand different levels." After Lynskey's audition, "there was no one else."  The role represented a career breakthrough for Lynskey, who had previously played in numerous supporting roles.  In Hello I Must Be Going, she appears in every scene. 
In the midst of a divorce and condemned to move back in with her parents at the age of 35, Amy Minsky's prospects are looking bleak. She's depressed, out of work, and fed up with everybody's so-called "advice", but a secret love affair with a handsome 19-year-old gradually reinstates her self-esteem. 
The film was nominated for the Grand Jury Prize in the U.S. Dramatic Competition at the 2012 Sundance Film Festival, and was named one of the Top Ten Independent Films of 2012 by the National Board of Review. Lynskey's performance earned a nomination for Breakthrough Actor at the 2012 Gotham Awards. 
The film's soundtrack was released on September 11, 2012. It features instrumental and vocal material by American singer/songwriter Laura Veirs. 
Marianella Castellanos (born April 15, 1984 in Acarigua, Portuguesa, Venezuela) is a Venezuelan softball player. She competed for Venezuela at the 2008 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to a Venezuelan softball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He moved to Los Angeles with an ensemble in the early 1960s, but his band failed and he returned to West Virginia. Later in the 1960s he moved to New York City. He played the uptown East Side local Bar's (Malachy's II) and eventually found success. He released his debut album on Warner Bros. Records in 1970. He scored two minor hit singles in the early 1970s. Further releases followed later in the decade, as did a third hit in 1980. 
Richards made the first recording of Tom Snow and Nan O'Byrne's "You Might Need Somebody", which was subsequently a UK hit twice, reaching number 11 for Randy Crawford in 1981 and number 4 for Shola Ama in 1997. 
The Brown Tobacco Warehouse is a historic warehouse building located in Louisville, Kentucky.  The two-story brick structure was built in 1892. It was first occupied by John W. Brown & Brothers Tobacco Company. 
It has a two-story arched entrance for vehicles, with three narrower round-arched window bays on each side.  The building is "representative of the architecture of the many tobacco warehouses built after the 1890 tornado." 
This article about a property in Jefferson County, Kentucky on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article related to a building or structure in Louisville, Kentucky is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Colpoda are distinctly reniform (kidney-shaped) and are strongly convex on one side, concave on the other. The concave side often looks like a bite was taken out of it. Although they are not as well known as the paramecium, they are often the first protozoa to appear in hay infusions, especially when the sample does not come from an existing mature source of standing water. 
Colpoda are often found in moist soil and because of their ability to readily enter protective cysts will quite frequently be found in desiccated samples of soil and vegetation as well as in temporary natural pools such as tree holes. They have also been found in the intestines of various animals, and can be cultured from their droppings. 
Colpoda cucullus has been found inhabiting the surface of plants and seems to dominate the microfauna there. Several species of Colpoda have been found in the pitcher plant Sarracenia purpurea, despite the presence of protease digestive enzymes in the liquid. 
Colpoda also tend to be found in abundance where increased levels of bacteria offer an enriched food source. In commercial chicken houses, for example, they seemed to  be ubiquitous but the species found vary widely from one location to the next, suggesting that these populations represent local soil and aquatic populations which migrated into the new habitat. 
Colpoda normally divide in cysts, from which two to eight individuals emerge, four being the most common number. This produces genetically identical individuals. The rate at which such reproduction occurs and how it is affected by various environmental conditions has been the subject of a great deal of scientific research. 
As in other ciliates, division in Colpoda may be preceded by a sexual phenomenon known as conjugation. This involves two Colpoda joining at the oral groove and exchanging DNA. Following conjugation, the Colpoda divides, redistributing the DNA of the two original cells to produce numerous genetically distinct offspring. 
Most Colpoda species are either primarily or exclusively bacterivores feeding on a wide variety of bacteria, which include Moraxella. Several scientific studies have been made on the effect of different bacterial diets on the rate of Colpoda reproduction. Much has been written on the ecological role that Colpoda fulfill in the soil. 
In addition to their role as predators of bacteria, Colpoda are themselves prey to large variety of species. This includes other protozoans as well as small animals such as mosquito larva, other insect larva, and waterfleas. 
In addition to their use in education and in a wide variety of scientific studies, Colpoda have at times been suggested for more practical uses. Colpoda steini has been suggested as a means to assess the toxicity of soil treated with sewage sludge and as a means to detect chemical contamination in general, possibly in the wake of a terrorist attack. 
He made his debut for FC Zorya as a substituted player in the second half-time in the match against FC Vorskla Poltava on 24 September 2017 in the Ukrainian Premier League. 
Father of Serhiy, Serhiy Maiboroda was a marine infantryman who was killed by the Russian occupation forces in 2019. 
This biographical article related to a Ukrainian association football midfielder born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a historical novel of the 2000s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
This article about a World War II novel first published in the 2000s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
He was born in Krute (Krytha) in Ulcinj Municipality (Ulqin), present-day Montenegro and studied Albanian language and literature at the University of Pristina. He was professor of style, semiotics and contemporary poetry at the Academy of Arts of Kosovo. He published seven anthologies of poetry and five works on literary criticism. Since 2012 he was a member of the Academy of Sciences of Albania. He has been considered a leading poet in the Albanian community in Montenegro. 
Fast Eagle 102 (BuNo 160403) is now on display at the Commemorative Air Force Museum in Midland, Texas. The restored F-14 was unveiled in a ceremony on August 26, 2016. Vice Admiral Dave Venlet cut the first tape. Fast Eagle 107 (BuNo 160390) was destroyed in an accident on 25 October 1994.[citation needed] 
F-14 BuNo 162592, painted to depict the F-14 (BuNo 160403) flown by Kleemann and Venlet on display at the Ronald Reagan Presidential Library in Simi Valley, California 
To avoid direct competition with Fox's American Idol, Dancing with the Stars changed time slots from the previous season. In this season, the performance show aired on Mondays, and the results show aired on Tuesdays. No elimination was scheduled for the first week, in order to allow viewers two weeks to see all of the couples perform both Latin and Standard ballroom dances. This season was broadcast on BBC One in the United Kingdom on Sunday afternoons from Sunday, July 15, 2007. 
On May 22, 2007, olympic short-track speed skater Apolo Anton Ohno and Julianne Hough were announced the winners, marking the first win for Hough. 
Tom Bergeron and Samantha Harris returned as hosts, while Carrie Ann Inaba, Len Goodman, and Bruno Tonioli returned as judges. 
The best and worst performances in each dance according to the judges' 30-point scale are as follows: 
Individual judges' scores in the charts below (given in parentheses) are listed in this order from left to right: Carrie Ann Inaba, Len Goodman, Bruno Tonioli. 
His Lordship is a 1932 British musical comedy film directed by Michael Powell. It was made as a Quota quickie. 
Cheerful Cockney Bert Gibbs inherits a title from his father and becomes Lord Thornton Heath. However, then he meets up with movie star Ilya Myona and when his mother asks about her, Bert implies they are engaged. After some adventures with some dubious Russian types, Bert's girl Lenina eventually wins him back. 
His Lordship was declared to be "Missing, Believed Lost" by the British Film Institute, but a copy was subsequently found. It was put onto safety film and shown at the NFT in 2000. It proved popular with audiences as a camp classic. 
Roberto Arango-Vinent is a Cuban American politician who served in the Senate of Puerto Rico from January 2005 until August 2011 representing the San Juan district for the New Progressive Party of Puerto Rico (NPP), which is a conservative group derived from the Republican Statehood Party. 
During his tenure Arango voted for anti-gay legislation several times. He resigned his senate seat and withdrew from politics in 2011 after a series of nude photos from the gay match application Grindr were made public, and stated that he had come to realise that he was gay. In 2014 he ran, unsuccessfully, for election again. 
Arango studied at Colegio San Ignacio in San Juan. He then graduated from Louisiana State University (LSU) receiving a Bachelor's degree in Marketing and Technology. After that, he worked as a food importer and wholesaler. 
In 1989 Arango founded his own food distribution company, Intercontinental Food Distributors. In 2003 he was named Young Entrepreneur of the year by the Business Men and Women International Alliance (AIHME). 
Arango then served as a member of the Executive Committee of the Council of State Governments' Eastern Regional Conference (CSG/ERC). An alumnus of CSG/ERC's Eastern Leadership Academy, he was elected president of the class of 2006. He was a member of CSG's Toll Fellows Program class of 2007.[citation needed] 
He was nominated for a second term in the 2008 PNP primary, which he won. In the 2008 general elections, he was the top vote-winner within the San Juan District. His fellow senators chose him as the Senate Majority Leader for the term, the top Senate leadership position after the Senate Presidency, for which Sen. Thomas Rivera Schatz was selected.  As Majority Leader, he was charged with the task of pursuing the approval of the PNP's programmatic legislation in the legislative body. 
He was opposed to the practice of shooting firearms up into the air during the holiday season, especially on New Year's Eve, a practice that has caused injury.[citation needed] On December 21, 2008, he held a joint press conference on the issue with Guayama, Puerto Rico Mayor-elect Glorimari Jaime and several pop artists, including Miguelito. 
After his resignation, Arango started working on a private international distributor. When questioned by the press he did not deny that he might return to politics in the future. 
In March 2014 Arango said in an interview with NotiUno that he had come to understand he was gay as a result of his resignation. Critics noted he had previously cast several anti-gay votes, had led efforts to pass a constitutional same-sex marriage ban, and in 2004 mocked another candidate, implying that the candidate was gay. 
Two bacterial strains isolated from Lake Mondsee were recognized as new species and described as Polynucleobacter cosmopolitanus and Polynucleobacter duraquae, respectively. Both species are non-pathogenic and dwell in the lake as part of its bacterioplankton. 
Ian Fleming mentions the Mondsee in one of his James Bond novels, Thunderball. In chapter six, Blofeld reports to the members of SMERSH that their German unit has successfully retrieved (in secret) Himmler's hoard of jewels from Lake Mondsee. 
Isaac Towers (born 1 October 1998) is a Paralympian athlete from England competing in category T34 sprint and middle-distance events. Towers won gold to become European champion in the 800m (T34) event in 2016 and qualified for the Summer Paralympics in Rio. 
Towers was born in 1998 in Lancashire, England. He was educated at Saint Michael's on Wyre Primary School and King Edward VII and Queen Mary School, before attending Cardinal Newman College where he studies business. He has cerebral palsy. 
Towers was introduced to wheelchair athletics in 2010 after being introduced to the sport by para-athletics coach Ian Thompson. By 2011 he was classified as a T34 classification athlete and was competing at regional competitions. In 2013 he wanted to enter the World Championships in Lyon, but at 14 he was under the minimum age requirement. That year he was named as a nominee for the BBC Young Sports Personality of the Year. 
It was established on 4 June 1888, with 29 students and one temporary school building. The school was originally called Kalawana Swabhasha Misra Patashalawa. In 1958 it reached Maha Vidyalaya status and in 1979 Madya Maha Vidyalaya status. In 2012 there were over 2,300 students, 88 teachers and 28 permanent buildings. 
Kalawana Central College was designated as a National School by the Sri Lankan Government in the mid 1990s. 
On 22 September 1798, Captain Louis-Marie Le Gouardun took command, until 5 October of the same year. 
This article about a specific military ship or boat of France is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 1958 San Jose State Spartans football team represented San Jose State College[note 1] during the 1958 NCAA University Division football season. 
When a coin is in use as money and the intrinsic value becomes greater than the face value, these coins are in danger of being removed from circulation in large numbers (an expression of Gresham's law). When copper prices skyrocketed in the mid-to-late 1970s, there was a fear that the U.S. one-cent piece might succumb to this fate, leading the Mint to change the composition of the cent in 1982. 
This article related to sports in Baton Rouge, Louisiana is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gilson is both an English and French surname and a given name. Notable people with the name include: 
These are delicate filaments, from six to ten in number, which arise from the forepart of the ganglion in two bundles connected with its superior and inferior angles; the lower bundle is the larger. 
They run forward with the ciliary arteries in a wavy course, one set above and the other below the optic nerve, and are accompanied by the long ciliary nerves from the nasociliary. 
They pierce the sclera at the back part of the bulb of the eye, pass forward in delicate grooves on the inner surface of the sclera, and are distributed to the ciliary muscle, iris, and cornea. 
Scheme showing sympathetic and parasympathetic innervation of the pupil and sites of lesion in a Horner's syndrome. 
Olive Crest is a non-profit organization dedicated to helping abused and neglected children.  Olive Crest was founded in 1973, and serves 5,000 children and families each year throughout California, Nevada, and the Pacific Northwest. Within these states are the six regions Olive Crest is currently located in: the Inland Empire and Desert Communities, Los Angeles, Nevada, Orange County, the Pacific Northwest, and San Diego. 
In 2014, Olive Crest exceeded national averages for four key outcomes: Safety, Well-being, Stability, and Permanence. Key outcomes: 
This article about an organization in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The topic of projective geometry is itself now divided into many research subtopics, two examples of which are projective algebraic geometry (the study of projective varieties) and projective differential geometry (the study of differential invariants of the projective transformations). 
In a foundational sense, projective geometry and ordered geometry are elementary since they involve a minimum of axioms and either can be used as the foundation for affine and Euclidean geometry. Projective geometry is not "ordered" and so it is a distinct foundation for geometry. 
The work of Poncelet, Jakob Steiner and others was not intended to extend analytic geometry. Techniques were supposed to be synthetic: in effect projective space as now understood was to be introduced axiomatically. As a result, reformulating early work in projective geometry so that it satisfies current standards of rigor can be somewhat difficult. Even in the case of the projective plane alone, the axiomatic approach can result in models not describable via linear algebra. 
This period in geometry was overtaken by research on the general algebraic curve by Clebsch, Riemann, Max Noether and others, which stretched existing techniques, and then by invariant theory. Towards the end of the century, the Italian school of algebraic geometry (Enriques, Segre, Severi) broke out of the traditional subject matter into an area demanding deeper techniques. 
During the later part of the 19th century, the detailed study of projective geometry became less fashionable, although the literature is voluminous. Some important work was done in enumerative geometry in particular, by Schubert, that is now considered as anticipating the theory of Chern classes, taken as representing the algebraic topology of Grassmannians. 
Paul Dirac studied projective geometry and used it as a basis for developing his concepts of quantum mechanics, although his published results were always in algebraic form. See a blog article referring to an article and a book on this subject, also to a talk Dirac gave to a general audience during 1972 in Boston about projective geometry, without specifics as to its application in his physics. 
Additional properties of fundamental importance include Desargues' Theorem and the Theorem of Pappus. In projective spaces of dimension 3 or greater there is a construction that allows one to prove Desargues' Theorem. But for dimension 2, it must be separately postulated. 
There are many projective geometries, which may be divided into discrete and continuous: a discrete geometry comprises a set of points, which may or may not be finite in number, while a continuous geometry has infinitely many points with no gaps in between. 
The only projective geometry of dimension 0 is a single point. A projective geometry of dimension 1 consists of a single line containing at least 3 points. The geometric construction of arithmetic operations cannot be performed in either of these cases. For dimension 2, there is a rich structure in virtue of the absence of Desargues' Theorem. 
The smallest 2-dimensional projective geometry (that with the fewest points) is the Fano plane, which has 3 points on every line, with 7 points and 7 lines in all, having the following collinearities: 
The term "projective geometry" is used sometimes to indicate the generalised underlying abstract geometry, and sometimes to indicate a particular geometry of wide interest, such as the metric geometry of flat space which we analyse through the use of homogeneous coordinates, and in which Euclidean geometry may be embedded (hence its name, Extended Euclidean plane). 
The parallel property of elliptic geometry is the key idea that leads to the principle of projective duality, possibly the most important property that all projective geometries have in common. 
In practice, the principle of duality allows us to set up a dual correspondence between two geometric constructions. The most famous of these is the polarity or reciprocity of two figures in a conic curve (in 2 dimensions) or a quadric surface (in 3 dimensions). A commonplace example is found in the reciprocation of a symmetrical polyhedron in a concentric sphere to obtain the dual polyhedron. 
Another example is Brianchon's theorem, the dual of the already mentioned Pascal's theorem, and one of whose proofs simply consists of applying the principle of duality to Pascal's. Here are comparative statements of these two theorems (in both cases within the framework of the projective plane): 
Any given geometry may be deduced from an appropriate set of axioms. Projective geometries are characterised by the "elliptic parallel" axiom, that any two planes always meet in just one line, or in the plane, any two lines always meet in just one point. In other words, there are no such things as parallel lines or planes in projective geometry. 
Many alternative sets of axioms for projective geometry have been proposed (see for example Coxeter 2003, Hilbert & Cohn-Vossen 1999, Greenberg 1980). 
These axioms are based on Whitehead, "The Axioms of Projective Geometry". There are two types, points and lines, and one "incidence" relation between points and lines. The three axioms are: 
The reason each line is assumed to contain at least 3 points is to eliminate some degenerate cases. The spaces satisfying these three axioms either have at most one line, or are projective spaces of some dimension over a division ring, or are non-Desarguesian planes. 
One can pursue axiomatization by postulating a ternary relation, [ABC] to denote when three points (not all necessarily distinct) are collinear. An axiomatization may be written down in terms of this relation as well: 
For two different points, A and B, the line AB is defined as consisting of all points C for which [ABC]. The axioms C0 and C1 then provide a formalization of G2; C2 for G1 and C3 for G3. 
The concept of line generalizes to planes and higher-dimensional subspaces. A subspace, AB...XY may thus be recursively defined in terms of the subspace AB...X as that containing all the points of all lines YZ, as Z ranges over AB...X. Collinearity then generalizes to the relation of "independence". A set {A, B, ..., Z} of points is independent, [AB...Z] if {A, B, ..., Z} is a minimal generating subset for the subspace AB...Z. 
The projective axioms may be supplemented by further axioms postulating limits on the dimension of the space. The minimum dimension is determined by the existence of an independent set of the required size. For the lowest dimensions, the relevant conditions may be stated in equivalent form as follows. A projective space is of: 
The maximum dimension may also be determined in a similar fashion. For the lowest dimensions, they take on the following forms. A projective space is of: 
It is generally assumed that projective spaces are of at least dimension 2. In some cases, if the focus is on projective planes, a variant of M3 may be postulated. The axioms of (Eves 1997: 111), for instance, include (1), (2), (L3) and (M3). Axiom (3) becomes vacuously true under (M3) and is therefore not needed in this context. 
Coxeter's Introduction to Geometry gives a list of five axioms for a more restrictive concept of a projective plane attributed to Bachmann, adding Pappus's theorem to the list of axioms above (which eliminates non-Desarguesian planes) and excluding projective planes over fields of characteristic 2 (those that don't satisfy Fano's axiom). The restricted planes given in this manner more closely resemble the real projective plane. 
Given three non-collinear points, there are three lines connecting them, but with four points, no three collinear, there are six connecting lines and three additional "diagonal points" determined by their intersections. The science of projective geometry captures this surplus determined by four points through a quaternary relation and the projectivities which preserve the complete quadrangle configuration. 
An harmonic quadruple of points on a line occurs when there is a complete quadrangle two of whose diagonal points are in the first and third  position of the quadruple, and the other two positions are points on the lines joining two quadrangle points through the third diagonal point. 
A spacial perspectivity of a projective configuration in one plane yields such a configuration in another, and this applies to the configuration of the complete quadrangle. Thus harmonic quadruples are preserved by perspectivity. If one perspectivity follows  another the configurations follow along. The composition of two perspectivities is no longer a perspectivity, but a projectivity. 
While corresponding points of a perspectivity all converge at a point, this convergence  is not true for a  projectivity that is not a perspectivity. In projective geometry the intersection of lines formed by  corresponding points of a projectivity in a plane are of particular interest. The set of such intersections is called a projective conic, and in acknowledgement of the work of Jakob Steiner, it is  referred to as a Steiner conic. 
Suppose a projectivity  is formed by two perspectivities centered on points A and B, relating x to X by an intermediary p: 
Given a conic C and a point P not on it, two distinct secant lines through P intersect C in four points. These four points determine a quadrangle of which P is a diagonal point. The line through the other two diagonal points is called the polar of P and P is the pole of this line. Alternatively, the polar line of P is the set of projective harmonic conjugates of P on a variable secant line passing through P and C. 
The Siddheshwari Kali Mandir is a Hindu temple located at 14 Siddheshwari Lane in Dhaka, Bangladesh. 
It is unknown how and when the temple was established. It is known that the name of Siddheshwari has come from the temple's name.  It is estimated that someone called Chand Rai established this temple. 
It is situated in a very congested area with narrow roads and crowded with people. Beside Siddheshwari the centre of Malibug is situated. In the courtyard of the temple a "Roktochondon" tree is standing. Near the temple there was an old pond and some old temples. 
In the temple, festivals are organized. At the time of Sharodio festival the people have placed Puja in front of the statue of Devi Ma for years. The people organize the grand festival of Durga Puja. On the tenth day of worshiping the Hindu people immerse the statue of Devi Ma into the pond. In this way the festivals goes on throughout the year. 
Tritoma angulata is a species of pleasing fungus beetle in the family Erotylidae. It is found in North America. 
Darabi served five years of a prison sentence for theft on death row after her conviction (In Iran, prisoners often have to serve time in prison before execution). She initially confessed, but later recanted, claiming her boyfriend, Amir Hossein, persuaded her to confess by convincing her that he would be executed (as she would not have been in most places, being a minor; but this was not the case in Iran). 
Darabi was born in the northern city of Rasht, in the province of Gilan. Darabi was hanged in the morning of 1 May 2009. The news of her hanging was announced to the world by Iranian-American lawyer, Lily Mazahery, who posted the information on Twitter. 
Darabi was a painter and wrote a few poems during her lifetime. She had used her paintings and poems to express her feelings. In 2008 there was an exhibition of her paintings in Tehran; a similar exhibition was held in Stockholm in April 2007. 
According to the penal code of the Islamic Republic of Iran, children are considered criminally responsible for their actions as adults at the age of puberty. Pursuant to Article 1210, Addendum 1, girls reach the age of puberty 6 years before their male counterparts, at age of 9. Boys, on the other hand, are not legally considered to have reached the maturity that would make them responsible for their actions, such as murder, until the age of 15. 
Human Rights Watch and Amnesty International say Iran executes the most juvenile offenders of any country, in breach of the UN Convention, which forbids the death penalty for crimes committed under the age of 18. Lawyers[who?] estimate 130 prisoners are on death row in Iran for murders committed as minors. 
Dorchester is a village in Saline County, Nebraska, United States. It is thirty-eight miles southwest from the Lincoln, Nebraska metropolitan area. The population was 586 at the 2010 census. 
Dorchester was platted in 1870 when the Burlington and Missouri River Railroad was extended to that point. The name was probably chosen to conform with the alphabetical stops on the new Burlington & Quincy Railroad line traveling westward from Lincoln: Berks, Crete, Dorchester, Exeter, Fairmont, Grafton, Huxley, etc. It was likely named after Dorchester, Massachusetts, although some say it was named for Dorchester, in England, which in any case is the namesake of the Massachusetts city. 
As of the census of 2010, there were 586 people, 233 households, and 166 families residing in the village. The population density was 1,220.8 inhabitants per square mile (471.4/km2). There were 253 housing units at an average density of 527.1 per square mile (203.5/km2). The racial makeup of the village was 90.8% White, 1.0% African American, 0.2% Native American, 0.2% Asian, 6.8% from other races, and 1.0% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 9.7% of the population. 
There were 233 households, of which 34.3% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 55.8% were married couples living together, 11.6% had a female householder with no husband present, 3.9% had a male householder with no wife present, and 28.8% were non-families. 24.0% of all households were made up of individuals, and 7.7% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.52 and the average family size was 2.98. 
The median age in the village was 37.5 years. 26.1% of residents were under the age of 18; 7.1% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 26.4% were from 25 to 44; 26.8% were from 45 to 64; and 13.3% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the village was 48.5% male and 51.5% female. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 615 people, 148 households, and 85 families residing in the village. The population density was 1,349.3 people per square mile (516.2/km2). There were 258 housing units at an average density of 566.1 per square mile (216.6/km2). The racial makeup of the village was 97.24% White, 2.60% from other races, and 0.16% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 4.07% of the population. 
There were 248 households, out of which 32.7% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 60.1% were married couples living together, 10.1% had a female householder with no husband present, and 25.4% were non-families. 23.4% of all households were made up of individuals, and 12.9% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.48 and the average family size was 2.88. 
In the village, the population was spread out, with 24.9% under the age of 18, 7.8% from 18 to 24, 28.6% from 25 to 44, 20.5% from 45 to 64, and 18.2% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 38 years. For every 100 females, there were 93.4 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 90.9 males. 
As of 2000 the median income for a household in the village was $34,000, and the median income for a family was $40,982. Males had a median income of $29,803 versus $23,750 for females. The per capita income for the village was $16,389. About 4.1% of families and 6.2% of the population were below the poverty line, including 2.8% of those under age 18 and 8.8% of those age 65 or over. 
Carabus scabrosus, common name huge violet ground beetle,  is a species of beetles of the family Carabidae. 
He temporarily stopped working in the 1870s, for unknown reasons, but began painting historical art in the 80s. In 1881, he became a member of the Association of Travelling Art Exhibitions. His best work during this time was arguably his genre paintings, each exhibiting a human moral. From 1887 to 1890, he taught at the MSPSA and, in 1889, became curator at the Tretyakov Gallery. 
In 1898, following the death of Pavel Tretyakov, he was offered the position of Director at the gallery, but declined, citing old age and poor health. At the age of 74, in great financial distress, he committed suicide by shooting himself at his estate near Mogilev. 
On 25 September 1980, the Soviet Union issued a 6 kopek postage stamp  commemorating the 150th anniversary of his birth (together with that of Konstantin Flavitsky). 
An international open-air painting festival is held annually in his honor in the Mogilev Region of Belarus. 
"We'll Always Have Bourbon Street" is the eighth episode of The Vampire Diaries's fourth season, premiering December 6, 2012 on The CW. 
When the episode aired on December 6, 2012, the episode was viewed by 2.42 million American viewers. 
The Great Satraps' Revolt, or the Revolt of the Satraps (366-360 BC), was a rebellion in the Achaemenid Empire of several satraps against the authority of the Great King Artaxerxes II Mnemon. The Satraps who revolted were Datames, Ariobarzanes and Orontes of Armenia. Mausolus the Dynast of Caria participated in the Revolt of the Satraps, both on his nominal sovereign Artaxerxes Mnemon's side and (briefly) against him. 
They were supported by the pharaohs of Egypt, Nectanebo I, Teos, and Nectanebo II, to whom was sent Rheomithres who came back with 50 ships and 500 talents, and all joined forces against Artaxerxes II. 
Datames, the satrap of Cappadocia and a talented military commander, had inherited his satrapy from his father Camissares after 384 BC  but later problems with the court led him to revolt in 372 BC. The court commanded the neighboring satraps, Autophradates of Lydia and Artumpara of Lycia, to crush the rebellion but Datames successfully resisted their attacks. 
Datames was killed in 362 BC after his son in law Mitrobarzanes betrayed him, falsely claiming to be his ally against the Achaemenid king. 
Ariobarzanes, satrap of Phrygia and a son of the ruler of Pontus, had been made acting satrap of Hellespontine Phrygia until Artabazos, the legitimate heir of the satrapy could take office. But when Artabazos was ready to take the satrapy Ariobarzanes refused to surrender it and joined Datames' revolt in 366 BC. 
Ariobarzanes sought foreign aid and he received it from King Agesilaus II of Sparta.  Ariobarzanes withstood a siege at Adramyttium in 366 BC, from Mausolus of Caria and  Autophradates of Lydia, until Agesilaus negotiated the besiegers' retreat. As signal of sympathy in the effort, Athens made Ariobarzanes and three of his sons citizens of Athens. Ariobarzanes was betrayed by his son Mithridates to his overlord, the Persian king, who had Ariobarzanes crucified. 
The winners of both 1 East (Penallta) and 1 East Central (Beddau) would play-off at a neutral venue to determine which club would be promoted. The game was to be played at Taff's Well's ground, Maes Gwyn. 
Maitland also fought at various battles during the First Opium War including the Battle of Canton at which he commanded the 1st naval battalion. He gave evidence to the Royal Commission on the Defence of the United Kingdom and argued that building powerful ships was more important than building fortifications. He went on to be Commander-in-Chief, Pacific Station. 
Maitland was appointed First and Principal Naval Aide-de-Camp to the Queen on 22 November 1866. Promoted to full admiral on 8 April 1868, he retired in February 1873 and was advanced to Knight Grand Cross of the Order of the Bath on 24 May 1873. He was promoted to Admiral of the Fleet on 27 December 1877 and died at his home, Thirlestane Castle in Berwickshire on 1 September 1878. 
Ledanca is a municipality located in the province of Guadalajara, Castile-La Mancha, Spain. According to the 2004 census (INE), the municipality has a population of 120 inhabitants. 
Smoky Mountain Brass Quintet is a brass quintet founded in 1993 and currently Quintet in Residence at Western Carolina University. 
Since its founding in 1993, the Smoky Mountain Brass Quintet has entertained audiences around the world in nine countries on three continents in venues such as Weill Recital Hall at Carnegie Hall, and Shostakovich Philharmonia Hall. The Quintet performs a wide variety of music ranging from Early Renaissance to Jazz. In addition, works commissioned from regional composers such as Bruce Frazier, Michael Kallstrom and Robert Kehrberg have expanded the repertoire for all brass quintets. 
The Smoky Mountain Brass Quintet is a non-profit, 501-c(3) organization whose mission is "to promote the understanding and enjoyment of music, particularly among the youth of western North Carolina, and to expand appreciation for the musical heritage of the Southern Appalachian region". 
Among its many community service performances, the SMBQ has helped to raise money for the new public library, for the local arts council, and for the Jackson County band program. On an afternoon in 2007, the quintet hosted "Sunday in the Park" and helped raise $14,500 for National Alzheimer's Day.[citation needed] 
Until 2015 he was Editor in Chief of the scientific journal Astrophysics and Space Science and author with Dr Ralph Sutherland of Astrophysics of the Diffuse Universe. 
Laskin began his training at Indiana University, where he received a BS, he went on to attend Indiana University School of Dentistry.  He then completed an Oral Surgery Internship at Jersey City Medical Center.  He completed his residency training in Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery at the University of Illinois and Cook County Hospitals. 
Once again in 2007 Dr. Daniel M. Laskin has demonstrated his commitment to both the profession and the public by establishing the Lectureship in Professional Ethics at Indiana University School of Dentistry. 
Laskin is well known to the Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery community even at the global level. He has received honorary memberships to eight national oral and maxillofacial surgery societies.  He has received honorary doctoral degrees from England, Scotland, as well as his alma mater, Indiana University. 
Hibbertia carinata is a species of flowering plant in the family Dilleniaceae and is endemic to the south-west of Western Australia. It is a shrub with crowded linear leaves and yellow flowers with nine to eleven stamens fused at their bases on one side of the two densely hairy carpels. 
Hibbertia carinata was first formally described in 2000 by Judith R. Wheeler in the journal Nuytsia from specimens collected at Hatter Hill in 1996. The specific epithet (carinata) means "keeled", referring to sepals. 
This hibbertia has a scattered distribution through the southern Wheatbelt and a small parts of the Goldfields-Esperance region of Western Australia between Lake Grace in the west and  Esperance in the east where it is found growing in well-drained gravelly sandy soils. 
Hibbertia carinata is classified as "Priority One" by the Government of Western Australia Department of Parks and Wildlife, meaning that it is known from only one or a few locations which are potentially at risk. 
Holaxyra ancylosticha is a moth in the family Gelechiidae. It was described by Turner in 1919. It is found in Australia, where it has been recorded from Queensland. 
This article on a moth of the subfamily Dichomeridinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kharkhni is located 12 km west of Khuchni (the district's administrative centre) by road. Dzhuldzhag, Churdaf and Gasik are the nearest rural localities. 
Yusufguda Metro Station is located on the Blue Line of the Hyderabad Metro. It is near to Krishna kanth Park, Kotla Vijaya bhaskar Stadium, Pochamma Temple, Krishna Hospital, Vidyaniketan High Schoolm and Lakshmi Narasimha Nagar road 
The stations have staircases, elevators and escalators from the street level to the platform level which provide easy and comfortable access. Also, operation panels inside the elevators are installed at a level that can be conveniently operated by all passengers, including differently-abled and elderly citizens. 
This article about a railway station in the Indian state of Telangana is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The collared whitestart (Myioborus torquatus), also known as the collared redstart, is a tropical New World warbler endemic to the mountains of Costa Rica and western-central Panama. 
The sexes are similar, but young birds are duller, with a browner back, weakly yellow underparts, and the head entirely slate-coloured, with no yellow on the face or red on the crown.[citation needed] 
The collared whitestart feeds on insects, frequently fanning its striking tail as it pursues its prey. It will join mixed feeding flocks, and will follow cattle and occasionally humans for the insects they flush. 
The roofed nest has a round side entrance and is built on the ground or a steep bank, hidden amongst rocks, tufts of grass or under a fallen log. It is constructed from strips of bark, plant fibres, leaves, and grass. From March to May, the female will lay 2 or 3 white or cream eggs that are speckled with fine brown spots. Incubation lasts about two weeks, but other nesting details are largely unknown. 
hitchBOT was a Canadian hitchhiking robot created by professors David Harris Smith of McMaster University and Frauke Zeller of Ryerson University in 2013. It gained international attention for successfully hitchhiking across Canada, Germany and the Netherlands, but in 2015 its attempt to hitchhike across the United States ended when it was stripped and decapitated in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. 
The robot's "hitchhiking" was reported by the press in many countries. From July 27, 2014 to August 21, 2014, it hitchhiked across Canada from the Institute for Applied Creativity at NSCAD University Halifax, Nova Scotia, to Victoria, British Columbia. At a First Nations powwow, it was given a name translating as "Iron Woman". The robot was so popular that its GPS had to be disabled sometimes to prevent crowds bothering those who took it into their homes. 
hitchBOT's ordeal highlighted the issues of autonomous technology, the ethics of robot treatment, and the anthropomorphism of animate-like devices. The first hitchBOT is now a permanent exhibit at the Canada Science and Technology Museum. 
Smith and Zeller recreated their invention as hitchBOT 2.0 in 2019. The robot was sent to Paris, France, where it is touring about and appearing in a play, Killing Robots, written by Linda Blanchet. 
Heretaunga is a suburb of the city of Upper Hutt, located in the lower (southern) North Island of New Zealand. The settlement, one of the older suburbs in the Hutt Valley, dates from the 1840s when European settlers sought country  sections.[need quotation to verify] A prime example of a "leafy" suburb, Heretaunga includes quiet tree-lined streets. It is characterised by large houses, often  Edwardian or from the mid-20th century. 
The suburb has numerous green spaces, most evident around the site of the Royal Wellington Wellington Golf Club and at Trentham Memorial Park. The Royal Wellington Golf Club has been based in Heretaunga since 20 November 1906 after acquiring 48.5 hectares of land from the Barton family (descendants of Richard Barton). 
Heretaunga adjoins the suburb of Silverstream to its south-west, and the two are commonly thought of associated with each other. To the north-east lies Trentham. The Heretaunga Railway Station on the Hutt Valley Line serves the suburb. 
Although some people objected to giving their religion, 37.6% had no religion, 51.1% were Christian, 2.2% were Hindu, 0.5% were Muslim, 0.6% were Buddhist and 2.3% had other religions. 
Of those at least 15 years old, 525 (26.0%) people had a bachelor or higher degree, and 327 (16.2%) people had no formal qualifications. The median income was $34,200, compared with $31,800 nationally. The employment status of those at least 15 was that 966 (47.8%) people were employed full-time, 267 (13.2%) were part-time, and 75 (3.7%) were unemployed. 
St Brendan's School is a co-educational state-integrated Catholic primary school for Year 1 to 8 students, with a roll of 259 as of March 2021. 
The Provisional IRA Honey Trap killings occurred on 23 March 1973. Volunteers from the Provisional IRA's (IRA) Belfast Brigade shot dead three off-duty soldiers from the British Army who had been lured to a house by two females on the Antrim Road in Belfast, Northern Ireland. A fourth soldier survived the shooting. 
About a week before the killings, two females met and befriended four British Army sergeants in a Belfast pub. The two women told the soldiers, who were stationed at British Army Headquarters at Thiepval Barracks in Lisburn, that they were having a party on 23 March and the six arranged to meet up. 
Later that night, Loyalists shot dead a 28-year-old man outside his house in Durham Street, Belfast, from a passing car. 
Marie-Alise Recasner (born May 25, 1962, Hollywood, California) is an American soap opera actress, best known as Alice Jackson on Santa Barbara from 1986 to 1987. She also had a recurring role as Millie on the sitcom A Different World. She portrayed the second Ellen Burgess on Port Charles from 1998 to 1999 and played Lynne Burke on Days of Our Lives from 1994 to 1998. 
This article about an American television actor born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Louis Stanfill (born May 30, 1985 in Sacramento, California) is an American rugby union player who currently plays for San Diego Legion in Major League Rugby (MLR). He previously played for the United States national team. He plays a back row at flanker or No. 8, and can also play lock. 
Stanfill began playing rugby in high school at Jesuit High School (Sacramento), where he led his school to a national semifinal appearance. Stanfill also played high school football, and was named Sacramento defensive player of the year in 2002. 
Stanfill played his college rugby at Cal, where they won several national championships during his years there, and Stanfill was selected as an All-American. 
Pilgrim's Pride Corporation is an American, multi-national food company, currently one of the largest chicken producers in the United States and Puerto Rico and the second-largest chicken producer in Mexico.  It exited bankruptcy in December 2009 and relocated its U.S. headquarters to Greeley, Colorado, in 2011. It is majority-owned by JBS S.A.. Pilgrim's Pride purchased Gold N'Plump for $350 million in late November 2016. 
Pilgrim's Pride is a multi-national corporation, based in Brazil, and employs about 38,000 people with sales of $8.1 billion in 2012, and has operations in 12 states, Mexico and Puerto Rico.  They have the capacity to process about 36 million birds per week resulting in almost 9.5 billion pounds of live chicken annually. 
Pilgrim's Pride is a supplier of Kentucky Fried Chicken and was named its "supplier of the year" in 1997. Other customers include Walmart, Publix, and Wendy's. By 2012, Pilgrim's was the exclusive rotisserie chicken supplier for Costco, supplying 50 million 3-pound marinated chickens, ready to be placed into a rotisserie. 
On October 12, 2002, Pilgrim's Pride recalled 27.4 million pounds of sliced deli poultry after finding a strain of Listeria monocytogenes in the drain of one of their facilities. It was the largest food recall in the US at the time. The outbreak killed 7 people, sickened 46, and caused 3 miscarriages.    
In 2003, Pilgrim's Pride acquired Pierce Chicken (formerly of ConAgra Foods and Hester Industries). Pierce Chicken is best known for its brand-name Wing Dings, Wing Zings, and various other prepared food products. 
In May 2004, Pilgrim's Pride experienced an outbreak of avian influenza in Hopkins County in northeast Texas; 24,000 breeder hens were destroyed to contain the outbreak.  
On December 4, 2006, Pilgrim's Pride announced the successful acquisition  of Gold Kist (formerly the third largest chicken company) for $21.00 a share.  Although there was initial resistance from Gold Kist, the board members of both companies voted unanimously to combine the two companies. 
On December 17, 2007, Pilgrim's Pride's CEO, O.B. Goolsby Jr., died after suffering a stroke while on a hunting trip in South Texas with customers. 
On April 16, 2008, after a yearlong investigation US Immigration and Customs Enforcement raided plants in Batesville, Arkansas; Live Oak, Florida; Chattanooga, Tennessee; Mount Pleasant, Texas; and Moorefield, West Virginia. Officials arrested 311 foreign national employees on suspicion of identity theft. Of these, 91 have been formally charged. 
On May 27, 2014, the company announced a $6.4 billion cash and debt offer to acquire all the shares in Hillshire Brands. A rival bid from Tyson Foods followed two days later. On June 9, 2014, the company announced it was withdrawing its bid for Hillshire after Tyson Foods had increased its offer to $8.55 billion. 
On September 23, 2020, Pilgrim's Pride announced the appointment of Fabio Sandri as CEO, replacing Jayson Penn. Penn went on leave in June following an indictment earlier this year on charges of price-fixing and bid-rigging. In February 2021 Pilgrim's pride agrees to pay a $107 million fine on charges of bid rigging and price fixing. 
On September 17, 2009, JBS USA Holdings, Inc. announced the purchase of 64% of the shares of Pilgrim's Pride. JBS USA Holdings, Inc. is a subsidiary of Brazilian multinational JBS S.A., the largest meat processor in the world, and the largest by revenue. Currently JBS USA Holdings, Inc. owns 78.5% of the company. 
As a result, Pilgrim's Pride closed its corporate offices in Texas and Georgia and moved its headquarters to Greeley, Colorado. This move caused the former headquarters in Pittsburg, Texas, and a location in nearby Mt. Pleasant, Texas, to cut employment by a total of 160 people. Other locations which lost jobs included sites in Atlanta, Dallas, and Broadway, Virginia. 
As of 31 December 2016, Turkish population is 79,814,871 of which 23.7% are between 0-14, 68% are between 15-64 and 8.3% are older than 65 years old. Life expectancy at birth for men is 75.3 and for women is 80.7 years. Maternal mortality ratio has decreased from 23 to 16 per 100,000 live births between the years 2010 to 2015. According to the data from 2015, Under-five mortality and infant mortality rates per 1000 live births are 13.5 and 11.6. 
Healthcare in Turkey is majorly provided by Ministry of Health and some private health institutions. In 2003 with the Health Transformation Programme, the social security system is converged and now called 'The General Health Insurance Scheme'. 
According to the WHO data between the years 1990 to 2015, Maternal Mortality Ratio in Turkey has decreased from 57 to 16 in 10 years. In 2010, Turkey was nearly on par with some of the other OECD countries such as South Korea and Hungary and had a lower maternal mortality ratio than United States. 
Turkey's U5MR in 2007 has reduced by 72% over 1990 levels, while in the world the total reduction was %26.9 between 1990 and 2007. In 2010, U5MR in Turkey was highest compared to other OECD countries. 
NCDs already account for over 70 percent of all mortality in Turkey. Reported mortality from coronary heart disease (CHD) amongst Turkish women is the highest in Europe. Despite the public health programmes already in place, risk factor levels for NCDs are high in Turkey. Clinically significant hypertension exists in at least a third of the adult Turkish population. 
WHO estimates that 42% of men are tobacco smokers. One in 5 adults is obese and just under a quarter of adults have hypertension. 
Air pollution in Turkey is estimated to be a cause of 8% of deaths in 2019. Climate change in Turkey may impact health, for example due to increased heatwaves. 
According to the recent 'WHO vaccine-preventable diseases: monitoring system' reported cases for Diphtheria were 0, Measles were 9, Rubella were 7, Mumps were 544 and Tetanus(total) were 16 cases in 2016. 
In 2016 it was estimated that 13.2% of the population had diabetes and there is an increasing trend in the prevalence of diabetes. 
"The disease is seen in 20-45 groups. It is estimated that approximately 2,000 people have been treated with this disease in Turkey. Marmara region where the most case report is made to the current. These are followed by Ankara, Izmir, Antalya, Mersin, Adana and Bursa respectively. Foreign nationals who make up about 16 percent of cases are from Ukraine, Moldova and Romania." 
The Turkish Government has taken measures at the international airports, using thermal imaging cameras to check passengers coming from international destinations. 
On 2 November, the Turkish Health Ministry began administering vaccines against H1N1 influenza, starting with health workers. 
After a slow start, the virus spread rapidly in Turkey and the number of cases reached 12,316. First death confirmed on 24 October and death toll reached 627. 
The municipality of Doren is located in the northwest of the Bregenz Forest. It lies about two-thirds on the south side of the Sulzbergstock, which belongs to the Molasse basin, and about one third on Sulzbergstock's north side. 
Doren is a member of the German-Austrian community project Naturpark Nagelfluhkette. The surrounding landscape is characterized by forests, natural monuments, numerous waterways, bogs, and biotopes. 
In 1823, the original church was built according to the plans of the District Office Bregenz. Its consecration took place in 1826, and in 1853 it was made the parish church. 
Reconnection to Learning, better known as the Bundy Report, was a proposal to decentralize New York City schools in the late 1960s. 
The movie involves a group of Nigerian prostitutes who are deported from Italy. When they return to Lagos, they resort to violent crime and exploitation to make money. 
Further programs include AYS.  AYS program handles Pre-K (3-5) children in a structured early childhood development program.  AYS also provides before school and after-school care for half and full day kindergarten students.  AYS programs are provided at extra cost. 
The Early Childhood Special Education Preschool is housed at Wyandotte School as part of the public school system. It is developed for children ages three to five with identified special needs. 
The Wyandotte Youth Support Academy, which is funded by Lilly Endowment, offers elementary, middle school students, and parents an educational alternative to out-of-school suspension. W.Y.S.A. provides the students with education in character values, individualized instruction, and computer based education. W.Y.S.A. is designed to reduce the numbers of out-of-school suspensions, and to improve overall student achievement while addressing student disciplinary problems. 
Arvid Wittenberg combined military skills with a hard and cruel treatment of enemies, which made him hated amongst the Poles. 
In 1657, after Arvid Wittenberg had died in Polish custody, his son Leonard Johan Wittenberg (born 1646) was accommodated as a ward by Arvid's friend, Carl Gustaf Wrangel. In the summer of 1673, Leonard Johan married Wrangel's daughter Polidora Christiana. Arvid Wittenberg was also the father of Beata Magdalena Wittenberg. 
He was Secretary General of the World Psychiatric Association from 1989 to 1995 and President of the World Psychiatric Association from 1999 to 2001. 
This biographical article related to medicine in Spain is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
India came fourth overall in the medals table, behind Australia, England and Canada, repeating the feat at the 2006 Commonwealth Games. India was also the host nation for the 2010 Commonwealth Games, which was held at Delhi, India's Capital. 
The Propagation of Christmas trees is the series of procedures carried out to grow new Christmas trees.  
Many different species of evergreen trees are used for Christmas trees. The most common of these species are classified in the four genera: pines, spruces, firs, and cypress. Christmas trees can be grown from seed or from root cuttings. 
The selection of the correct seed for a specific environment and the proper preparation of the seeds prior to planting are necessary to ensure germination and survival of the seedling. 
Unlike most garden seeds, conifer seeds require shade and cool conditions to germinate. This can be accomplished by placing a thick layer of mulch over the seeded tree bed and erecting a canopy over it to reduce direct sunlight. This simulates the conditions where the seeds would typically germinate naturally. 
Some species of Christmas trees can only be propagated by root cuttings because they do not produce viable seeds because they are sterile inter-generic hybrids. These cuttings are taken from an existing tree, thus the new trees are clones of the original tree. The Blue Ice cypress, the Leyland cypress, and the Carolina Sapphire cypress are all tree species that must be propagated in this manner. 
Elections were held in the Australian state of Queensland on 1 June 1963 to elect the 78 members of the state's Legislative Assembly. 
The major parties contesting the election were the Country Party led by Premier Frank Nicklin, the Liberal Party led by Alan Munro, the Labor Party led by Jack Duggan and the Queensland Labor Party led by Paul Hilton. The Country and Liberal parties governed in coalition. 
This election marked the return of preferential voting after first past the post voting had been used for elections from 1944 to 1960. 
There are several road crossings and a railroad bridge crossing over Swale Brook. A number of industries also historically operated near the stream. The stream's watershed is designated as a Coldwater Fishery and a Migratory Fishery and the stream itself has a high level of fish diversity. 
Swale Brook is not designated as an impaired waterbody. The Tunkhannock Area School District once applied for and/or received a permit to discharge stormwater into the stream during construction activities. 
The surficial geology in the vicinity of the lower and middle reaches of Swale Brook consists of alluvium, Wisconsinan Outwash, Wisconsinan Ice-Contact Stratified Drift, and alluvial terrace. In the upper reaches, the surficial geology near the stream consists of a till known as Wisconsinan Till. 
A pond known as Cruver Pond is located at the headwaters of Swale Brook. There are several road crossings along the stream's course. Additionally, the stream crosses a railroad bridge. 
Swale Brook was entered into the Geographic Names Information System on August 2, 1979. Its identifier in the Geographic Names Information System is 1189122. The stream is also known as Quaker Swamp Brook. This variant name appears in Israel C. White's 1883 book The geology of the North Branch Susquehanna River Region in the six counties of Wyoming, Lackawanna, Luzerne, Columbia, Montour and Northumberland. 
By the middle of the 19th century, a tannery had been built on Swale Brook. By 1888, a mill had been constructed on the stream in Tunkhannock. It produced wooden butter pails and tubs, shingles, and cider. In 1902, wood from a covered bridge damaged by flooding was processed at the mill. 
A steam-powered electric plant operated in the vicinity of Swale Brook until 1903. Shortly before 1906, a canning factory on the stream closed; in that year the Pennsylvania Witch Hazel Company opened at the site. Swale Brook was impacted by flooding during Hurricane Agnes in 1972. It also experienced flooding in 2011. The Federal Emergency Management Agency once purchased some homes along the stream as part of a buyout program. 
The drainage basin of Swale Brook is designated as a Coldwater Fishery and a Migratory Fishery. The stream has a very high level of fish diversity and has been described as "packed with fish diversity". At least ten fish species of fish have been observed in the stream, including eastern blacknose dace, common shiners, yellow bullheads, and the rare brook stickleback. 
Knowlton was signed by the BC Lions on April 27, 2006. In his first year in (2006), he had 1 interception, 8 tackles and 14 special team tackles in 15 games. Knowlton helped BC win the 2006 Grey Cup. He spent 2 seasons with the Lions receiving additional playing time in his second season with the club. 
This biographical article relating to a Canadian football defensive back is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mohammed Abdalas (born 26 October 1986) is a retired Danish-Moroccan professional footballer who played as a midfielder. He is currently the manager of Fremad Amager U19. 
This biographical article related to association football in Denmark, about a midfielder, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bradford Northern were a motorcycle speedway team based at Odsal Stadium, in Odsal, Bradford, from 1970 to 1973. 
In June 1970, halfway through the Division Two season, promoters Les Whaley, Mike Parker and Bill Bridgett moved the Nelson Admirals side across the Pennines to Bradford to resurrect speedway at Odsal as Bradford Northern. The team spent three years in the British League Division Two. 
Bussey was born in 1757 on a farm in what is today Canton, Massachusetts, before it separated from Stoughton. He received only a basic education. After serving in the American Revolutionary War, Bussey moved to Dedham, Massachusetts. He married Judith Gay of Dedham in 1780. 
Bussey owned land in what is now the Forest Hills area of Jamaica Plain. In 1800, he inherited additional land from fellow patriot Eleazer Weld and further enlarged his estate between 1806 and 1837 by acquiring and consolidating various farms that had been established as early as the seventeenth century. His estate was known as "Woodland Hill". Bussey wrote an autobiography. He died in 1842. 
In 1806, at the age of 49, he retired as one of the richest men in New England to a life raising Merino sheep on a 300 acre farm in Roxbury. On his estate, which featured wallpaper views of Paris and French furniture, Bussey practiced scientific farming. 
He left retirement at the age of 62 to return to Dedham where he purchased the Norfolk Cotton Manufacturing Company on Maverick Street along Mother Brook.  The War of 1812 had brought ruin to the company, and he purchased it in 1819 for a sum far below cost. Bussey used the wool from his sheep, producing a high caliber product that sold well. 
Bussey also bought vast tracts of land in Maine, and had a number of other business interests, including a private bank. 
Bussey ran for a seat in the Massachusetts Senate in 1807, but lost. He was successful running in 1808 as a Federalist for the Massachusetts House of Representatives in 1808 and 1809. 
Bussey, according to the minister of the Canton church, was to "live of life gilded misery, give to Harvard College what must now amount to a million dollars, because he could not carry it with him; and to the Hollis Street Church a set of the Ten Commandments, because he could not keep them with him." Though he called his mills along Mother Brook to be his most "valuable and productive property]], he did not give any large sums of money to causes in Dedham. 
The village is located in forest steppe, on Khopyorsko-Buzulukskaya Plain, on the bank of the Sukhodol River. 
The London Borough of Hackney, one of the inner London boroughs, has 62 parks, gardens and open spaces within its boundaries, totalling 330 ha. These provide the "green lungs" for leisure activities. Hackney Marshes contain the largest concentration of football pitches in Europe. 
In July 2008, seven Hackney parks won Green Flag awards for Clissold, Springfield, Haggerston and Shoreditch parks, together with London Fields, St John's churchyard and Hackney Downs. St John's was also awarded 'Heritage Green Status'. However, by contrast, Abney Park in Hackney was included in the Heritage at Risk Register in 2009 as one of Britain's historic parks and gardens at risk from neglect and decay. 
Apart from smaller green areas such as sports grounds and smaller gardens, the following are the major open spaces in the Borough: 
The River Lee forms the eastern boundary of the borough.  The towpath is suitable for walking and cyclists. It can be readily accessed from many places, and provides access to Hackney Marshes and the Lee Valley Park. 
Pour de vrai (unofficial English translation: For real) is a comic strip in the series The spiffy adventures of McConey (Les formidables aventures de Lapinot in the original French language), by the popular French cartoonist Lewis Trondheim. It was first released in 1999 as volume 6 in the series. 
This book is a satire of the media world. It mixes stark realism with other elements deeply rooted in fantasy, and scenes of comic relief. 
Arius malabaricus is a species of sea catfish in the family Ariidae. It was described by Francis Day in 1877. It inhabits the marine and brackish waters of India, in the Indian Ocean. 
He was born in Vologda, where his father had been exiled for supporting the radical politician, Szymon Konarski. In 1852, they returned home, to Vilnius, and he began his art studies; first with his father (who was an amateur painter), then with Kanuty Rusiecki. 
In 1880, he married into a noble family and, as part of his dowry, became a landowner in the village of Lunna. Despite being relatively isolated, he continued to exhibit widely throughout Northern Europe and France. He died of lingering health issues from a severe case of pneumonia. 
This biographical article relating to British athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Drayton is mentioned in the Domesday Book as Draituna, meaning place where logs are dragged. However, the area seems to have been settled much earlier. In 1849, Roman pottery was unearthed in the village. 
Between 1432 and 1459 the village was in the possession of Sir John Fastolf, a prominent soldier in the Hundred Years' War who gave his name to Shakespeare's character Sir John Falstaff. He built Drayton Lodge, a red brick 'plaisance', as a lookout overlooking the river Wensum and the main road into Norwich. Its ruins are still visible today. 
On Falstolf's death in 1459, his properties passed into the hands of John Paston. His inheritance soon became the subject of bitter litigation from the Duke of Suffolk, who owned the neighbouring village of Costessey, leading to violent clashes between the two landowners (described in the Paston Letters). 
A resident of the village, Harry Cator, received the Victoria Cross for his gallantry during the First World War. 
A large new housing estate, Thorpe Marriott, was built partially within the parish of Drayton in the late 20th century. 
There are two schools (First and Middle), a village hall, Longdale and King George V playing fields, the Bob Carter Sports and Community Centre and an insurance broker (Drayton Insurance). Drayton also has Low Road Potato Farm which serves the local community and businesses with potatoes and vegetables. R G Carter construction and farms' businesses are located here. 
The parish church of St Margaret's  was built in the 13th century, but was substantially rebuilt in the 19th century, after the tower collapsed in 1850. 
Part of Thorpe Marriott lies within the ward of Drayton North. Thorpe Marriott is a late 1980s early 1990s residential community covering parts of Drayton and Taverham parishes. It has its own shopping centre at Acres Way, including a fish shop, mini Tesco, the Otter public house and an estate agent. 
Thorpe Marriott is served by Trinity Ecumenical Church (Methodist & Anglican) and by St Margaret's Drayton and St Edmund's Taverham, partner churches with local Methodists in the Trinity LEP (Local Ecumenical Partnership). St Margaret's, together with Drayton Methodist and Trinity Church  are members of 'Churches Together in Drayton, Taverham & Thorpe Marriott'. 
Drayton was once served by its own Drayton railway station on the now closed Midland and Great Northern line into Norwich from the north. Today, the track bed forms part of the Marriott's Way, a long distance footpath. 
Zorich made his Broadway debut in 1961 in Becket starring Sir Laurence Olivier and Anthony Quinn.  In 1969 he played a "venal Italian cardinal" in Hadrian VII where he was nominated for a Tony Award. 
Zorich was on the faculty of HB Studio in New York City. He also edited the anthology What Have You Done: The Inside Stories of Auditioning from the Ridiculous to the Sublime. 
Zorich played the Russian Constable in the movie version of Fiddler on the Roof (1971) and a cab dispatcher in the comedy For Pete's Sake (1974). 
Zorich was married to Academy Award winning actress Olympia Dukakis for 56 years, from 1962 until his death. They had three children together. He died at his Manhattan apartment at the age of 93 on January 30, 2018. 
Emmanuil was born in 1891 in the Georgian town of Tbilisi into the family of a Jewish timekeeper employed by a construction company. From 1910, Enchmen studied at the St. Petersburg Psycho-Neurological Institute, receiving a degree in biology in 1914. In 1913 he met Ivan Pavlov. Leon Orbeli recalled that Pavlov told him in 1920 that Enchmen "was my best friend from the year 1913". 
When Pavlov requested to be allowed to emigrate in September 1920, Lenin sent Enchman to see Pavlov. Enchman sent a report to Mikhail Pokrovsky outlining the inadequacy of Pavlov's working circumstances. This was forwarded to Lenin who issued a decree on February 11, 1921, which provided Pavlov with the material aid he needed. 
Enchmen rejoined the Red Army with the rank of Senior Politruk, after the USSR was invaded by Germany. However he was discharged in 1942 for health reasons. On January 16, 1943 he was given the position of a senior scientist at the Biological Section of the Academy of Sciences of the USSR, and on October 13, 1948 he was transferred to the Biophysical Section of the Pavlov Institute of Physiology. 
Firstly Enchman makes a distinction between physical/material and psychological/conscious phenomena: 
Constancio Bernardo (born December 22, 1913 Obando, Philippines) was a Filipino painter and professor. He is known for making the earliest modern geometric abstract paintings in the Philippines and in Southeast Asia. 
The novella focuses on an alternate history of the world where the science and technology are based on the use of golems and, accordingly, the Kabbalistic names embedded in them. Biologists discover that the number of human generations is a constant value and that in about 100 years the human race will die out due to the lack of sperm in the last generation. An unexpected way out of the impasse has yet to be found. 
This article about a science fiction short story (or stories) published in the 2000s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Clivina castanea is a species of ground beetle in the subfamily Scaritinae. It was described by Westwood in 1837. 
Proposition 8 (or The Victims' Bill of Rights), a law enacted by California voters on 8 June 1982 by the initiative process, restricted the rights of convicts and those suspected of crimes and extended the rights of victims. To do so, it amended the California Constitution and ordinary statutes. 
The rights of victims pervade the criminal justice system, encompassing not only the right to restitution from the wrongdoers for financial losses suffered as a result of criminal acts, but also the more basic expectation that persons who commit felonious acts causing injury to innocent victims will be appropriately detained in custody, tried by the courts, and sufficiently punished so that the public safety is protected and encouraged as a goal of highest importance.
The Victims' Bill of Rights made various changes to the California Penal Code and the Welfare and Institutions Code. Victims of crime were granted the right to be notified of, to attend, and to state their views at sentencing and parole hearings. Other provisions related to the defense of insanity and diminished capacity, harsher punishments for recidivists and the limitation of plea bargaining. 
Norwegian Journal of Geology (Norwegian: Norsk Geologisk Tidsskrift) is a quarterly peer-reviewed scientific journal published by the Norwegian Geological Society. The scope of the journal is the geology of Norway, the Arctic, and nearby seas. The journal adopted the Creative Commons Attribution License for published works since volume 94, issue 4 (2014). 
The river is memorialised in a Charles Kickham poem, "She lived beside the Anner at the foot of Slievenamon". 
Ghodbunder Fort is a fort located in Ghodbunder Village, Thane, Maharashtra, India, on the hill just south of the Ulhas River.  It was built by the Portuguese, occupied by the Maratha Empire, and became the East India Company's district headquarters.  The place was called Ghodbunder because it was where the Portuguese used to trade for ghode (horses) with the Arabs. Hence the name Ghodbunder: ghode (horses) & bunder (port). 
In 1530 the Portuguese came to Thane, and they began fortifying the hill area about 1550, but completion of the fort in its current form was in 1730. The Portuguese name for the fort was Cacabe de Tanna.  It was under Portuguese rule until 1737. The Portuguese built a church in the fort that still stands, and is now used as a hotel.  Two angels engraved on the inside wall of the church still remains. The old church can be seen clearly in the background of the courtyard photo. 
In 1818, the British occupied the fort and made it the headquarters of the district administration for the East Indian Company, with a district collector stationed in Thane. 
Although the fort currently lies in ruins, the government of India has started its renovation. The fort itself is under the control of the Archaeological Survey of India (ASI). 
Southsea (Welsh: Glanrafon) is a small formerly industrial village on the Gwenfro river in Broughton community, the county borough of Wrexham, Wales. 
The village came into being at the site of the Broughton Hall Brickworks and Plas Power Colliery. Its Welsh language placename (meaning "the bank of the river", glan yr afon) derives from that of a farm. Its exotic-sounding English name, however, comes from the South Sea Inn which used to stand over the road from the brickworks, and in a room of which the brickworks pay was distributed. 
The Wrexham historian Alfred Neobard Palmer noted that the name Southsea first appeared on the rate books as early as 1786, though also commenting that this was "an absurd name which should never have been adopted, especially as there was an appropriate name ready to hand". 
Southsea's church, All Saints, was formerly its church hall. The previous church, built in 1921 after the original building became unsafe due to mining subsidence, itself became unsafe and was demolished in 1984. 
State elections were held in South Australia on 3 March 1962. All 39 seats in the South Australian House of Assembly were up for election. The incumbent Liberal and Country League led by Premier of South Australia Thomas Playford IV defeated the Australian Labor Party led by Leader of the Opposition Frank Walsh. 
This was the first and only time that a South Australian Government won a tenth consecutive term in office. 
The Playford government, in power since 1938, went into the 1962 elections in a precarious position.  At the time the writs were issued, South Australia was dogged by a massive recession.  This led observers to think that Labor would finally have a chance at power.  Longtime opposition leader Mick O'Halloran had died suddenly in 1960, and Labor was led into the election by former deputy leader Frank Walsh. 
The furore over the 1962 election illustrated how distorted the Playmander had become. By this time some two-thirds of the state's population resided in and around Adelaide, but they only elected one-third of the members of the legislature. In many cases, a rural vote was worth at least double a vote in Adelaide. In one of the more extreme cases, the rural seat of Frome had 4,500 formal votes in 1968, while at the same election the metropolitan seat of Enfield had 42,000 formal votes. 
Klomdee represented Thailand at the 2008 Summer Olympics in Beijing. She competed at the 4x100 metres relay together with Sangwan Jaksunin, Jutamass Thavoncharoen and Nongnuch Sanrat. In their first round heat they placed fifth in a time of 44.38 seconds and was the eleventh time overall out of sixteen participating nations. With this result they failed to qualify for the final. 
This biographical article relating to Thai athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Levin and Zinn were two of the harshest critics of Silber's top-down "industrial" paradigm of university administration, in which Silber equated an institution of higher learning to a car factory. For their opposition, Silber had "merit" pay increases continually denied them.  (Piven eventually left B.U. for a position at City University of New York.) 
By activating the M3 receptors of the parasympathetic nervous system, cevimeline stimulates secretion by the salivary glands, thereby alleviating dry mouth. 
Known side effects include nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, excessive sweating, rash, headache, runny nose, cough, drowsiness, hot flashes, blurred vision, and difficulty sleeping. 
The station was opened on 20 November 2004 along with other 4 stations of the monorail line (all but the southern terminus Timiryazevskaya which was opened 9 days later). It began operation in "excursion mode". Only two trains were operating at the line, the interval between trains was as long as 30 minutes and station hours were from 10:00 to 16:00. The passengers could only board the trains at Ulitsa Sergeya Eisensteina station. 
On 10 January 2008 the line began regular operation serving passengers and allowing them board trains at any station of the line. 
Following his father into the military, he became a cadet in 1822 in the Sagunto regiment, cornet in 1833 in the lancers of Sagunto, and passed into the carabiniers in 1829. When the Carlist agitation began in 1833, he transferred into the cuirassiers. He formed part of the escort that accompanied Don Carlos, the first pretender and brother of Ferdinand VII, to the frontier of Portugal. 
In 1845, he was appointed as a senator, and in 1848 as captain-general of Granada. From 1846 to 1853, he was away from politics, living on his Andalusian estates or traveling abroad.  
Serrano assisted Marshal Leopoldo O'Donnell in the military movements of 1854 and 1856, and was his staunch follower for twelve years. 
O'Donnell appointed Serrano as marshal in 1856 and captain-general of Cuba from 1859 to 1862. Serrano governed that island with success, and helped carry out the war in Santo Domingo. He was the first viceroy to advocate political and financial reforms in the colony. 
On his return to Peninsular Spain, O'Donnell made him Duke of la Torre (Duque de la Torre), Grandee of Spain of the first class, and the 139th Minister of Foreign Affairs, serving from 18 January to 2 March 1863. Serrano risked his life in helping O'Donnell quell the insurrection of 22 June 1866 at Madrid. He was awarded with the Order of the Golden Fleece. 
On landing he signed the manifesto of the revolution with Prim, Topete, Sagasta, Martos and others, and accepted the command of the revolutionary army. He routed the troops of Queen Isabella under the orders of the Marquess of Novaliches at the bridge of Alcolea. The queen fled to France, and Serrano, having entered Madrid, formed a Provisional Government. 
In February 1869, he convoked the Cortes Constituyentes; he was appointed successively as president of the executive, Prime Minister of Spain, and Regent from 3 October 1868 to 18 June 1869. Serrano ruled impartially, respecting the independence of the Cortes and cabinets. He acceded to their selection of Amadeus I of Savoy as king, although he would have preferred Montpensier. 
Serrano again took the title of president of the executive; he tried to form a coalition cabinet, but Cristino Martos and Sagasta soon quarrelled. His next cabinet was presided over by Sagasta. The military and political unrest continued, and at the end of December 1874, the Bourbons were restored by another pronunciamiento. 
During the eleven months he remained in office, Serrano devoted his attention chiefly to the reorganization of finance, the renewal of relations with American and European powers, and the suppression of revolt.  
He died in Madrid on 25 November/26 November 1885, twenty-four hours after Alfonso XII, son of Isabella II, and purportedly, her husband and cousin Francis, although Alfonso's true biological paternity is uncertain.[n. 2] 
Perianal hematoma is a hematoma located in, or on the border of the anus. It is sometimes inappropriately referred to as an external hemorrhoid. 
The symptoms of a perianal hematoma can present over a short period of time. Pain, varying from mild to severe, will occur as the skin surrounding the rupture expands due to pressure. This pain will usually last even after the blood has clotted, and may continue for two to four days.[citation needed] 
Perianal hematoma are caused by the rupture of a small vein that drains blood from the anus. This rupture may be the result of forceful or strained bowel movement, anal sex or caused by heavy lifting, coughing or straining. Once the rupture has formed, blood quickly pools within a few hours and, if left untreated, forms a clot.[citation needed] 
Ghana Must Go is a 2016 Ghana-Nigerian romantic comedy film, directed by Frank Rajah Arase. It stars Yvonne Okoro, Blossom Chukwujekwu and Nkem Owoh. The film tells a story of two lovers of different countries on origin, and the challenges they faced especially from parents after disclosing their intention of getting married. This is the second film from Desamour Company, since Contract (2012 film) The film was screened privately at Filmhouse Cinemas, Surulere in May 2016. 
Yvonne Chinyere Anoruo of Olisa tv praised the acting of the main characters in the film. However, she noted that the film incorrectly tried to place Ghana as more developed and enlightened than Nigeria. It concluded its review by saying the film was "very entertaining and enlightening even with its candid bites into history. So pause from worrying about the flailing economy and notorious power failure of the recent days and go calm your mind". 
Andrew Oke of cinema review gave credit to the acting of the main character, but noted that the movie was poorly produced and managed. The movie in review was likened to a pot of soup that had all the necessary ingredients but came out poor because it was not done with the touch of an expert. 
Chidumga Izuzu of Pulse Nigeria summarized her review by stating that the film "is a well-made movie with often very funny scenes". 
 The Queen's Birthday Honours were announced on 19 June 2000 to celebrate the Queen's Official Birthday in The United Kingdom, Australia (12 June), New Zealand (13 June), Barbados, The Bahamas, Grenada, Papua New Guinea, Tuvalu, Saint Lucia, and Belize, 
The recipients of honours are displayed or referred to as they were styled before their new honour and arranged first by country, honour and where appropriate by rank (Knight Grand Cross, Knight Commander etc.) then division (Military, Civil, Overseas or Police list). 
Bangor Base is a census-designated place (CDP) in Kitsap County, Washington, within U.S. Naval Base Kitsap on the Kitsap Peninsula. Its population was 6,054 at the 2010 census. 
At the 2000 census, there were 7,253 people, 1,282 households, and 1,275 families in the CDP. The population density is 657.1/mi2 (253.7/km2). There were 1,316 housing units at an average density of 46.0/km2 (119.2/mi2). The racial makeup of the CDP was 76.7% White, 8.1% African American, 1.3% Native American, 4.7% Asian, 0.8% Pacific Islander, 3.9% from other races, and 4.6% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 10.2% of the population. 
Of the 1,282 households 79.8% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 93.4% were married couples living together, 4.4% had a female householder with no husband present, and 0.5% were non-families. 0.4% of households were made up of individuals. The average household size was 3.55 and the average family size was 3.54. 
The age distribution was 27.5% under the age of 18, 23.4% from 18 to 24, 47.1% from 25 to 44, 2.0% from 45 to 64, and 0.1% 65 or older. The median age was 25 years. For every 100 females, there were 198.0 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 263.1 males. 
The median income for a household in the CDP was $32,246, and the median family income  was $32,105. Males had a median income of $28,856 versus $21,000 for females. The per capita income in the CDP was $16,383. About 8.5% of families and 9.8% of the population were below the poverty line, including 12.4% of those under the age of 18 and none ages 65 or older. 
Search Engine Watch (SEW) provides news and information about search engines and search engine marketing. 
Search Engine Watch was started by Danny Sullivan in 1996. In 1997, Sullivan sold it for an undisclosed amount to MecklerMedia (now WebMediaBrands). In 2005 the website and related Search Engine Strategies conference series were sold to Incisive Media for $43 million. On November 30, 2006, Danny Sullivan left Search Engine Watch, after his resignation announcement on August 29, 2006. Rebecca Lieb was named editor-in-chief the following month. 
Google's Matt Cutts has called Search Engine Watch "a must read." Yahoo's Tim Mayer has said that it is the "most authoritative source on search." 
AEZQ is a non-profit organization owned by the German Medical Association and the National Association of Statutory Health Insurance Physicians. 
It established the German Program for evidence based medical guidelines in the late 90s. Based upon guideline standards from the Scottish Intercollegiate Guideline Network and referring to experiences from the National Guideline Clearinghouse in the US, the agency founded a German Guideline Clearinghouse aiming at best practice in guideline production. 
The organization established the German Clearinghouse for Patient Information in order to promote scientifically based shared decision making in 1999. 
In the field of patient safety AEZQ was one of the first German organisations calling for effective patient safety programs. The agency was co-founder of the German Coalition for Patient Safety. AEZQ established a national network of Critical Incident Reporting Systems. The institution is partner of the international High 5 Project. 
In 2010 the agency set up a Digital Library for physicians and other interested health professionals and lays - the German Medical eLibrary (www.arztbibliothek.de) - for reinforcement of reliable and unbiased knowledge management in healthcare. 
AEZQ entertained the administrative offices of the Guidelines International Network, and of the German Network for Evidence Based Medicine until 2013. It hosts the editorial office of the German Journal for Evidence and Quality in Healthcare ZEFQ. 
Mimudea albiluna is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by George Hampson in 1913. It is found in Colombia. 
Many notable works of fiction are set in London, the capital city of England, and the United Kingdom. 
Pottery in the Indian subcontinent has an ancient history and is one of the most tangible and iconic elements of Indian art. Evidence of pottery has been found in the early settlements of Lahuradewa and later the Indus Valley Civilization. Today, it is a cultural art that is still practiced extensively in Indian subcontinent. Until recent times all Indian pottery has been earthenware, including terracotta. 
Fabric analysis (paste or ceramic analysis) of pottery: is analysis of fabric of pottery (also called paste, clay body or putty) and decorations on the pottery. 
Chronological dating, also called archaeological dating or archaeological chronology, which is of two types absolute dating (carbon, uranium -useful when organic carbon material has been washed away, magnetic dating, etc) and relative dating (commonly applied when absolute methods could not be applied, e.g. by comparing similar artifacts with artifacts of another culture which has been already dated). Some of the commonly used techniques are as follows: 
Mesolithic, also called Middle Stone Age, is an intermediate cultural stage between the Paleolithic (Old Stone Age) which had chipped stone tools and Neolithic (New Stone Age) with polished stone tools. The Mesolithic hunter gatherers had better efficiency than Paleolithic with ability to more diverse range of animal and vegetable food sources. 
Cord-Impressed style pottery belongs to 'Mesolithic' ceramic tradition that developed among Vindhya hunter-gatherers during the Mesolithic period. This ceramic style is also found in later Proto-Neolithic phase in nearby regions. This early type of pottery, found at the site of Lahuradewa, is currently the oldest known pottery tradition in South Asia, dating back to 7,000-6,000 BC. 
Neolithic, also called New Stone Age, is "final stage of cultural evolution or technological development among prehistoric humans. It was characterized by stone tools shaped by polishing or grinding, dependence on domesticated plants or animals, settlement in permanent villages, and the appearance of such crafts as pottery and weaving." 
Amri-Nal culture: Dated to 4th and 3rd millennia BC the dual typesites are Amri in Sindh and Nal in Balochistan in Pakistan. 
Amri, also has non-Harappan phases during 6000 BC to 4000 BC, and later Harappan Phases till 1300 BCE. 
Bhirran culture is likely the oldest pre-Harappan neolithic site dating back to 7570-6200 BCE. The pottery repertoire is very rich and the diagnostic wares of this period included Mud Applique Wares, Incised (Deep and Light), Tan/Chocolate Slipped Wares, Brown-on-Buff Wares, Bichrome Wares (Paintings on the exterior with black and white pigments), Black-on-Red Ware and plain red wares. 
Kunal culture is in  Hisar district of Haryana in India,  has distinct  i.e. local pottery and house styles. Hoard, which is a pot containing gold-leaf, silver ornaments and beads of semi-precious stones indicate contact and trade with Harappan culture. Earliest phase is dated to 4000 BC, it is older than Early-Harappan site of Rehman Dheri which was dated to  3300 BC. 
The earliest site of this culture is Kunal (4000 BCE) in Haryana which is older than Rehman Dheri (3300 BCE). The type site, the first excavated site of this type of culture is Kot Diji. Rehman Dheri, which was considered oldest example of this culture, is now the second oldest example of this culture after Kunal was excavated and found to be older than Rehman Dher with similar older cultural artifacts then the Rehman Dheri. 
Sothi-Siswal is the site of a Pre-Indus Valley Civilisation settlement dating to as early as 4600 BCE. Sothi culture may be as early as 4600 BCE, while the earliest Siswal A layer is dated 3800-3200 BCE, and is equivalent to the Middle and Upper layers of Sothi. Sothi culture precedes Siswal culture considerably, and should be seen as the earlier tradition. 
Indus Valley Civilization has an ancient tradition of pottery making. Though the origin of pottery in India can be traced back to the much earlier Mesolithic age, with coarse handmade pottery - bowls, jars, vessels - in various colors such as red, orange, brown, black and cream. During the Indus Valley Civilization, there is proof of pottery being constructed in two ways, handmade and wheel-made. 
Damb-Sadat culture: Based on the pottery found here, it is classified as a separate archaeological culture / subculture of Indus Valley Civilization.  
The type site is Harappa. This phase has been found at numerous other sites, all of which have earlier much older indigenous cultural phases, example of those sites include Birrana, Rakhigarhi, Kunal,Siswal in Haryana in India; Sothi in Rajasthan in India; Mehrgarh and Amri in Pakistan. 
Cemetery H culture in Punjab and Jhukar and Jhangar culture in Sindh flourished during this phase. Rangpur culture in Gujarat India was also contemporaneous with this phase of IVC, which had distinct cultural characteristics, and traded with IVC cultures. 
Bara culture: Dated to  2000 BCE in doab between Yamuna and Sutlej rivers near Shivalik ranges of lower Himalayas, this cultures area corresponds to modern-day Punjab, Haryana and Western Uttar Pradesh in North India. 
Jhukar Phase was a Late Bronze Age culture that existed in the lower Indus Valley, i.e. Sindh, during the 2nd millennium BC. Named after the archaeological type site Jhukar in Sindh, it was a regional form of the Late Harappan Culture, following the mature, urban phase of the civilization. 
Jhukar phase was followed by the Jhangar Phase, which is a non-urban culture, characterised by "crude handmade pottery" and "campsites of a population which was nomadic and mainly pastoralist," and is dated to approximately the late second millennium BCE and early first millennium BCE. In Sindh, urban growth began again after approximately 500 BCE. 
Together with the Gandhara grave culture and the Ochre Coloured Pottery culture, the Cemetery H culture is considered by some scholars as a factor in the formation of the Vedic civilization. 
Wilhelm Rau (1972) has examined the references to pottery in Vedic texts like the Black Yajur Veda and the Taittiriya Samhita. According to his study, Vedic pottery is for example hand-made and unpainted. According to Kuzmina (1983), Vedic pottery that matches Willhelm's Rau description cannot be found in Asia Minor and Central Asia, though the pottery of Andronovo culture is similar in some respects. 
The culture reached the Gangetic plain in the early 2nd millennium. Recently, the Archaeological Survey of India discovered copper axes and some pieces of pottery in its excavation at the Saharanpur district of Uttar Pradesh. The Ochre Coloured Pottery culture has the potential to be called a proper civilisation (e.g., the North Indian Ochre civilisation) like the Harrapan civilisation, but is termed only as a culture pending further discoveries. 
The Red Polished Ware (RPW) is found in great quantities in Gujarat, especially in the Kathiawar region. Commonly, it consist of domestic forms like cooking pots, and it dates started from 300 BCE and lasted till 1000 CE. 
But this type of ware also is widely distributed in other places in India. It is found at Baroda, Timberva (Surat), Vadnagar, Vala, Prabhas, Sutrapada, Bhandaria, and many other places. The use of this pottery continued for many centuries. 
Red Polished Ware was first identified in 1953 by B. Subbarao. According to him, a "high degree of finish led to consider it as an imported ware or at least an imitation of the Roman Samian Ware". 
But in 1966 S. R. Rao in his report on Amreli rejected this possibility of a Roman influence. He insisted on an indigenous origin as none of the forms shared the shapes of Roman prototype. He presented a broad variety of vessel types consisting of clay suitable to that definition. Instead he referred to a similarity of vessels of Black Ware with polished surface [Black Polished ware] from the same site noted in layers beyond the first occurrence of RPW. 
According to Heidrun Schenk, the pottery defined as RPW consists of two very distinct functional groups. Thus, the subject needs more precise classification and dating. 
The other group are the very specialized types of the 'sprinkler' and 'spouted' water jars, that often go together. This special group is widely found in the eastern region of the Indian Ocean, throughout the South Asian subcontinent and South East Asia with many different fabrics. This group represents a later development continuing well into the Middle Ages. 
In particular, in Tissamaharama, in the Southern Province of Sri Lanka, a good stratigraphy is found. 
Early Red Polished Ware is often associated with the  Northern Black Polished ware (NBP), and goes back to 3rd century BC. 
Jorwe culture was a Chalcolithic archaeological culture which existed in large areas of what is now Maharashtra state in Western India, and also reached north into the Malwa region of Madhya Pradesh. It is named after the type site of Jorwe.  The early phase of the culture is dated to c. 1400-1000 BCE, while the late phase is dated to c. 1000-700 BCE. 
The phase of glazed pottery started in the 13th century AD, when Turkic rulers encouraged potters from Persia, Central Asia and elsewhere to settle in present-day Northern India. Glazed pottery of Persian models with Indian designs, dating back to the Sultanate period, has been found in Gujarat and Maharashtra. 
Over time India's simple style of molding clay went into an evolution. A number of distinct styles emerged from this simple style. Some of the most popular forms of pottery include unglazed pottery, glazed pottery, terracotta, and papier-mache. 
Unglazed pottery, the oldest form of pottery practiced in India, is of three types. First is paper thin pottery, biscuit-colored pottery decorated with incised patterns. Next is the scraffito technique, the matka pot is polished and painted with red and white slips along with intricate patterns. The third is polished pottery, this type of pottery is strong and deeply incised, and has stylized patterns of arabesques. 
Glazed pottery began in the 12th century AD. This type of pottery often has a white background and has blue and green patterns. Glazed pottery is only practiced in parts of the country. 
The focal center of the district is the old town green, and the brick Victorian Gothic First Congregational Church.  The green is adjacent to a major local road junction, a small rotary where Elm, Pearl, Green, and Central Streets meet.  The district radiates along these streets, with additional properties on the adjacent sections of Woodland Avenue and Heywood Street, which abut on the common and the old cemetery. 
King George Packet was launched in 1802 in Berwick-on-Tweed for the Old Shipping Company of Berwick. She sailed as a packet between Leith and London until 1825 when she became a Leith-based coaster. She then was unlisted for two years, reappearing in 1828 with new owners. She sailed between London and the Continent and was last listed in 1833. 
Note: Pos = Position; G = Games played; AB = At bats; H = Hits; Avg. = Batting average; HR = Home runs; RBI = Runs batted in 
Note: G = Games played; AB = At bats; H = Hits; Avg. = Batting average; HR = Home runs; RBI = Runs batted in 
Note: G = Games pitched; IP = Innings pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
Note: G = Games pitched; IP = Innings pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
Note: G = Games pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; SV = Saves; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
Rochdale is a seat represented in the House of Commons of the UK Parliament. It has elected one Member of Parliament (MP) since its 1832 creation.[n 1][n 2] 
The constituency is represented by Tony Lloyd of the Labour Party. He was first elected MP for this seat in 2017; previously, he had been the MP for Stretford and then Manchester Central from 1983 until his resignation from Parliament in 2012. 
As there were no township boundaries in 1832, the original constituency was defined as a circular area in a radius of three-quarters of a mile from the old market place. In 1868 the boundary was extended to include Wardleworth, Spotland, Wuerdle, Belfield, Newbold, Buersill, and Marland. 
Rochdale was one of the constituencies created by the Reform Act of 1832, and has been a Labour/Liberal Democrat marginal for many years, although it was held by the Conservatives for part of the 1950s, until a 1958 by-election. 
It was held for two decades by Cyril Smith, first of the Liberal Party and then of the Liberal Democrats. He won a by-election in 1972, taking the seat from Labour, and held it until his retirement in 1992. Since Smith's death it emerged Smith was a serial child abuser. 
After Smith's retirement, contests have been tighter. The Liberal Democrats held the seat, with Liz Lynne at the 1992 general election, only to lose to Labour's Lorna Fitzsimons at the 1997 election. However, the Liberal Democrats regained the seat at the 2005 election, with Paul Rowen. 
The constituency is one of two covering the Metropolitan Borough of Rochdale. It contains most of the town of Rochdale itself as well as Littleborough, Wardle and some of the surrounding rural area. 
The Times Guide to the House of Commons 2010 reported that based on the notional 2005 result on the new boundaries the Labour vote had fallen by 4.5% and the Liberal Democrat vote had fallen by 6.1%, while the Conservative voteshare increased by 7.6%.  
A General Election was due to take place by the end of 1915. By the summer of 1914, the following candidates had been adopted to contest that election. Due to the outbreak of war, the election never took place. 
Married to the Mob is a 1988 American crime comedy film directed by Jonathan Demme, and starring Michelle Pfeiffer, Matthew Modine, Dean Stockwell, Mercedes Ruehl, and Alec Baldwin. Pfeiffer plays Angela de Marco, a gangster's widow from Brooklyn, opposite Modine as the undercover FBI agent assigned the task of investigating her mafia connections.  
In addition, short cameo appearances include the film's director, Jonathan Demme, as a man getting off an elevator in Miami, and the film's music supervisor, Gary Goetzman, as the guy playing piano when the mobsters gather at the "King's Roost" restaurant. 
Jonathan Demme's direction was praised for its idiosyncrasy. The New York Times called him "American cinema's king of amusing artifacts: blinding bric-a-brac, the junkiest of jewelry, costumes so frightening they take your breath away." The Washington Post wrote that Demme "has nailed one with this playful, but dangerous, gangster farce." 
The acting performances were widely acclaimed, especially that of Michelle Pfeiffer in a star-making turn, "her best performance to date." Richard Corliss of Time wrote that Pfeiffer was the "emotional anchor to his [Demme's] vertiginous sight gags." Variety claimed the "enormous cast is a total delight, starting with Pfeiffer." The Washington Post called Pfeiffer a "deft comedian... It's her movie, and she graces it." Matthew Modine was "winning", according to Variety. 
Giuliana P. Davidoff is an American mathematician specializing in number theory and expander graphs. She is the Robert L. Rooke Professor of Mathematics and the chair of mathematics and statistics at Mount Holyoke College. 
Davidoff is a graduate of Rollins College. She completed her Ph.D. in 1984 at New York University, with Peter Sarnak as her doctoral advisor; her dissertation was Statistical Properties of Certain Exponential Sums. 
Born and raised in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, Diemer was working as an accountant at Fleer in 1926 when the company president sought to cut costs by making their own gum base. The company's founder, Frank Henry Fleer, had previously made a batch of bubble gum in 1906 which he called "Blibber Blubber", but it was too sticky and easily broke. Ultimately, the "Bubble Gum" used nowadays was eventually invented in 1906,[citation needed] in Wisconsin and has remained his greatest achievement. 
Although an accountant by trade, Diemer liked to experiment with gum recipes in his spare time. In doing so, he accidentally stumbled upon a unique recipe. The gum was pink because it was the only food coloring in the factory, which is the reason most bubble gum today is pink. 
Compared to standard chewing gum, the gum was less sticky, would not stick to the face, and yet stretched more easily. Diemer saw the possibilities, and using a salt water taffy wrapping machine, wrapped one hundred pieces of his creation to test market in a local mom-and-pop candy store. Priced at one penny a piece, the gum sold out in one day. 
Fleer began marketing the new gum as "Dubble Bubble" and Diemer himself taught salesmen how to blow bubbles as a selling point for the gum, helping them to demonstrate how Dubble Bubble differed from all other chewing gums. Sold at the price of one cent a piece, sales of Dubble Bubble surpassed US$1.5 million in the first year. However, Diemer did not patent his invention and competition soon arose as bubble gum became a popular and inexpensive treat during the Great Depression. 
Diemer died of congestive heart failure in Lancaster, Pennsylvania, on his 94th birthday. Saturday Night Live joked that his body was found stuck under a movie theatre seat. 
The 1988 Big East Baseball Tournament was held at Muzzy Field in Bristol, Connecticut. This was the fourth Big East baseball tournament, and was won by the St. John's Redmen. As a result, St. John's earned the Big East Conference's automatic bid to the 1988 NCAA Division I Baseball Tournament. This was the Redmen's third tournament championship in the first four. 
The 1988 Big East baseball tournament was a 4 team double elimination tournament. The top two teams from each division, based on conference winning percentage only, earned berths in the tournament. Each division winner played the opposite division's runner up in the first round. 
Mike Weinberg was the winner of the 1988 Jack Kaiser Award. Weinberg was an outfielder for St. John's. 
This Nodaway County, Missouri state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kirknewton railway station is a railway station serving Kirknewton in West Lothian, Scotland, Opened as Kirknewton in February 1848, the station was renamed Midcalder and Kirknewton after two months, before becoming Midcalder in 1855. The full circle was finally completed 127 years later in May 1982 when the name reverted to Kirknewton. This was to distinguish it from Kirknewton station near Mindrum on the NER Cornhill Branch. 
The station lies on the Edinburgh branch of the West Coast Main Line, although it is not served by main line express services - it is served by commuter services on the Shotts Line from Glasgow Central to Edinburgh Waverley via Shotts. It is managed by Abellio ScotRail. 
There is a limited service to/from North Berwick each day (except Sundays) and to Ayr via Carstairs, Glasgow Central and Kilwinning.  This is operated by a Class 380 EMU. 
As this station is on the Edinburgh branch of the  West Coast Main Line; a variety of Avanti West Coast, CrossCountry, London North Eastern Railway and TransPennine Express trains pass through without stopping. 
Time Will Reveal is the fourth studio album by the American West Coast hip hop group Above the Law. Released in 1996 by Tommy Boy Records, it was the group's first record after leaving Ruthless Records following the death of member Eazy-E. The group's former labelmates Kokane and MC Ren made guest appearances on the record, along with Enuff, Daddy Cool and Kid Frost. Time Will Reveal peaked at number 16 on the Top R&B/Hip-Hop Albums and number 80 on the Billboard 200. 
Vijay Kumar (born Vijay Kumar Makol) is a British-Indian author, film director and actor. In 2018 he published an autobiography chronicling his friendship with Dev Anand titled Dev Saab: A Journey with the Legend Dev Anand. 
Having started in his early days as an actor in theatre productions, Vijay appeared in a number of feature films in Bollywood, such as: Gangster, Main Solah Baras Ki, Master, King of Bollywood and Love U Mr Kalakaar. 
Vijay Kumar was born in New Delhi, India in 1958. His birth name Vijay Makol, was changed to Vijay Kumar for his acting career. He debuted in the hit TV series Dekh Bhai Dekh. Vijay moved to Liverpool, UK at the age of 16 with his family and attended Cowley International College. Vijay returned to Mumbai, India in his early 20's with the ambition of breaking into Bollywood. 
Vijay published his first book, Dev Saab, A Journey with the legend Dev Anand in 2018, recounting his friendship and many adventures with Indian film industry legend, Dev Anand. Vijay launched the book for the U.K. territory alongside his wife Geeta on BBC Asian Network. The book was launched in Mumbai, India, by Suneil Anand, Dev Anand's son. Vijay is currently working on his second book, When Rhea Meets Jessica, which is expected to be released in 2020-21. 
Vijay Kumar's family consists of wife Geeta, son Karan, daughter Zinnia Kumar (model, actor and scientist) & son Rohit. 
He was the Vice-President of Clearcom Global Communications Private Limited until 12 October 2013 and is a lifelong member of British Actors Equity Association. In 2018, Vijay oversaw the opening of the Dev Anand wing of the Seksaria hospital in Mumbai, India. 
Absolution is a novel by Olaf Olafsson about the mind of a man haunted by the crime he planned half a century earlier. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
He and CCNV pushed and prodded the District of Columbia, the local churches and temples and mosques, as well as the federal government to open space at night for homeless people, and worked to staff the space that was made available. Through demonstrations, public funerals for people who had frozen to death on DC streets, breaking into public buildings, and fasting, CCNV forced the creation of shelters in Washington and made homelessness a national and international issue. 
Angered that Holy Trinity Parish in Georgetown planned an expensive renovation of that historic church, and maintaining that the money involved should be given instead to the poor, Snyder stood in the middle of the congregation throughout the Sunday Mass for many weeks as a protest, while other congregants knelt or sat during the service as was customary. 
In 1989, Snyder gave a presentation at the American Library Association conference which was published in the journal, Public Libraries. 
A collection of primary source material related to Mitch Snyder is currently under the care of the Special Collections Research Center at The George Washington University.  The materials include diaries, correspondence, legal documents, articles, photographs, and family papers. 
Carib Lumber Ball Park (also known as Charles Vlaun Cricket Field) is a cricket ground located in Philipsburg, Sint Maarten. It is the principal cricket ground in Sint Marteen and has hosted both first-class and List A cricket in West Indian domestic cricket. 
In April 2014, the scoreboard at the ground was seriously damaged by fire, leading to its demolition. It was speculated that the fire was a deliberate act of arson. 
The station consists of one ground-level side platform serving single bi-directional track. There is no station building, but only a shelter on the platform. The station is unattended. 
This Fukui Prefecture railroad station-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Cameron Blues (born 13 April 1998) is a Scottish professional footballer who plays for Greenock Morton, as a midfielder. 
Blues has played for Falkirk, Edinburgh City, Livingston, Brechin City, Berwick Rangers and Greenock Morton. 
Blues began his career with Falkirk, spending time on loan at Edinburgh City before signing for Livingston on a two-year contract in June 2018. He moved on loan to Brechin City in September 2018, to Berwick Rangers in February 2019, and to Greenock Morton in July 2019. After making five appearances for the club in all competitions, the deal was made permanent on 6 September 2019, with Blues signing a contract until the end of the season. 
Blues scored his first-ever goal for the club as they defeated Queens Park in the Scottish League Cup group stage on 13 October 2020. 
This biographical article related to association football in Scotland, about a midfielder born in the 1990s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Raw Power is a weekly heavy metal/rock music television programme, with connections to Raw magazine, and produced by Music Box Ltd, which aired in Britain on ITV from 1990 until 1993. The name was eventually changed to Noisy Mothers which aired Nationwide in 1994 and 1995 and the format of the show changed. The show was axed in late 1995, to make way for an overhaul of scheduling. 
Before the advent of rock-focussed satellite television stations such as MTV2 and Kerrang, heavy metal & rock music in general got very little airplay on British National Network television. Featuring live performances, music videos, interviews and competitions (all with a heavy metal theme) the show aired in the early hours of Saturday mornings (sometime between Midnight and 3:00am), and sought to redress the balance. 
Before Raw magazine got involved, the show was known as The Power Hour, originally presented by Dante Bonutto and Amanda Redington, and later by Alison Craig, Jacky Lynn and Nikki Groocock. It used to be shown from 1985 to 1990 on cable and satellite music channel Music Box, which stopped being a channel on its own to become producer of music shows for major British broadcasters including ITV. 
The theme tune of Raw Power was an edited version of the guitar solo from "Love in an Elevator" by Aerosmith. The show was filmed at The Marquee in London and on various locations across the country, in Europe and the USA. Megadeth and Pantera were also used as theme tunes on Raw Power and Noisy Mothers. 
Christophe Miossec is a French singer and songwriter born in Brest, Brittany, France on December 24, 1964. 
Christophe Miossec was not new to the world of music when he met his first great success. Between 14 and 17, he was in a teenage band, Printemps Noir ("Black Spring"), touring around Brest. 
In 1993, he had a critical meeting with guitarist Guillaume Jouan, which led the two to start working on an album. A year later, they were joined by the guitarist Bruno Leroux. 
In 2011, the eighth album was released.  It is entitled Chansons ordinaires (English: Ordinary Songs), a reference to French writer Georges Perros and his novel-poem Une Vie ordinaire (English: An Ordinary Life). 
Wheat is an important source of carbohydrates. Globally, it is the leading source of vegetable protein in human food, having a protein content of about 13%, which is relatively high compared to other major cereals but relatively low in protein quality for supplying essential amino acids. When eaten as the whole grain, wheat is a source of multiple nutrients and dietary fiber. 
From Asia, wheat continued to spread across Europe and to the Americas in the Columbian exchange. In the British Isles, wheat straw (thatch) was used for roofing in the Bronze Age, and was in common use until the late 19th century. 
Technological advances in soil preparation and seed placement at planting time, use of crop rotation and fertilizers to improve plant growth, and advances in harvesting methods have all combined to promote wheat as a viable crop. When the use of seed drills replaced broadcasting sowing of seed in the 18th century, another great increase in productivity occurred. 
A combine harvester threshes the wheat, crushes the chaff, then blows chaff across the field. The combine loads the threshed wheat onto a truck or trailer while moving 
Wheat has also been the subject of mutation breeding, with the use of gamma, x-rays, ultraviolet light, and sometimes harsh chemicals. The varieties of wheat created through these methods are in the hundreds (going as far back as 1960), more of them being created in higher populated countries such as China. Bread wheat with high grain iron and zinc content has been developed through gamma radiation breeding, and through conventional selection breeding. 
International wheat breeding is led by CIMMYT in Mexico. ICARDA is another major public sector international wheat breeder, but it was forced to relocate from Syria in the Syrian Civil War. 
T. turgidum subsp. polonicum is known for its longer glumes and grains, has been bred into main wheat lines for its grain size effect, and likely has contributed these traits to T. petropavlovskyi and the Portuguese landrace group "Arrancada". 
As with many plants, MADS-box influences flower development, and more specifically, as with other agricultural Poaceae, heavily influences the total weight output at the end of the entire grain growing process. Despite that importance, as of 2021[update] little research has been done into MADS-box and other such spikelet and flower genetics in wheat specifically. 
Because wheat self-pollinates, creating hybrid seed is extremely labor-intensive; the high cost of hybrid wheat seed relative to its moderate benefits have kept farmers from adopting them widely despite nearly 90 years of effort. 
Synthetic hexaploids made by crossing the wild goatgrass wheat ancestor Aegilops tauschii, and various other Aegilops, and various durum wheats are now being deployed, and these increase the genetic diversity of cultivated wheats. 
In ancient times, wheat was often considered a luxury grain because it had lower yield but better taste and digestibility than competitors like rye. In the 19th century, efforts were made to hybridize the two to get a crop with the best traits of both. This produced triticale, a grain with high potential, but fraught with problems relating to fertility and germination. These have mostly been solved, so that in the 20th century millions of acres of triticale are being grown worldwide. 
Stomata (or leaf pores) are involved in both uptake of carbon dioxide gas from the atmosphere and water vapor losses from the leaf due to water transpiration. Basic physiological investigation of these gas exchange processes has yielded valuable carbon isotope based methods that are used for breeding wheat varieties with improved water-use efficiency. These varieties can improve crop productivity in rain-fed dry-land wheat farms. 
For decades the primary genetic modification technique has been non-homologous end joining (NHEJ). However since its introduction, the CRISPR/Cas9 tool has been extensively adopted, for example: 
As of 2021[update] these examples illustrate the rapid deployment and results that CRISPR/Cas9 has shown in wheat disease resistance improvement. 
There are around 20 wheat varieties of 7 species grown throughout the world. In Canada different varieties are blended prior to sale. "Identity preserved" wheat that has been stored and transported separately (at extra cost) usually fetches a higher price. 
Apart from mutant versions of genes selected in antiquity during domestication, there has been more recent deliberate selection of alleles that affect growth characteristics. Some wheat species are diploid, with two sets of chromosomes, but many are stable polyploids, with four sets of chromosomes (tetraploid) or six (hexaploid). 
Hexaploid wheats evolved in farmers' fields. Either domesticated emmer or durum wheat hybridized with yet another wild diploid grass (Aegilops tauschii) to make the hexaploid wheats, spelt wheat and bread wheat. These have three sets of paired chromosomes, three times as many as in diploid wheat. 
 The four wild species of wheat, along with the domesticated varieties einkorn, emmer and spelt, have hulls. This more primitive morphology (in evolutionary terms) consists of toughened glumes that tightly enclose the grains, and (in domesticated wheats) a semi-brittle rachis that breaks easily on threshing. 
The result is that when threshed, the wheat ear breaks up into spikelets. To obtain the grain, further processing, such as milling or pounding, is needed to remove the hulls or husks. Hulled wheats are often stored as spikelets because the toughened glumes give good protection against pests of stored grain. 
In free-threshing (or naked) forms, such as durum wheat and common wheat, the glumes are fragile and the rachis tough. On threshing, the chaff breaks up, releasing the grains.[citation needed] 
There are many botanical classification systems used for wheat species, discussed in a separate article on wheat taxonomy. The name of a wheat species from one information source may not be the name of a wheat species in another. 
The named classes of wheat in English are more or less the same in Canada as in the US, as broadly the same commercial cash crop strains can be found in both. 
Red wheats may need bleaching; therefore, white wheats usually command higher prices than red wheats on the commodities market. 
Raw wheat can be ground into flour or, using hard durum wheat only, can be ground into semolina; germinated and dried creating malt; crushed or cut into cracked wheat; parboiled (or steamed), dried, crushed and de-branned into bulgur also known as groats. If the raw wheat is broken into parts at the mill, as is usually done, the outer husk or bran can be used in several ways. 
Wheat is a major ingredient in such foods as bread, porridge, crackers, biscuits, muesli, pancakes, pasta and noodles, pies, pastries, pizza, semolina, cakes, cookies, muffins, rolls, doughnuts, gravy, beer, vodka, boza (a fermented beverage), and breakfast cereals. 
In manufacturing wheat products, gluten is valuable to impart viscoelastic functional qualities in dough, enabling the preparation of diverse processed foods such as breads, noodles, and pasta that facilitate wheat consumption. 
The most common forms of wheat are white and red wheat. However, other natural forms of wheat exist. Other commercially minor but nutritionally promising species of naturally evolved wheat species include black, yellow and blue wheat. 
While coeliac disease is caused by a reaction to wheat proteins, it is not the same as a wheat allergy. Other diseases triggered by eating wheat are non-coeliac gluten sensitivity (estimated to affect 0.5% to 13% of the general population), gluten ataxia, and dermatitis herpetiformis. 
It has been speculated that FODMAPs present in wheat (mainly fructans) are the cause of non-coeliac gluten sensitivity. As of 2019, reviews have concluded that FODMAPs only explain certain gastrointestinal symptoms, such as bloating, but not the extra-digestive symptoms that people with non-coeliac gluten sensitivity may develop, such as neurological disorders, fibromyalgia, psychological disturbances, and dermatitis. 
The following table shows the nutrient content of wheat and other major staple foods in a raw form on a dry weight basis to account for their different water contents. 
Raw forms of these staples, however, are not edible and cannot be digested. These must be sprouted, or prepared and cooked as appropriate for human consumption. In sprouted or cooked form, the relative nutritional and anti-nutritional contents of each of these staples is remarkably different from that of the raw form, as reported in this table. 
In cooked form, the nutrition value for each staple depends on the cooking method (for example: baking, boiling, steaming, frying, etc.). 
A  raw yellow dent corn B  raw unenriched long-grain white rice C  raw hard red winter wheat D  raw potato with flesh and skin E  raw cassava F  raw green soybeans G  raw sweet potato H  raw sorghum Y  raw yam Z  raw plantains /*  unofficial 
Harvested wheat grain that enters trade is classified according to grain properties for the purposes of the commodity markets. Wheat buyers use these to decide which wheat to buy, as each class has special uses, and producers use them to decide which classes of wheat will be most profitable to cultivate. 
Better seed storage and germination ability (and hence a smaller requirement to retain harvested crop for next year's seed) is another 20th-century technological innovation. In Medieval England, farmers saved one-quarter of their wheat harvest as seed for the next crop, leaving only three-quarters for food and feed consumption. By 1999, the global average seed use of wheat was about 6% of output. 
Several factors are currently slowing the rate of global expansion of wheat production: population growth rates are falling while wheat yields continue to rise. There is evidence, however, that rising temperatures associated with climate change are reducing wheat yield in several locations. In addition, the better economic profitability of other crops such as soybeans and maize, linked with investment in modern genetic technologies, has promoted shifts to other crops. 
In the rapidly developing countries of Asia and Africa, westernization of diets associated with increasing prosperity is leading to growth in per capita demand for wheat at the expense of the other food staples. 
The average annual world farm yield for wheat in 2014 was 3.3 tonnes per hectare (330 grams per square meter). Ireland wheat farms were the most productive in 2014, with a nationwide average of 10.0 tonnes per hectare, followed by the Netherlands (9.2), and Germany, New Zealand and the United Kingdom (each with 8.6). 
Wheat futures are traded on the Chicago Board of Trade, Kansas City Board of Trade, and Minneapolis Grain Exchange, and have delivery dates in March (H), May (K), July (N), September (U), and December (Z). 
Peak wheat is the concept that agricultural production, due to its high use of water and energy inputs, is subject to the same profile as oil and other fossil fuel production.  The central tenet is that a point is reached, the "peak", beyond which agricultural production plateaus and does not grow any further,  and may even go into permanent decline. 
Several systems exist to identify crop stages, with the Feekes and Zadoks scales being the most widely used. Each scale is a standard system which describes successive stages reached by the crop during the agricultural season. 
This article incorporates material from the Citizendium article "Wheat", which is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported License but not under the GFDL. 
Southampton City Primary Care Trust was the NHS primary care trust (PCT) covering the city of Southampton in England.  Established in April 2001, Southampton City was the very first PCT in the country. 
Interbrasil STAR S/A was a Brazilian airline founded in 1994 as a feeder airline to Transbrasil. It ceased activities along with its parent company in 2001. 
On December 4, 2001, following the collapse of its parent company, Interbrasil STAR ceased operations. 
This article about a radio station in North Carolina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
During the 1995 season, Hopson helped the University of Florida Gators to a Southeastern Conference (SEC) championship and an appearance in the 1995 College Football National Championship held at the Fiesta Bowl. 
Hopson coached the Marshall defensive backfield and helped lead them to the NCAA FCS National Championship in 1996 and four-straight Mid-American Conference championships from 1997-2000. In 1999, his unit led the nation in interceptions and finished second in the nation in scoring defense. In 1997 and 1998, the Marshall secondary finished in the top-15 nationally in pass defense and the top-25 nationally in scoring defense, respectively. 
Hopson originally joined the Golden Eagles in 2001 as the Defensive Backs Coach and enjoyed success until his departure in 2003. His secondary led the country with the fewest passing touchdowns allowed and ranked fourth in the nation in pass efficiency defense in 2002. In 2003, they finished first in the C-USA and fifth in the NCAA in pass defense. In all three seasons, Southern Miss ranked in the top-15 nationally in scoring defense. 
Hopson spent the 2004 season at his alma mater, the University of Mississippi, as Defensive Backs Coach. With Hopson in the fold, the Ole Miss pass defense improved from 109th nationally in 2003 to 49th during the 2004 campaign. 
In his final three years at Alcorn, Hopson's Braves won 28 contests, eclipsing the previous three-season high of 23. Additionally, the four-year win total of 32 made the 2015 senior class at Alcorn the winningest in school history. 
Amidst multiple years of team success, Hopson also collected personal accolades while with the Braves. In 2013, he was named a finalist for the Eddie Robinson Award as the FCS Coach of the Year before being named the BOXTOROW National Coach of the Year in 2014. What began in 2012 with upset wins over defending SWAC champion Grambling State University and an undefeated Alabama A&M University culminated in an era of success and championships not seen before in Alcorn State University history. 
Off the field, Hopson set out to overhaul the recruiting and facilities when he arrived at Southern Miss. Over the four-year period, his recruiting classes were consistently ranked at or near the top of the conference. Hopson also fundraised enough money to renovate the locker room, team meeting room, weight room and coaches room and transform them into a state-of-the-art complex. 
As a player at Ole Miss, Hopson earned four letters and received the 1991 John Howard Vaught Award of Excellence. A CoSIDA Academic All-American, Hopson graduated from Ole Miss with a bachelor's degree in business administration. 
While serving as a defensive backs coach with Delta State University, Hopson earned a master's of health in physical education and recreation. 
Steven Isserlis CBE (born 19 December 1958) is a British cellist. He is distinguished for his diverse repertoire, distinctive sound deployed with his use of gut strings and command of phrasing. 
He went to the City of London School, which he left at the age of 14 to move to Scotland to study under the tutelage of Jane Cowan. From 1976 to 1978 Isserlis studied at the Oberlin Conservatory of Music with Richard Kapuscinski. Ever since his youth Daniil Shafran has been his cello hero, of whom Isserlis has described how "His vibrato, his phrasing, his rhythm all belonged to a unique whole... He was incapable of playing one note insincerely; his music spoke from the soul." 
He was appointed a Commander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) in 1998, and collected his award with his father, as his mother had died earlier that week. He was awarded the 2000 Robert Schumann Prize of the City of Zwickau. 
 Isobel Lucia Freud (born 17 April 1961), better known as Bella Freud, is a London-based fashion designer. 
Freud was born in London, England. She is the daughter of Bernardine Coverley and artist Lucian Freud, and the great-granddaughter of the inventor of psychoanalysis, Sigmund Freud. Her maternal grandparents were practising Roman Catholics of Irish descent, but her mother was no longer observant, while her father's family were Jewish atheists. She identifies as Jewish. 
Her only full sibling is her sister, writer Esther Freud, who wrote the memoir of their hippie childhood in Morocco, Hideous Kinky. 
Freud was married to journalist James Fox in 2001. They have a son, James "Jimmy" Lux Fox. The couple had separated in 2017. 
Nizhny Byk is located 24 km northeast of Vorobyovka (the district's administrative centre) by road. Mirny is the nearest rural locality. 
Newstalk (formerly NewsTalk 106) is a national independent radio station in Ireland. It is operated by News 106 Limited, a subsidiary of Bauer Media Audio Ireland, and broadcasts under a sound broadcasting contract with the Broadcasting Authority of Ireland. 
Newstalk is Ireland's only commercial all-talk station, broadcasting opinion, analysis, entertainment and sport. 
The rugby pundit, George Hook who presented the daily drive time show Right Hook, retired in 2014, he returned to present High Noon. He was suspended in September 2017 following comments he made on rape. 
Newstalk is primarily known as being a radio station; however, it is also the provider of the only national radio newswire in Ireland. Newstalk provides 'rip and read' copy and audio 24/7, and also provides a live stream of audio news reading every hour. The latter is used mostly by local radio stations after 7 p.m. across Ireland. 
Through the years, distinguished figures in American psychiatry have served as directors of the Psychiatric Institute, including Drs. Ira Van Gieson, Adolph Meyer, August Hoch, Lawrence Kolb, Edward Sachar and Herbert Pardes.[citation needed] The current director is Dr. Jeffrey Lieberman. 
The institute has two buildings: the Herbert Pardes Building at 1051 Riverside Drive was built in 1998 and was designed by Peter Pran and Timothy Johnson of Ellerbe Becket. It is connected by walkway bridges to the high-rise Lawrence G. Kolb Research Laboratory at 50 Haven Avenue at West 168th Street, built in 1983 and designed by Herbert W. Reimer. Their original building at 722 West 168th Street became the Mailman's School of Public Health in 1999. 
The DAF-4 gene encodes for the only type II receptor of TGF-beta signaling pathway in the worm Caenorhabditis elegans, with the ligands Daf-7 or Dbl-1. When binds to the ligand Daf-7, Daf-4 complexed with the type I receptor Daf-1, and activated the Smad Protein Daf-8/14. By contrast, when binds to Dbl-1, Daf-4 complexed with the Sma-6 type I receptor, and activated the Sma-2/3/4. 
Agyneta falcata is a species of sheet weaver spider found in China. It was described by Shu-Qiang Li and Chuan-Dian Zhu in 1995. 
Kaisersesch is a Verbandsgemeinde ("collective municipality") in the district Cochem-Zell, in Rhineland-Palatinate, Germany. The seat of the Verbandsgemeinde is in Kaisersesch. On 1 July 2014 it was expanded with 8 municipalities from the former Verbandsgemeinde Treis-Karden. 
Georges Gault was a tennis player competing for France. He finished runner-up to Max Decugis in the singles final of the Amateur French Championships in 1913. 
This biographical article relating to French tennis is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Century Building, designed by Raeder, Coffin, and Crocker and completed in 1896, was a 10-story Classical Revival historic building in downtown St. Louis, Missouri that was used for offices, retail, and a 1600-seat theatre.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places on October 16, 2002. 
St. Louis' preservationists' next line of defense was the National Trust for Historic Preservation (NTHP). Contacted in 2001, NTHP was initially supportive of preservation efforts for the building. Midwest Trust Director Royce Yeater recommended that an alternative site be chosen for the proposed parking deck, noting that there were "10 underused parking facilities in the 10 blocks surrounding the OPO." 
In 2004, the NTHP changed its stance concerning the project. The NTHP would now provide $6.9 million in gap financing in the form of tax credits for the OPO renovations and parking deck. NTHP  refused to stop the demolition of the Century Building, and was now supporting the very project that preservationists were desperately trying to stop. 
Preservationists around the country signed an on-line petition in a concerted effort to save the Century Building. Richard Moe, president of the NTHP, defended his organization's actions by stating that the demolition of the Century Building was key to revitalizing the area around the OPO. 
The Landmarks Association filed a final lawsuit on October 19, 2004 requesting a temporary restraining order to halt demolition. Their request was ultimately denied, and demolition of the building commenced shortly thereafter. 
Beams and parts of its facade were recovered by the National Building Arts Center.  They're currently stored at the foundation's Sauget foundry. 
Widgiewa was a station on the Tocumwal railway line.  The station opened on 16 September 1884 and closed on 4 May 1975. 
Alejo Noe Gelatini (born 7 August 1983) is an Argentine footballer who plays as a midfielder. He is currently a free agent. 
Self-concealment is a psychological construct defined as "a predisposition to actively conceal from others personal information that one perceives as distressing or negative". Its opposite is self-disclosure. 
The concealed personal information (thoughts, feelings, actions, or events) is highly intimate, negative in valence and has three characteristics: it is a subset of private information, can be consciously accessed, and is actively concealed from others. Self-concealment significantly contributes to negative psychological health. 
Secrets and secret keeping have been a longstanding interest of psychologists and psychotherapists. Jourard's work on self-disclosure and Pennebaker's research on the health benefits of disclosing traumatic events and secrets set the stage for the conceptualization and measurement of self-concealment. 
Individuals with increased inferiority feelings have a higher tendency toward self-concealment, which in turn results in an increase in loneliness and a decrease in happiness. 
Theoretical models offered to explain the consistent finding of negative health effects for self-concealment include: 
Kelly offers a comprehensive review of several explanatory models and the evidence supporting each of them, concluding that a genetic component shared by high self-concealers might make them both more prone to self-conceal and more vulnerable to physical and psychological problems. 
Research studies have focused on the relation of self-concealment to attachment orientations, help seeking and attitudes toward counseling, desire for greater (physical) interpersonal distance, stigma, distress disclosure, lying behavior and authenticity, and psychotherapy process. 
Research also focuses on self-concealment in specific populations: LGBT, multicultural, and adolescents, families, and romantic partners. 
Minority groups employ self-concealment to manage perceived stigma. For example, LGBT people (lesbian, gay, bisexual, trans) people, who are stigmatized (see coming out) for the characteristics inherent to their sexual identities or gender identity, employ self-concealment as a result. 
Self-concealment is observed in African, Asian and Latin American international college students. For African Americans in particular their self-concealment correlates with the degree of their Africentric cultural values. Arab and Middle Eastern people have been documented employing the following identity negotiation strategies: 
Self-concealment strategies can also present in those with sexual paraphilias. Research in the experiences of furries, a stigmatized group, found that they are more likely to self disclose if there are little difference in power between the furry and the individual with whom they are disclosing their identity to. 
In those days, the most famous officials in Wei were He Yan, Deng Yang and Xiahou Xuan. Fu Gu disliked them, distanced himself from them, and chose to associate with Xun Can instead. Although Li Feng was from the same home province as Fu Gu, Fu was on bad terms with him and foresaw that Li would eventually ruin his own reputation. 
After Sima Shi died in Xuchang, Sima Zhao took over his brother's position as the regent of Wei. In an attempt to prevent a transfer of power from Sima Shi to Sima Zhao, the Wei emperor Cao Mao ordered Sima Zhao to remain in Xuchang and let Fu Gu lead the army back to the capital Luoyang. However, Fu Gu and Zhong Hui met up with Sima Zhao, defied Cao Mao's orders, and returned to the capital together. 
Because not all of the original dollar is necessarily spent by the recipient of the transfer payment, the resulting multiplier is likely to be somewhat less than the multiplier of government spending on goods and services. 
Galli-Curci made her operatic debut in 1906 at Trani, as Gilda in Giuseppe Verdi's Rigoletto, and she rapidly became acclaimed throughout Italy for the sweetness and agility of her voice and her captivating musical interpretations. She was seen by many critics as an antidote to the host of squally, verismo-oriented sopranos then populating Italian opera houses. 
She toured widely in Europe, Russia and South America. In 1915, she sang two performances of Lucia di Lammermoor with Enrico Caruso in Buenos Aires. These were to be her only operatic appearances with the great tenor, though they later appeared in concert and made a few recordings together. Galli-Curci and Caruso also acted as godparents for the son of the Sicilian tenor Giulio Crimi. 
Galli-Curci toured extensively throughout her career, including a 1924 Great Britain concert tour (she never sang in an opera there), where she appeared in 20 cities and a tour of Australia a year later. 
On 14 November 1921, while still under contract with the Chicago Opera, Galli-Curci made her debut at the Metropolitan Opera in New York as Violetta in La Traviata, opposite tenor Beniamino Gigli as Alfredo. She was one of the few singers of that era who were contracted to both opera companies simultaneously. Galli-Curci remained at the Met until her retirement from the operatic stage nine years later.  
In 1922, Galli-Curci built an estate in Highmount, New York, which she called "Sul Monte". She summered there for several years until she sold the property in 1937. In the nearby village of Margaretville a theater was erected and named in her honor.  She returned the favor by performing there on its opening night. 
In 2001, researchers Crookes and Recaberen "examined contemporary press reviews after surgery, conducted interviews with colleagues and relatives of the surgeon, and compared the career of Galli-Curci with that of other singers" and determined that her vocal decline was most likely not caused by a surgical injury. 
Other researchers (Marchese-Ragona et al.) have argued that tracheal compression caused by a goiter put an early end to Galli-Curci's career as a coloratura soprano, but it was nerve damage caused during surgery that prevented her from prolonging her career as lyric or dramatic soprano. 
In 1908, Amelita Galli wed an Italian nobleman and painter, the Marchese Luigi Curci, attaching his surname to hers. They divorced in 1920.  The Marchese Curci petitioned the papal council in Rome for an annulment of the marriage in 1922. In 1921, Galli-Curci married Homer Samuels, her accompanist. Their marriage lasted until Samuels' death in 1956. 
Galli-Curci was a student of the Indian meditation and yoga teacher Paramahansa Yogananda. She wrote the foreword to Yogananda's 1929 book Whispers from Eternity. 
Her country estate near Fleischmanns, New York, where she resided from 1922 to 1937, known as Sul Monte, was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 2010. 
Galli-Curci's 1917 recording of Edvard Grieg's Solveig's Song is heard in the Dark Horror, Avoider game 1916 Der Unbekannte Krieg in the Bunker section and is heard at the end of the game. Galli-Curci is honored on the Hollywood Walk of Fame for recording, with a star located at 6121 Hollywood Boulevard. 
In Studio Ghibli's film Grave of the Fireflies, her recording of "Home! Sweet Home!" is played at the end. 
Dan Strugnell (born 30 June 1992) is an English footballer playing as a defender for Gosport Borough. 
The population of Susangerd is more than 120.000 people, and the vast majority of its inhabitants are Khuzestani Arab people. Susangerd is considered among the famous cities of Iran due to Iran-Iraq war and also because of liberation of Susangerd (from the siege of Iraqi forces). 
On July 21, 2021, protests triggered by the severe shortage of water in the region occurred in Susangerd alongside multiple other cities, among them Masjed Soleyman, Izeh, Shushtar and Ahwaz. 
The Blue Rapids baseball team was a minor league baseball team based in Blue Rapids, Kansas. The Blue Rapids team played briefly as members of the Class D level Eastern Kansas League with no team moniker, common in the era. The 1910 season was the only season of play for the league and the Blue Rapids based team. Blue Rapids played home games at Riverside Park. 
"Si Una Vez" is written in the key of D minor and is played in a moderate groove of 84 beats per minute. It incorporates music from several musical instruments, including the piano and guitar. Lyrically, Selena reminiscences her failed relationship and wonders why she ever fell in love with an abusive partner who betrayed and left her, vowing to never allow a man like that back into her life. The lyrics suggest unrequited love and female empowerment. 
The Commemoration of the American Civil War on postage stamps concerns both the actual stamps and covers used during the American Civil War, and the later postage celebrations. The latter include commemorative stamp issues devoted to the actual events and personalities of the war, as well as definitive issues depicting many noteworthy individuals who participated in the era's crucial developments. 
This article follows the convention of the 1995 Civil War commemoration of 20 stamps related to the Civil War; civilian persons of the Civil War have been pictured beginning with the definitive issue for Abraham Lincoln after his assassination. Notable persons who were Civil War participants have been included in this article including inventors, authors, and subsequent U.S. presidents. 
Note: A brief note as to the significance of each subject as it is related to the American Civil War is included by each stamp and cover. 
 In 1861, Postmaster General Montgomery Blair cut off mail service to any state in rebellion. Confederate postage was not recognized by U.S. post offices, and postmasters forwarded mail addressed into the Confederacy to the Dead Letter Office, to be returned to senders.
The Confederacy used U.S. stamps pre-1861 with Roman numerals, provisional stamps and regular issue. 
 Postmaster Reagan placed 8,535 of the nation's 28,586 post offices under his control, and initially all postal business was conducted with U.S. money and postage stamps. Until Confederate stamps became available, some local postmasters issued provisional stamps or marked mail "paid" by hand.
During the Civil War, private sector printers throughout the North developed cultural heroes who complemented and expanded the galaxy of official heroes found on stamps. Patriotic covers honored ordinary middle-class individuals, both civilian and military. Military theme covers also commemorate ordinary citizen soldiers. This "democratizing" in American popular icons contributed to a more explicit democratic nationalism. 
Illustrated stationery reveals the strong emotions generated by the Civil War. In the North envelopes bearing patriotic illustrations appeared even before hostilities broke out. 
Soon after the war began, Southern stationers quickly marketed patriotic envelopes picturing flags, cannons, political leaders, slogans, soldiers, and caricatures, among other war-related themes. 
Union forces began blockading southern ports in April 1861, requiring mail to be carried on blockade runners or routed through foreign posts. Without postal treaties with foreign governments, Confederate letters were carried as private "ship" mail. They were charged the inland rates plus two cents, which was paid to the ship's master. 
The "Gilded generation" born 1822 to 1842, defined the western adventurer of today's imagination. They were the youthful mining 49er in California, the Pony Express rider before and during the Civil War, bringing in Nevada as a state in October 1864. 
As Union troops occupied rebel territory, federal mail service was restored, amounting to almost 500 routes by the end of 1865. Almost half of the post offices in the South had been returned to Federal service by the end of 1866. 
Some groups have seen commemoratives as holding out a romanticized view of America. Others have promoted issues as a part of grander strategies fighting for social and political equality. Commemorative committees, business leaders, and politicians have actively pursued federal postage stamps celebrating regional anniversaries held at battlefields. Others sought stamps honoring military, cultural, and political heroes, such as Robert E. Lee, Susan B. Anthony, and Frederick Douglass. 
Note: Several recent issues are not yet available at Wikimedia Commons for use here. For some, place-holders are provided. For previous images readily available for both commemorative and definitive issues, names are linked to their biographical articles in their Civil War career at each stamp description. Links to states take the reader to the "[state] in the American Civil War" series of articles in Wikipedia. 
Winfield Hancock was featured in the Civil War commemorative sheet of 20. Hancock was the hero general of Gettysburg, subsequently Democratic 1880 nominee for president. 1995 issue. 
The Lee-Jackson stamp of 1937 signified a demonstration of national unity of the New Deal. The Confederate generals were no longer traitors but American war heroes pictured alongside George Washington, William Sherman, and Ulysses S. Grant. 
Raphael Semmes, was featured in the Civil War commemorative sheet of 20. Semmes was a naval commander of the cruiser CSS Alabama and CSS Sumter raiding U.S. commercial shipping in the Pacific and the Atlantic.  1995 issue. 
Stand Watie was featured in the Civil War commemorative sheet of 20. Watie was a Native American general of a Cherokee faction allied with the Confederacy and represented in its Congress. 1995 issue. 
Joseph E. Johnston was featured in the Civil War commemorative sheet of 20. Johnston commanded the western armies for the Confederacy. His strategy was the mirror image of Lee's offensive strategies in the Confederate Offensive-defensive strategy, Johnston emphasized the defensive falling back onto Atlanta.   1995 issue. 
Appomattox surrender followed Confederate evacuation of Petersburg and Richmond. Lee's remnant army was surrounded without supply of food or ammunition. Terms were generous, contributing to the nation's healing following civil war. 1965 issue. 
The Battle of Hampton Roads between the Monitor and Merrimac (Virginia), Battle of Shiloh, Battle of Chancellorsville and Battle of Gettysburg were featured in the Civil War commemorative sheet of 20. 1995 issue. 
In literature the onset of the Civil War occasioned important considerations of nationalism, citizenship and the nature of the American republic. 
Radical social changes involving communications, women's rights, civil rights, states' rights and other issues had already been set in motion before the Civil War, and accelerated through it into succeeding historical eras. 
The Second Wave of Immigration reshaped American society in its diversity and urban numbers leading to an explosion of internal commerce and providing a consumer base for the coming industrial age. At 28 percent, the "Gilded generation" fighting the Civil War included a larger share of immigrants than any other generation in America since colonial times. 
Tides of immigration reinforced the natural population increases to the advantage of the Union on the battlefield. Both German and Irish immigrants formed several ethnic regiments. Both German and Irish immigration have been commemorated in U.S. stamps. 
The 100th anniversary of law creating land-grant colleges and universities was commemorated on November 14, 1962 to coincide with the annual meeting of The Association of State Universities and Land Grant Colleges. The design by Henry K. Bencsath features a lamp of learning against a bas-relief map of the continental United States. 
Throughout the Civil War, efforts continued to develop communications with Europe via telegraph by a trans-Atlantic cable. The first had been laid in 1858 but only functioned three weeks. The initial project was led by Cyrus West Field and the Atlantic Telegraph Company. Efforts continued with much improved technology in 1865 and 1866. A 4-cent commemorative was issued on the 100th anniversary of the first attempt. 1958 issue. 
During the conflict, two additional free-soil states were admitted, which along with Lincoln's reconstruction, moved the country inexorably towards the number for three-fourths states required in a constitutional amendment to abolish slavery by December 1865. 
Inventors contributed to both sides of the conflict, most notably for the Union in fundamentally strategically important venues, enlarging on its material advantages over the Confederacy. 
Prominent authors of the Civil War generation later were commemorated in stamps in view of their important career-long contributions to American literature. Several Transcentendalist authors promoted immediate abolition and war. Some authors served as nurses, or wrote without any direct participation in the conflict. 
 Besides Abraham Lincoln in the United States and Jefferson Davis in the Confederate states, nine U.S. presidents had Civil War experience. 
Abraham Lincoln is perhaps the most commemorated of the Civil War generation on U.S. postage. Pictured here as his statue in the Lincoln Memorial in Washington, DC. 1958 issue. 
 In the 2009 issue of 42-cent Lincoln stamps, Lincoln was pictured in four stages of life: as rail-splitter, as lawyer, as politician, and as president. 2009 issue.
"Lambing Season" is a science fiction short story by American writer Molly Gloss, published in 2002.  It was nominated for the 2003 Hugo Award for Best Short Story as well as the Nebula Award for Best Short Story. 
The story follows Delia, a woman who enjoys the solitude of herding sheep each summer.  Along with her two dogs and flock of sheep she relishes the natural beauty, silence and long walks that come as part of her job.  After one particularly trying evening, she sees a green and yellow flash arc across the sky.  She goes to investigate and finds that an alien spaceship has landed on Earth. 
This article about a science fiction short story (or stories) published in the 2000s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article related to a Victoria (Australia) school is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Inishowen West (Irish: Inis Eoghain Thiar), also called West Inishowen or Innishowen West, is a barony in County Donegal, Republic of Ireland. Baronies were mainly cadastral rather than administrative units. They acquired modest local taxation and spending functions in the 19th century before being superseded by the Local Government (Ireland) Act 1898. 
Between the 9th and 13th centuries Inishowen was divided into three sectors, Aileach, Bredach and Cairrge Brachaidhe (Carraickabraghy) in the west. O'Mulhall (Mulfaal) and O'Hogain are cited as chiefs of Carrichbrack (Carrickbraghy). Inishowen was originally a single barony but was divided by 1851 into East and West. 
Jaya completed her degree at Queensland University of Technology, Brisbane (2006) Bachelor of Fine Arts in Film & Television and her masters at Nanyang Technological University, Singapore (2010) Master in Mass Communication. 
Jaya Rathakrishnan started off as an assistant producer and started specialising in writing and producing with Eaglevision, Mediacorp since 2001. She has since written several screenplays for award-winning television dramas, variety shows and Info-educational shows. 
In 2017, Jaya Rathakrishnan founded Stardust Story, a media firm, and is currently in partnership with theatre director Beatrice Chia-Richmond. Since then, Jaya has written for several popular drama series under Stardust Story including the screenplay for Michael Chiang's Mixed Signals, After Love and Thilaanaa. Both the series, Mixed Signals and Thilaanaa were screened at the Singapore Media Festival 2019. 
In 2017, Jaya took on the role of the executive producer and head writer of BRA, a 13 part series about breast cancer which aired on Channel 5, Mediacorp Singapore. 
In 2018, Jaya wrote the screenplay for Kalaba Kadhala which became one of the most widely watched TV shows on meWATCH, a Singaporean digital video on demand service brand owned by Mediacorp. 
Villa International Airport Maamigili (IATA: VAM, ICAO: VRMV), also known as Maamigili Airport, is an airport in the Maldives. It is located on the island of Maamigili in Alif Dhaal Atoll. 
The airport was developed by Maldivian business tycoon Qasim Ibrahim, who grew up in Maamigili, as a project to develop the infrastructure and facilities of the island. Developed and operated by his company, Villa Group, the airport also opened up direct transportation facilities to two of their flagship resorts located on adjacent islands. 
The opening of the airport coincided with Villa's entry into the aviation industry, the founding of a new airline Villa Air (operating as Flyme), to operate from the airport. 
The airport opened on October 1, 2011 as a domestic airport. In 2013, it was upgraded to international airport standards. 
Villa Airport was downgraded to domestic status by the government for a period of 23 days in August 2014 over "security concerns". 
NXT TakeOver: London was a professional wrestling show and WWE Network event that took place on December 16, 2015. It was produced by WWE, showcasing its NXT brand division, and was streamed live on the WWE Network. The event took place in The SSE Arena in London, England. The eighth NXT TakeOver event, it was the first TakeOver broadcast from outside of the United States, which was the finale of NXT's first tour of the United Kingdom. 
The card comprised five matches. The matches resulted from scripted storylines, where wrestlers portrayed heroes, villains, or less distinguishable characters that built tension and culminated in a wrestling match or series of matches. Results were predetermined by WWE's writers on the NXT brand, while storylines were produced on their weekly television program, NXT. 
Next was the match pitting Apollo Crews against Baron Corbin. Corbin gained the advantage by dropping Crews over the top rope onto the ring steps. Later, Corbin executed "Deep Six" for a near-fall. Crews countered Corbin's "End of Days", then executed an enzuigiri and a standing moonsault for a near-fall. Despite lifting Corbin in preparation for a powerbomb, Corbin grabbed the ropes and escaped, then pinned Crews after the "End of Days" to win the match. 
In the penultimate match, Bayley defending the NXT Women's Championship against Nia Jax. Jax dominated much of the match, countering all of Bayley's attempts of a guillotine choke into repeated leg drops or Samoan drops, but only for near-falls. After much of this, Bayley forced Jax to tap out to a fourth guillotine choke hold to retain the title. 
This page lists Fawlty Towers cast members. The names of the regular cast members link to the pages for the actor and for the Fawlty Towers character. 
There is a small roadside chapel with a belfry in the northern part of the settlement. It was built in the early 20th century. 
One of Kizirian's greatest achievements was his uncovering of the Tet Offensive after studying more than 400 intelligence reports and briefing General Creighton Abrams. According to his obituary, "The warning very likely saved thousands of American and South Vietnamese lives. Like his work in uncovering the Tet Offensive, most of his accomplishments and successes took place behind the scenes." 
John Kizirian grew up on 34 Willow Street in Whitinsville and attended the local Northbridge High School. At an early age, Kizirian worked at a nearby floral shop as a panel setter. In his junior year of high school, Kizirian was on the student council and on February 3, 1944 became Northbridge's first Eagle Scout. However, his high school education was cut short when Kizirian quit school and joined military service. 
John Kizirian joined the United States Navy on May 3, 1945 and was sent to Sampson Air Force Base, New York for boot camp. From there he was sent to San Diego, California to learn to be a pharmacist mate. While he was acquiring his education, World War II ended. He was then sent to a naval hospital in Virginia, then to a medical technology school in Cambridge, Maryland, Maryland where he became a lab technician. 
After serving the navy, Kizirian returned to Whitinsville and remained in the reserves. He worked in the stock room of the Whitin Machine Works. Kizirian desired to return to the military and went to a local navy recruiter. The navy recruiter stated that they can only accept him as a hospital apprentice which Kizirian subsequently refused. He then applied to the Army and got accepted as a sergeant in 1949. 
Kizirian was sent to Fort Dix in New Jersey for training and from there he was sent to Fort Benning, Georgia where he was assigned to the hospital in the laboratory. He was assigned to the laboratory as a non-commissioned officer and was in charge of the laboratory for approximately a year until the Korean War started. 
It was barely daylight and I walked over to where they had him and I said, "Okay, I'll take him to the rear" and pulled out my '45. "Let me take him. Did you guys search him?" And, about that time this guy pulled a grenade out, threw it and killed a couple of my people, so I shot him to death. As soon as he did it, I was shooting, but it was too late. I was furious, of course, about that. 
When Kizirian returned from Korea, he was sent to Special Forces headquarters in Fort Bragg, North Carolina. From there, he was sent to Fort Benning, Georgia to advanced infantry school and then back to Fort Bragg where he became Special Forces team leader. Kizirian became the adjutant of the Special Welfare Center while receiving an education at the University of North Carolina and received his degree from there in 1957. 
When the Vietnam War started, Kizirian was assigned as a senior intelligence advisor to the Vietnamese III Corps until 1968, when he became part of the III Corps Military Intelligence Detachment and senior division of the Reconnaissance Unit till the summer of that year. 
Throughout his time in Vietnam, Kizirian worked closely with General William Westmoreland who was the commander of the Military Assistance Command Vietnam (MACV). As a result of the missions that Kizirian took command of, he was awarded two Purple Hearts and a Distinguished Service Cross. 
He was then appointed as part of the  Army Intelligence, G2, 1st Air Cavalry Division where he served as an assistant. 
In 1968, Kizirian uncovered the Tet Offensive, a military campaign that was launched on January 30, 1968 by forces of the Viet Cong and North Vietnam, after studying more than 400 intelligence reports and subsequently briefing General Creighton Adams. Kizirian's prediction of the 1968 Tet Offensive is considered one of Kizirian's greatest achievements of the war effort. 
Though he did not graduate with his class, Col. Kizirian then attained his high school diploma. After receiving the diploma he studied at the U.S. Army War College where he graduated in 1970. 
In 1980, Kizirian became a defence official in Indonesia returning from a five-year active duty break. He was also the military attache to the Indonesian Republic. He finished his service in Indonesia in 1984 and retired once again. 
John Kizirian worked for the Martin Marietta Aerospace Cooperation for a year and a half. He became a consultant of various intelligence reports drafted at the time of the Iranian Revolution. The company planned to set up several signal intelligence sites in Iran to monitor activity related to the revolution. 
After his military service, Kizirian was invited by Alexander M. Haig to serve in the office of the secretary of defense in the Pentagon. However, he declined the offer due to family health issues. 
John Kizirian died February 26, 2006 at the Holmes Regional Medical Center in Melbourne, Florida. His funeral processions were conducted at St. Paul's Anglican Church in Melbourne and is buried at the Arlington National Cemetery in Arlington, Virginia. 
Kizirian has been married three times. His first wife, Edith Tally, was born in Kansas. They adopted two children, Joanne and John. Edith died of cancer in 1986. Kizirian's second wife Barbara Holman was born in Tennessee and died in 1999. Kizirian's third marriage was with Carol Chandler who was from Georgia. 
John Kizirian, a resident of Hawaii, was inducted into the Hawaii Army Museum Gallery of Heroes where a portrait of him hangs in the gallery. 
In August 2005, Kizirian's niece, Lesley Kissick of Montara, California, wrote a letter to congressman Dave Weldon insisting that Kizirian deserves to be awarded the Medal of Honor. 
The process for his canonization opened and in 1618 he was beatified; Pope Alexander VIII canonized him a saint on 16 October 1690. 
He spent his childhood and adolescence as a shepherd, and as he toiled in the fields remained attentive to the sound of the church bell which rang during the Elevation during the Mass. Paschal was very honest, and once offered to reimburse the owners of crops damaged due to his animals getting loose. 
Those to whom he first mentioned his inclination to a religious life, recommended several richly endowed monasteries, but he answered,"I was born poor and am resolved to die in poverty and penance". 
In 1564 he joined the Reformed Franciscans as a religious brother and commenced his period of novitiate on 2 February before making his profession on 2 February 1565 in Orito at the Saint Joseph convent. He was urged to become an ordained priest but he felt that was not the path for him. But he was once denied the chance to join on the account of his age prompting him to return to his duties as a shepherd before the order had a change of heart and admitted him into their ranks. 
The humble friar never wasted food. The end of each week saw him eat a few boiled vegetables which had been soaked in water with the terrible smelling weed known as wormwood. He often ate scraps from the kitchen. Other austerities included wearing a coat with steel spikes or a patched habit including one tunic lined with rough pig hair designed to cause discomfort. Sometimes he slept out in the cold. 
His tomb in Villarreal became an immediate place of pilgrimage and there were soon miracles that were reported at his tomb.[citation needed] Pope Paul V beatified him on 29 October 1618, and Pope Alexander VIII later canonized him on 16 October 1690. In 1730, an indigenous Guatemalan claimed to have had a vision of a sainted Paschal appearing as a robed skeleton. This event became the basis of the heterodox tradition of San Pascualito. 
He was enlisted in the church's struggle against Modernism, part of which was through increasing devotion towards the Eucharist; Pope Leo XIII proclaimed the saint as the "seraph of the Eucharist" as well as the patron of Eucharistic congresses and affiliated associations. Art often depicts him wearing the Franciscan habit and bearing a monstrance to signify his devotion to the Holy Eucharist. Pope John XXIII named the saint as the patron for the Segorbe diocese on 12 May 1961. 
During the Red Terror, at the time of the Spanish Civil War, his grave was desecrated and anticlerical leftists had his relics burned, though some remained. Those that did were later transferred in the presence of King Juan Carlos I on 12 May 1992. 
This is a list of the 558 MPs or Members of Parliament elected to the 314 constituencies of the Parliament of Great Britain in 1761, the 12th Parliament of Great Britain and their replacements returned at subsequent by-elections, arranged by constituency. 
Montgomery County is included in the Philadelphia-Camden-Wilmington PA-NJ-DE-MD metropolitan statistical area, sometimes expansively known as the Delaware Valley. The county marks part of the Delaware Valley's northern border with the Lehigh Valley region of Pennsylvania. In 2010, Montgomery County was the 51st-wealthiest county in the country by median household income. In 2008, the county was named the 9th Best Place to Raise a Family by Forbes. 
As of the 2020 census, the county was 73.27% White (72.18% White, non-Hispanic), 9.55% Black or African American, 0.22% Native American or Alaskan Native, 7.94% Asian, 0.02% Pacific Islander, and 2.87% some other race; 6.13% were two or more races. 6.36% of the population were Hispanic or Latino of any race. 
As of the 2010 census, the county was 79.0% White non-Hispanic, 8.7% Black or African American, 0.1% Native American or Alaskan Native, and 6.4% Asian (2.1% Indian, 1.7% Korean, 1.2% Chinese, 0.5% Vietnamese, 0.3% Filipino, 0.1% Japanese, 0.6% other Asian); 1.9% were two or more races, and 1.6% were some other race. About 4.3% of the population were Hispanic or Latino. 
Montgomery County is home to large and growing African American, Korean American, Puerto-Rican American, Mexican American, and Indian American populations. The county has the second-largest foreign-born population in the region, after Philadelphia County. 
Of the 286,098 households, 32.00% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 57.20% were married couples living together, 8.80% had a female householder with no husband present, and 30.90% were not families. About 25.60% of all households were made up of individuals, and 9.90% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.54 and the average family size was 3.09. 
In the county, the age distribution was 24.10% under the age of 18, 7.10% from 18 to 24, 30.50% from 25 to 44, 23.40% from 45 to 64, and 14.90% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 38 years. For every 100 females, there were 93.60 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 90.00 males. 
The median income for a household in the county was $60,829, and for a family was $72,183 (these figures had risen to $73,701 and $89,219, respectively, as of a 2007 estimate). Males had a median income of $48,698 versus $35,089 for females. The per capita income for the county was $30,898. About 2.80% of families and 4.40% of the population were below the poverty line, including 4.60% of those under age 18 and 5.10% of those age 65 or over. 
Historically, Montgomery County was a stronghold for the Republican Party.  The county was the only one carried by Barbara Hafer in the 1990 gubernatorial election over the incumbent governor, Bob Casey. However, the Democratic Party has made substantial gains in the county over the last quarter-century and gained the registration edge early in 2008. 
Most county-level offices were held by Republicans until after the 2007 election, when Democrats picked up control of five row offices.  Democrats have also won several elections in the Pennsylvania General Assembly in recent years, including two GOP-leaning State House districts in 2004, the 148th with Mike Gerber and the 153rd with Josh Shapiro.  Today, although the county is very Democratic at the national level, at the state and local level, it is not specifically partisan. 
Montgomery County is governed by a three-person county commission.  The current composition is two Democrats and one Republican.  By law, the county commission must have one member of a minority party represented. 
Under Pennsylvania law, five types of incorporated municipalities are listed: cities, boroughs, townships, home rule municipalities (which can include communities that bear the name "Borough" or "Township") and, in at most two cases, towns. These boroughs, townships, and home rule municipalities are located in Montgomery County: 
Census-designated places are geographical areas designated by the U.S. Census Bureau for the purposes of compiling demographic data. They are not actual jurisdictions under Pennsylvania law. Other unincorporated communities, such as villages, may be listed here, as well. 
Even though the historic village of Valley Forge, as well as the park, are partially located within Montgomery County, the modern village is in Chester County, PA 
The county has a hot-summer humid continental climate (Dfa) except in some lowland areas very close to Philadelphia where it is humid subtropical (Cfa).  The hardiness zones are 6b and 7a. 
Chionodes pinguicula is a moth in the family Gelechiidae. It is found in North America, where it has been recorded from Utah, Colorado, Texas, New Mexico, Arizona, Nevada and California. 
London Road is one of the oldest neighbourhoods in Lethbridge, Alberta. It is located in South Lethbridge and borders downtown, as well as Midtown and the Upper East Side. It is an L-shaped area defined by 6 Avenue, Stafford Drive, 3 Avenue, 13 Street, 9 Avenue and Scenic Drive. 
Land use in London Road is primarily residential, with 80% of all uses being of a single family residence or single family with basement suite. 
Travis Seegmiller is an American attorney, academic, and politician serving as a member of the Utah House of Representatives from the 62nd district. Seegmiller was appointed to the House on February 14, 2018, succeeding Jon Stanard. He represents Washington County, parts of Saint George, and the Washington Fields area. 
Seegmiller earned a Bachelor of Arts degree in Leadership Psychology and International Studies from Yale University and a Juris Doctor from the Georgetown University Law Center. 
in 2018, Seegmiller was appointed to the Utah House of Representatives after the resignation of Jon Stanard amid a prostitution scandal. He secured the seat in an eight-way race within the Washington County Republican Party. He won re-election in 2020 with 99.3% of the popular vote in the general election. 
The small Irish Catholic town of Imogene has a quaint restaurant/bar, The Emerald Isle, as well as a magnificent Catholic Church, St. Patrick's. There is also a developed campsite with showers and restrooms available for a fee. 
She played in all five games as the Faroe Islands won the football tournament at the 2005 Island Games in Shetland. 
Wardum is also an accomplished handballer. She played, outfield, for Kyndil and was part of the Faroe Islands women's national handball team. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in the Faroe Islands is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Phytosanitary certification is used to attest that consignments meet phytosanitary (regarding plants) import requirements and is undertaken by an NPPO (National Plant Protection Organization). A phytosanitary certificate for export or for re-export can be issued only by a public officer who is technically qualified and duly authorized by an NPPO (ISPM 12). 
A phytosanitary certificate for export is usually issued by the NPPO of the country where the plants, plant products or regulated articles were grown or processed (1). Phytosanitary certificates are issued to indicate that consignments of plants, plant products or other regulated articles meet specified phytosanitary import requirements and are in conformity with the certifying statement of the appropriate model certificate. Phytosanitary certificates should only be issued for this purpose. 
A public officer who is authorized by the National Plant Protection organization (NPPO) and accredited for the signing of phytosanitary certificates, who 1) possesses the required education, experience, and training; and 2) has written confirmation of having passed an approved examination. (RSPM No. 8, Accreditation) [NAPPO, 2004]. 
The USDA APHIS PPQ Export Certification Specialists are responsible for maintaining the quality and credibility of the U.S. Export Program. 
The USDA APHIS PPQ issues Phytosanitary Certificates for export via the PCIT system. PCIT tracks the inspection of products and certifies compliance with plant health standards of importing countries. This capability provides the USDA/APHIS/PPQ with greater fraud prevention, reporting functions, and monitoring capabilities. 
This article about a Norwegian politician born between 1800 and 1809 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Angus Kernohan (born 2 March 1999) is an Irish rugby union player playing for RFU Championship side Ealing Trailfinders. He plays as a winger, but can also play at centre. 
Born in Ballymena, Northern Ireland, Kernohan attended Ballymena Academy and first began playing rugby for Ballymena minis. 
On 13 May 2020, Kernohan travels to England to sign for Ealing Trailfinders in the RFU Championship from the 2020-21 season. 
Kernohan was part of the Ireland under-20s team that won a grand slam during the 2019 Six Nations Under 20s Championship. He missed the opening two rounds due to a hamstring injury, but returned for the final fixtures. 
This biographical article relating to Irish Rugby Union is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The protagonist is Florent, an escaped political prisoner mistakenly arrested after the French coup of 1851. He returns to his half-brother Quenu, a charcutier and his wife Lisa Quenu (formerly Macquart), with whom he finds refuge. They get him a job in the market as a fish inspector. After getting mixed up in an ineffectual socialist plot against the Empire, Florent is arrested and deported again. 
Wadborough railway station was located in Wadborough, Worcestershire. It opened in 1841 and closed in January 1965. It was situated to the west on the Bristol to Birmingham rail line; the line remains open and high-speed trains regularly pass through the level crossing called Wadborough. As of July 2015 the crossing now has LED lights. 
This article on a railway station in the West Midlands region is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Menara Jakarta is an under construction mixed development complex at Kemayoran, Jakarta, Indonesia. Located in front of JIEXPO, it consists of six towers, 1 Conho (Condo & Hotel), 1 Condo Tower, 1 Office Tower, and 3 Suite Tower. The complex will have a mall also. The complex is constructed on the site of postponed Jakarta Tower. 
The towers of this complex are named as Fortune Tower, Azure Tower, Celestial Tower, Breeze Tower, Equinox Tower, and Destiny Tower.  
The office tower in the complex is known as Fortune Tower, which will be a skyscraper of 280 meters tall at the tip. Once completed it will be one of the tallest buildings in Jakarta, with facilities such as Sky Garden, Sky Lounge & Restaurant and a 360' Sky Observatory. 
This article includes information from the Antarctic Place-names Commission of Bulgaria which is used with permission. 
Roseville station is an Amtrak train station in Roseville, California, United States. It serves the California Zephyr and Capitol Corridor lines. It is located at 201 Pacific Street and is unstaffed. The design of the two-story building pays homage to Southern Pacific Railroad stations from the early 20th century. 
Spring traps for large rodents such as rats or squirrels are powerful enough to break the animal's neck or spine. They may break human fingers as well, whereas an ordinary spring-based mousetrap is very unlikely to break a human finger. Rat spring traps may not be sensitive enough to spring when a mouse takes the bait. 
A rat cage trap is a metal cage box-shaped device that is designed primarily to catch rats without killing them. Food bait (not poisoned) is put in the cage trap.  When an animal enters the cage and moves toward the bait, the mechanism triggers and closes a door over the entry point. The animal is caught alive and without injury. The animal can be transported and released elsewhere or subsequently killed. 
Glue traps are non-poisonous sticky glue spread over card boards and the like and kept in places rats frequent, which gets them stuck to it when they pass over it.  The rat will subsequently die from dehydration and asphyxiation.  A bait may also be placed on the cardboard to attract the rats. 
Another form of non-lethal trap is one where the wires it is constructed of are cut and formed into a funnel shape directed into the body of the cage. This design is usually dome shaped with the funnel at the crown. Rats are extremely flexible and can push through the narrower opening into the cage, but cannot escape due to the ends of the wires poking them in the face. The advantage of this design is that it can catch more than one rat at a setting. 
Electronic rat traps detect the presence of a rodent via metal plates on the floor of the trap, then deliver a lethal dose of high-voltage electricity stepped up from batteries to several thousand volts. Some brands offer remote indication to tell you when the trap has operated. The Eliminator (South Africa) and Victor (US) are two brands of electronic rat traps. 
Glue traps, however, are not considered a humane method of rodent control, especially if the rodent is left to die. They can also harm non-targeted animals. Although they are still commonly used by professionals for insect monitoring in containers that prevent access by rodents.  
Another trap design, often considered more humane, is a self-resetting rat trap like the Goodnature A24. These traps kill rodents with an impact from a CO2-powered piston and are self-resetting. 
The Sikiana in Brazil live between the Cafuini River and headwaters of the Turuna and Itapi close to border with Suriname. The group in Suriname lives in Kwamalasamutu. The group in Venezuela is probably extinct. 
The hypothesis was proposed as an explanation for the presence of lemur fossils in Madagascar and India but not in Africa or the Middle East. Biologist Ernst Haeckel's suggestion in 1870 that Lemuria could be the ancestral home of mankind caused the hypothesis to move beyond the scope of geology and zoogeography, ensuring its popularity outside of the framework of the scientific community. 
Occultist and founder of Theosophy Helena Blavatsky, during the latter part of the 19th century, placed Lemuria in the system of her mystical-religious doctrine, claiming that this continent was the homeland of the human ancestors, whom she called Lemurians. The writings of Blavatsky had a significant impact on Western esotericism, popularizing the myth of Lemuria and its mystical inhabitants. 
Theories about Lemuria became untenable when, in the 1960s, the scientific community accepted Alfred Wegener's theory of continental drift, presented in 1912, but the idea lived on in the popular imagination, especially in relation to the Theosophist tradition. 
Lemuria was hypothesized as a land bridge, now sunken, which would account for certain discontinuities in biogeography. This idea has been rendered obsolete by modern theories of plate tectonics. Sunken continents such as Zealandia in the Pacific, and Mauritia[original research?] and the Kerguelen Plateau in the Indian Ocean do exist, but no geological formation under the Indian or Pacific Oceans is known that could have served as a land bridge between continents.[original research?] 
The idea of Lemuria was later incorporated into the philosophy of Theosophy and subsequently into general fringe belief. Accounts of Lemuria here differ. All share a common belief that a continent existed in ancient times and sank beneath the ocean as a result of a geological, often cataclysmic, change, such as a pole shift, which such theorists anticipate will destroy and transform the modern world.[citation needed] 
In 1864, "The Mammals of Madagascar" by zoologist and biogeographer Philip Sclater appeared in The Quarterly Journal of Science. Using a classification he referred to as lemurs, but which included related primate groups, and puzzled by the presence of their fossils in Madagascar and India, but not in Africa or the Middle East, Sclater proposed that Madagascar and India had once been part of a larger continent (he was correct in this; though in reality this was the supercontinent Gondwana). 
The anomalies of the mammal fauna of Madagascar can best be explained by supposing that... a large continent occupied parts of the Atlantic and Indian Oceans... that this continent was broken up into islands, of which some have become amalgamated with... Africa, some... with what is now Asia; and that in Madagascar and the Mascarene Islands we have existing relics of this great continent, for which... I should propose the name Lemuria!
After gaining some acceptance within the scientific community, the concept of Lemuria began to appear in the works of other scholars. Ernst Haeckel, a Darwinian taxonomist, proposed Lemuria as an explanation for the absence of proto-human "missing links" in the fossil record. According to another source, Haeckel put forward this thesis before Sclater, without using the name "Lemuria". 
Some Tamil writers such as Devaneya Pavanar have associated Lemuria with Kumari Kandam, a legendary sunken landmass mentioned in the Tamil literature, claiming that it was the cradle of civilization. 
Since the 1880s, the hypothesis of Lemuria has inspired many novels, television shows, films, and music. 
Note: GP = Games played, W = Wins, L = Losses, T = Ties, OTL = Overtime losses, Pts = Points, GF = Goals for, GA = Goals against 
Cressage railway station was a railway station on the Severn Valley Railway. It opened on 1 February 1862 with a single platform and a siding. By 1898 it had acquired an additional platform along with a signal box and the sidings had been expanded. 
The station was listed in the Beeching Report as a "passenger station already under consideration for closure before the formulation of the report". It closed on 9 September 1963, 
This article about a Shropshire building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article on a railway station in the West Midlands region is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bagdadia yanglingensis is a moth in the family Gelechiidae. It was described by Hou-Hun Li and Zhe-Min Zheng in 1998. It is found in China. 
As a paperback writer, many of his books were written as "work for hire" and the copyright held by the publishing company who, anticipating a very short shelf life, never bothered to renew the copyright or return the rights to the author. The fact that all of his books, prior to 1964, are in the public domain has been beneficial to the legacy of Orrie Hitt, in that it has made them more readily available to contemporary readers.  
Original Orrie Hitt paperbacks are collectible not only among aficionados of 1950s and 1960s cover art, but also among readers of mid-century erotica and crime novels, who find them superior to those of other "hack" writers of the time. 
Year in parenthesis is that of initial publication followed by the year of any reprint under a different title, if any. 
The commission's report, presented to the board of governors, suggested increasing the Bachelor of Divinity curriculum and abolishing the Licentiate in Theology programme. 
In 1964, the college was founded in Luthergiri, Rajahmundry, East Godavari with the merger of three theological colleges:  Andhra Union Theological College in Dornakal, Baptist Theological Seminary in Kakinada, and Lutheran Theological College in Rajahmundry. 
With William D. Coleman as its first principal, the college was dedicated on 1 July 1964 by R. M. Clark of the BTESSC.[a] The inaugural address was delivered by Senate of Serampore College registrar C. Devasahayam in Rajahmundry. 
The college is administered by a board of governors composed of representatives of participating Protestant ecclesiastical societies: 
The college motto is derived from Ephesians 4:12, which reads in the Latin Vulgate: "Ad consummationem sanctorum in opus ministerii..." ("For the perfecting of the saints, for the work of the ministry..." in the King James Version). 
W. D. Coleman, the college's first principal, explained the hall system: "Each of the participating denominations has its own 'hall'. There are two hours of instruction each week about the liturgy, history, and policy of each denomination". 
The churches commonly associated with Protestantism in southern India include the Anglicans, Congregationalists, Wesleyan Methodists, Baptists, Lutherans and Methodists. Each church has its own tradition. At ACTC, students learn their respective church doctrine in addition to general theology. 
The principal serves a four-year term (2018-2022), with each participating church having an opportunity to provide a principal. The current principal is the Rev. A. John Prabhakar, D.Th. (Serampore).  
ACTC and Serampore offer two degrees for pastors: Bachelor of Divinity (B.D.) and Master of Theology (M. Th.) under the aegis of Advanced Institute for Research on Religion and Culture (ARRC). 
Through distance education, ACTC has Bachelor of Christian Studies (B.C.S.) and Master of Christian Studies (M.C.S.) programmes for Christian students and a Diploma in Christian Studies (Dip. C.S.) programme for Christian and non-Christian students. 
When the college was founded in 1964, university registrar Chetti Devasahayam (CBCNC) delivered its inaugural address; registrar D. S. Satyaranjan visited the college annually. Current registrar S. K. Patro has visited ACTC to investigate the prospect of upgrading the college to a postgraduate institution. 
The college has begun an initiative to admit Christian candidates to a M.Div. programme, for which it has been accredited by the Asia Theological Association. 
ACTC's library has reading-room facilities, over 38,000 books and 35 periodicals. When the college was founded, it was known as the Dunkelberger Memorial Library. The Evangelical Lutheran Church in America had sponsored the library in memory of Roy Martin Dunkelberger, AELC, a Lutheran missionary in Rajahmundry. 
The library was renamed the Gipson Memorial Library in 2014 in honour of Baptist missionary T. G. Gipson, STBC, who had modernized the library during his second term as a visiting faculty member at the college. The renaming ceremony was held during the tenure of T. Matthews Emmanuel (CBCNC) as principal, in the presence of board of governors chair K. Frederick Paradesi Babu (AELC) and board member V. Prasada Rao (CSI). 
ACTC has recreational facilities which include throwball, tennis, basketball and volleyball courts, a table tennis room and a playing field for football and cricket. Daily mass is said in the chapel for students and teachers, and Sunday mass is open to the public. College festivals include the Christian Home Festival, Carey Day, CSI Day, Reformation Day, and Independence Day. 
This article about a place in Santa Cruz Province, Argentina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Cold Turkey is a live album by pianist Ray Bryant recorded at Basin Street East and released by Sue Records in 1964. 
Because Atlanta was a settlement that grew from a planned railroad terminus and later a railroad junction, rather than being planned in a grand manner, its antebellum architecture was unremarkable compared to patrician Savannah or other older Southern cities. The town's most important buildings included Edward A. Vincent's Union Station (1853), the Atlanta, Trout House and Washington Hall hotels, and the Atlanta Bank. An 1859 industrial journal noted that: 
Not a single antebellum building from what was the town of Atlanta remains today. Remaining antebellum architecture inside the city limits consists of four houses that were well outside the city limits in the 19th century, as well as the Tullie Smith House which was moved to the Atlanta History Center from a location in North Druid Hills, an adjacent suburb. The oldest building in Downtown Atlanta is the Georgia Railroad Freight Depot (1869). 
Throughout the American Renaissance and beyond, Atlantans were amazed at successive waves of ever more impressive hotels, civic and industrial architecture, and office buildings, such as the Equitable Building (8 stories, 1892), Candler Building (17 stories, 1906), and Rhodes-Haverty Building (21 stories, 1929). Among the most notable architects active in Atlanta between the Civil War and World War Two were A. Ten Eyck Brown, Francis Palmer Smith and G. Lloyd Preacher. 
During the Cold War era, Atlanta followed global modernist trends, especially with regards to office towers and commercial buildings.  Examples of modernist architecture include the Westin Peachtree Plaza (1976), Georgia-Pacific Tower (1982), the State of Georgia Building (1966), and the Atlanta Marriott Marquis (1985). 
The era's most notable architect may be Atlanta-native John Portman, whose Hyatt Regency Hotel (1968) made a significant mark on the hospitality sector. A graduate of Georgia Tech's College of Architecture, Portman's work reshaped downtown Atlanta with his designs for the Atlanta Merchandise Mart, Peachtree Center, the Westin Peachtree Plaza Hotel, and SunTrust Plaza. 
More recently, Atlanta's built environment has been getting more eclectic and diverse.  For example, 3344 Peachtree (2008) is more in the glass-walled modernist vein, while Millennium Gate (also completed in 2008) is the largest classical monument in the U.S. to have been dedicated since completion of the Jefferson Memorial in Washington, D.C. 
The Young Architects Forum of the Atlanta chapter of the American Institute of Architects sponsors open design competitions, exhibits, and lectures of interest to the profession and the general public. 
Andreae was born in Clapham, London to a German father, Carl Andreae of Frankfurt, and an English mother, Emilie Sillem. During the 1890s, Andreae wrote several works of fiction, many of which first appeared in The Windsor Magazine. 
Andreae immigrated to the United States in 1896. He settled in Cincinnati before moving to Chicago, becoming a U.S. citizen in 1914. He died in Winnetka, Illinois, aged 65. 
This biographical article about a United States activist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to association football in Scotland, about a forward born in the 1860s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1975, Jefferson was the first witness for the prosecution in the manslaughter case levied against Kenneth Edelin for his performance of a legal abortion. 
It was in 1980 that Jefferson helped the National Right to Life Committee start a political action committee because she believed it was important to lobby and support pro-life candidates for office. While a Republican, she helped Democrat Ellen McCormack run for the Democratic Party presidential nomination in 1976. Apart from NRLC, Jefferson served on boards of directors of more than 30 pro-life organizations. 
Jefferson opposed the Equal Rights Amendment on the basis that it is unnecessary as the Constitution has no in-built inequity.  She for years called for a constitutional amendment to reverse the 1973 Supreme Court decision in Roe v. Wade, rejecting the notion that abortion is a private matter between a woman and her physician. Jefferson also expressed opposition to welfare and busing, and support for the death penalty. 
Jefferson died in her Cambridge home on October 15, 2010, at the age of 83 years. She was divorced and had no children. She was buried in her hometown of Carthage, Texas. 
Oenospila flavifusata is a moth of the family Geometridae. It is found in Oriental tropics to Sundaland. 
Generally a green colored moth. Costa whitish and dentate fasciae is dark. Caterpillar yellowish with a dorsal, slender, red double line. Head bifid. Pupation occurs in a cocoon made between two leaves spun together. Host plants include Anacardium, Barringtonia, Memecylon, Eugenia, Syzygium, Nephelium, Chrysophyllum, and recently caterpillars found from Garcinia xanthochymus. 
MediaOne Academy is a media institute in Kerala, India. It was established by Madhyamam Broadcasting Limited in 2010. The institute is situated in Velliparamba, Calicut. It mainly runs courses in electronic, print and new media.  
Lincoln College Preparatory Academy (LCPA) (also known as Lincoln Prep Academy or The Castle on the Hill) is a three-year  middle school and four-year college preparatory magnet school in the Kansas City, Missouri School District. The high school offers International Baccalaureate programs. 
Lincoln was ranked by U.S. News & World Report as one of the "Top 100 High Schools" in the United States in 2012 and 2015. In 2008 and 2014, the school received the Blue Ribbon School Award of Excellence by the United States Department of Education, the highest award an American school can receive. 
Lincoln College Preparatory Academy is a middle and high school. More than 90% of its graduates enroll in college. The 2014 graduating class of 151 students received $15.6 million in scholarships, grants and financial aid. High achievement has been consistent, as the 115 graduates in 2002 received scholarships and financial aid in excess of $3 million. The student-teacher ratio is 14.0:1. 
MJP Racing Team Austria is an auto racing team founded by Austrian racing driver and entrepreneur Max Pucher.  The team has been competing in rallycross since its creation. The team uses Supercar specification Ford Fiesta built by MJP Racing. The cars were former built by Stohl Racing but before the 2016 season started Max Pucher separated his team from Stohl Racing and operates the cars by himself. 
She is the singer behind the hits like Bakit Nga Ba Mahal Kita, Maniniwala Ba Ako, Dahil Mahal Na Mahal Kita, Laging Ikaw Parin, Ikaw Pala, Mahal Mo Ba'y Di Na Ako, and Huwag Ka Nang Babalik. 
From 1994 to 1995, she was hailed as the Best Female Singer of the Year for the song You by Awit Awards. In 1994, her very first signature hit, Bakit Nga Ba Mahal Kita (Why Do I Love You?), became the number one charted song in the Philippines and stayed in the radio charts for 8 months from 1994 to 1995. It became the theme song of many Filipinos who went through heart breaks and got lost in love. 
In 1997, however her commercialized success of Dahil Mahal Na Mahal Kita, her carrier single from her 3rd album (Roselle: On Higher Ground), emerged immediate success and even spanned a film with the same name and even in album registry. 
To date, Dahil Mahal Na Mahal Kita was also covered four times by different artists: Rachelle Ann Go for The Gulong Ng Palad (2006) Soundtrack and Zsa Zsa Padilla's rendition for the Afternoon Soap theme Magkano Ang Iyong Dangal? in 2010, in 2013 by Vice Ganda for the soundtrack of the Primetime series Huwag Ka Lang Mawawala, and in 2018, Jonalyn Viray (aka Jona), for the teleserye Asintado. 
In 2000, she revived the Barry Manilow song "Somewhere Down The Road" for the Blockbuster Film "Minsan Minahal Kita" which also was included in the Original Motion Picture Soundtrack; and in 2002, her comeback platinum hit with Star Records "Huwag Ka Nang Magbabalik for the film Ngayong Nandito Ka and Jologs. 
In 2002, Roselle was chosen as the interpreter for the song, Free, composed by Gino Torres. The demo version was recorded by Carol Banawa. But the composer chose Roselle to do the final and live version. It became as one of the finalists of ABS-CBN's JAM: Himig Handog sa Makabagong Kabataan. It also became the theme song of ABS-CBN's summer station ID in the same year. 
Roselle Nava's last album with Star Records (ABS-CBN's recording outfit) All About Love achieved the Platinum Status but was never awarded to her. She moved to Viva Entertainment Agency and signed up for several projects. VIVA did not commercialise her artistry as her recent albums got no awards. The poor sales performance of her albums affected her singing career. 
In 2010, Bakit Nga Ba Mahal Kita was also re-recorded by Laarni Lozada for the Afternoon Drama "Alyna"; and Kakai Bautista, Philippines' Dental Diva, as her carrier single for her debut album under Star Music in 2017. 
Roselle's voice can be classified as soprano as her style is very similar with Regine Velasquez's singing prowess. She suffered from a throat virus which affected the brilliance of her voice. She was able to cope up through healing sessions and support of her fans. 
In 2009, she was part of the talked-about successful concert entitled "Divas of the 90s", produced by VIVA Entertainment Company. Her co-performers were Geneva Cruz, Jessa Zaragoza, and Rachel Alejandro. 
On February 13, 2016, she also had a successful concert with other OPM icons entitled LOVE THROWBACK held in PICC (Philippine International Convention Center). 
On February 4, 2018, Roselle was given a tribute by ASAP as one of the OPM gems in the country. She sang her signature hits with ABS-CBN's homegrown talents. The tribute showed how she started as a prime diva of ABS-CBN and what's her life now. Roselle was awarded a plaque of recognition with her contribution to OPM.  
She married Allen Ford Tan on January 18, 2010, at the Manila Cathedral in Manila. They have two sons: Rafa and Ram. 
Chuang Tse-Tung defeated Li Fu-Jung in the final, winning three sets to two to secure the title. It was the third consecutive win for Tse-Tung over Fu-Jung in World Championship finals. 
He was a lecturer at the University of Manchester and later at University of Sheffield from 1917 until his retirement in 1940. He was elected to be a Fellow of the Royal Society (FRS) in 1922. 
This article about a physicist of the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Madhabdihi is a village in Raina II CD block in Bardhaman Sadar South subdivision of Purba Bardhaman district in the state of West Bengal, India. 
95.54% of the population of Bardhaman Sadar South subdivision live in the rural areas. Only 4.46% of the population live in the urban areas, and that is the lowest proportion of urban population amongst the four subdivisions in Purba Bardhaman district. The map alongside presents some of the notable locations in the subdivision. All places marked in the map are linked in the larger full screen map. 
As per the 2011 Census of India Madhabdihi had a total population of 2,584, of which 1,315 (51%) were males and 1,269 (49%) were females. Population below 6 years was 289. The total number of literates in Madhabdihi was 1,866 (81.31% of the population over 6 years). 
Madhabdihi Rural Hospital at Madhabdihi, PO Chhoto-bainan (with 30 beds) is the main medical facility in Raina II CD block. There are primary health centres at Binodpur, PO Bajekamarpur (with 2 beds), Gotan (with 6 beds), Kaity (with 10 beds), Painta (with 4 beds) and Subaldaha, PO Barabainan (with 10 beds). 
Amphientulus durumagi is a species of proturan in the family Acerentomidae. It is found in Southern Asia. 
This biographical article relating to a United States baseball catcher born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He was born on 3 June 1953 in Larkana, Sindh. His father Mohammad Ali Johar was a teacher and a Sindhi poet. 
Lashari started his professional career in 1985 as Assistant Commissioner after passing the Federal Public Service Commission of Pakistan. He occupied administrative posts in various provinces of Pakistan. He retired in 2013, when he was Provincial secretary to the government of Sindh in the department of Antiquities. 
Tassilo, then still a child, began his rule as a Frankish ward under the tutelage of his uncle, the Carolingian Mayor of the Palace Pepin the Short (later king) after Tassilo's father, Duke Odilo of Bavaria, had died in 748 and Pepin's half-brother Grifo had tried to seize the duchy for himself. Pepin removed Grifo and installed the young Tassilo as duke, but under Frankish overlordship. 
A lost chronicle of Tassilo's reign was kept by his chancellor, Creontius. It was partially preserved in the 16th-century when Johannes Aventinus incorporated some of its material into his Bavarian history. 
The Mysterious Caravan is Volume 54 in the original The Hardy Boys Mystery Stories published by Grosset & Dunlap. 
On a winter vacation in Jamaica, the Hardy Boys begin a dangerous adventure when an ancient bronze death mask is discovered near their beach house (where Frank comically loses and finds his underwear). The case takes them from Jamaica to their hometown of Bayport to Casablanca to Marrakesh. They meet William along the way, a kind African who is willing to help them uncover secrets of the mask, which they find out is Jamaican property. 
Joe Hardy-The son of Fenton Hardy and a popular, hard-hitting detective. He solves cases with his brother, Frank. 
Frank Hardy-The son of Fenton Hardy and a popular, hard-hitting detective. But unfortunately Frank had a lot of trust issues with Joe. He solves cases with his brother, Joe. 
Chet Morton-Chet is Frank and Joe's plump friend. He helps them solve the case of the Mysterious Caravan. 
William Ellis- a Jamaican who Joe and Frank meets while holidaying in Jamaica. He is kidnapped by Fenton's old enemies unless the Hardys and they can negotiate. William knows much of Jamaican history, including the mask's itself. 
Fenton Hardy-Joe and Frank's father. Joe and Frank inherited his intellect and followed their father, but for their own reasons. 
Gertrude Hardy-Fenton's sister. She has a knack for solving cases, identical to her brother and though proud of him and her nephews' abilities, lectures them about dangers of being detectives. 
Christine Cellier-A unbelievably gorgeous, black-haired teen who is the daughter of Mr. and Mrs. Cellier. She helps the Hardys and Chet solve the Mysterious Caravan mystery. 
This article about a children's novel of the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
This article about a young adult novel of the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
He participated for the second time in an international competition in the 2018 Junior World Weightlifting Championships which was held in Tashkent, Uzbekistan. At that time he was sixth with a total batch of 262 under the Egypt lifters, Ahmed Eltamadi and above the Turkey lifters, Ramazan Kara. 
In 2020, he participated in the 2020 Asian Junior Weightlifting Championships in Tashkent, Uzbekistan and won a silver medal. 
He will participate at the 2020 Asian Weightlifting Championships who will take place from 16 to 25 April 2021, who was postponed from 16 to 25 April 2020, because the COVID-19 pandemic. 
Under Ottoman rule it was a little village south-west of Karaburun, a promontory on the Black Sea, and on the southern bank of Lake Derkos, the waters of which are brought to Constantinople by an aqueduct. There were about 300 inhabitants. In 1466, it was ruled directly by the Patriarch of Constantinople [Kambouroglou, Monuments for History of Athens (Gr.), II, 354]. It was not re-established until the beginning of the seventeenth century, when the titular resided at Therapia on the Bosporus. 
In 1821, during the massacre that broke out in Constantinople, as a retaliation of the Greek War of Independence, the metropolitan bishop of Derkoi, Gregory, was among the Greek Orthodox upper clergy that was executed by the Ottoman authorities. 
During the anti-Greek Istanbul pogrom, in September 1955, six churches under the jurisdiction of the metropolis of Derkoi were destroyed, while the remaining two church buildings were saved. Moreover, the metropolitan mansion was burnt to the ground by the fanatical mob. Latter, the site that once hosted the metropolitan mansion was appropriated by the Turkish authorities and, in 1958, a hotel was built. 
Kelly attended Tecumseh Elementary School in suburban Syracuse, New York. When she was 9, her family moved to Delmar, New York, a suburb of Albany, where she attended Bethlehem Central High School. She obtained an undergraduate degree in political science from the Maxwell School of Citizenship and Public Affairs at Syracuse University in 1992 and earned a J.D. from Albany Law School in 1995. 
Kelly was an associate in the Chicago office of law firm Bickel & Brewer LLP. In fall 1996, she co-wrote an article, Litigation, "The Conflicting Roles of Lawyer as Director", for the American Bar Association's journal. She later worked at Jones Day for nine years, where one of her clients was the credit bureau Experian. 
Kelly left America Live in July 2013 and took maternity leave. On October 7, 2013, she began hosting a new nightly program, The Kelly File. The Kelly File was occasionally the channel's ratings leader, topping The O'Reilly Factor. 
In June 2015, Kelly interviewed Jim Bob Duggar and Michelle Duggar of 19 Kids and Counting regarding their son Josh Duggar's alleged molestation of five girls in 2002. She later interviewed two of their daughters, Jill and Jessa. This show's Nielsen national estimates ratings of 3.09 million viewers, above its average 2.11 million, ranked with the 3.2 million for the Malaysia Airlines Flight 17 shootdown coverage and 7.3 million for the Ferguson riots coverage. 
On June 2, 2017, Kelly interviewed Russian president Vladimir Putin, first in a panel discussion she moderated at the St. Petersburg International Economic Forum and later in a one-on-one interview for the premiere episode of NBC's Sunday Night with Megyn Kelly, which aired June 4, 2017. Kelly's daytime talk show, Megyn Kelly Today, premiered in September 2017. 
Kelly announced the launch of Devil May Care Media, her media production company, on September 10, 2020, with a podcast, The Megyn Kelly Show. Its first episode premiered on September 28. 
On July 6, 2021, it was announced that the podcast would move to Sirius XM on September 7, 2021, to broadcast weekdays at 12 noon ET on the talk radio channel Triumph, along with a video simulcast available to Sirius XM subscribers. 
In February 2016, Kelly signed an agreement with HarperCollins to write an autobiography scheduled for release later that year, in a deal worth more than $10 million. The book, titled Settle for More, was released on November 15, 2016. 
Bombshell, a 2019 film portraying Kelly's career at Fox News, was released on December 13, 2019. Kelly is played by Charlize Theron, with other cast members including Margot Robbie as Kayla Pospisil (a composite character), Nicole Kidman as Gretchen Carlson, Nazanin Boniadi as Rudi Bakhtiar and John Lithgow as Roger Ailes. The film follows events at Fox News in the lead up to Ailes resigning from the organization. Kelly said she was not consulted for the film's content. 
Kelly married Daniel Kendall, an anesthesiologist, in 2001. The marriage ended in divorce in 2006. In 2008, she married Douglas Brunt, who was then president and CEO of the cybersecurity firm Authentium, and who became a full-time writer and novelist. They have three children, son Yates (b. 2009), daughter Yardley (b. 2011), and son Thatcher (b. 2013). 
Politically, Kelly identifies as an independent, and told Variety in 2015 that she has voted for both Democrats and Republicans. 
On October 12, 2016, Kelly stated in a segment on her show with Fox News commentator Julie Roginsky that she is a lifelong Catholic. 
Sean Geoffrey Clingeleffer (born 9 May 1980) is an Australian former cricketer who played for Tasmania.  He plays his club cricket for North Hobart Cricket Club. 
This biographical article related to an Australian cricket player born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pontardawe Rugby Football club is a rugby union club based in Pontardawe, a small town in the valley of the River Tawe in  Wales. 
The club has in the past had a successful junior section which provided age group rugby with fully qualified coaches from 7 through to 16, although at the moment, in line with the national trend of a decline in rugby participation, only have teams at Under 7, 13 and 14.  
As players move on from junior/youth rugby many other clubs, included premiership teams, have had the benefit of the early development of these players by Pontardawe. 
Over the years Pontardawe RFC has produced a number of first-class rugby players and coaches. In 2007 they celebrated their 125th year of being a Welsh Rugby Union member club. 
In May 2006 Pontardawe RFC were one of the 13 'Rebel' clubs who brought a vote of no confidence against the Welsh Rugby Union, which centered on financing and the handling of former coach Mike Ruddock's departure. The vote failed heavily with only 20 votes for the motion and over 300 against. 
As have many other clubs Pontardawe RFC have recently sold vintage rugby memorabilia to raise funds to improve facilities at the club. 
Maaike Polspoel (born 28 March 1989 in Vilvoorde) is a Belgian road bicycle racer. She competed at the 2012 Summer Olympics in the Women's road race, finishing 29th. 
This biographical article related to a Belgian cyclist born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In April 1944 he, Adrienne and Albert were taken to the Drancy internment camp, then transferred to Auschwitz, where he was put to death on arrival. Adrienne followed shortly after. Possibly due to his profession, Albert survived. 
Megachile auripubens is a species of bee in the family Megachilidae. It was described by Rebmann in 1970. 
Siberian Lady Macbeth (Orig. Sibirska Ledi Magbet), also translated as Fury Is a Woman, is a 1962 film directed by Andrzej Wajda, based on the novella Lady Macbeth of the Mtsensk District by Nikolai Leskov. 
Ale is a small village residing  on intersection of Nagar-kalyan highway and Pune-Nashik highway in Junnar Taluka of Pune District of Maharashtra state in India 
The intersection of National Highway 50 and National Highway 222, hence it is a very important market place. 
A village named Ale is near from alephata. The land of Ale is holy by the visit of saint Dnyaneshwar who wrote famous Hindu granth Dyaneshwari. About educational richness; the area is surrounded by schools, college having all general streams which includes B.A, BCom, BSc, and other specialization including BCA, BCS, BHMS, Engineering & Pharmacy offering both Diploma and Degree. 
 Francis Fulford (born 31 August 1952) is a British reality TV personality. He is a member of the United Kingdom's landed gentry, and the 23rd Fulford to have owned and inhabited Great Fulford manor house. 
Fulford is Lord of the Manor of Great Fulford. He is the current owner of the estate which was granted to his ancestor William de Fulford by Richard I of England about 1191, as a reward for military service on the Third Crusade. The present great house dates back to the 16th century. 
Since 2004 he has maintained an ongoing career in reality television, appearing in various entertainment and documentary-style programmes, many of which (such as The F***ing Fulfords) make a feature of his casual swearing, prejudices, and traditionalist views. 
In 2007 he attempted a move into local politics, standing for a seat on Teignbridge District Council as a member of the Conservative Party. He was defeated, gaining 370 votes out of an electorate of 2215. In all previous local elections, the Conservative Party candidate(s) had been elected easily. The Teign Valley is currently (2020) represented by two Conservative Party councillors on the Teignbridge District Council. 
Wimple Winch  was an English psychedelic pop band that evolved from the group, Just Four Men. Originally a Merseybeat act, their individualized sound was personalized by their intricate vocal harmonies and exploratory lyrics. 
William Howard Kershaw, Jr. (born December 15, 1983) is a former American football linebacker who is currently a free agent. He was signed by the Kansas City Chiefs as an undrafted free agent in 2006. He played college football at Maryland. 
Kershaw has also been a member of the Philadelphia Eagles, Houston Texans, Denver Broncos and New Orleans Saints. 
 Kywegyo  is a village in Bhamo Township in Bhamo District in the Kachin State of north-eastern Burma. 
This biographical article related to Filipino boxing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Neanderthal Parallax is a trilogy of novels written by Robert J. Sawyer and published by Tor. It depicts the effects of the opening of a connection between two versions of Earth in different parallel universes: the world familiar to the reader, and another where Neanderthals became the dominant intelligent hominid. The societal, spiritual and technological differences between the two worlds form the focus of the story. 
The trilogy's volumes are Hominids (published 2002), Humans (2003), and Hybrids (2003). Hominids first appeared as a serial in Analog Science Fiction, won the 2003 Hugo Award for Best Novel, and was nominated for the John W. Campbell Award the same year; Humans was a 2004 Hugo Award finalist. In 2017, the full trilogy was presented the Aurora Award for Best of the Decade. 
The initial contact between the two worlds takes place at the Sudbury Neutrino Observatory in Sudbury, Ontario, which is also the location of a scientific research facility in the Neanderthal world. 
The barast world has a single government hierarchy: each region of the globe is governed by a local Gray Council; these in turn answer to the High Gray Council, the world government. 
Any serious crime has a single punishment: the castration of the offender and all others who share at least half his genes (parents, siblings, and children). This eugenic practice serves to keep any undesirable elements out of the gene pool without severely punishing an offender, beyond his loss of genetic heritage. 
Barast do not have a monetary economy. Each person is given what they need when they need it, and in turn is expected to work at providing a meaningful 'contribution' to society. No barast would ever dream of attempting to take more than they need from society, and because of their stable population, there are no issues with scarcity (the population level was stabilized at the point it was in order to prevent such issues from even developing). 
Barast medicine has become largely automated, and most doctors, aside from first aid (excepting researchers), simply operate and maintain this technology. This technology is highly robust and is able to be adapted to Gliksin physiology fairly quickly after contact.  
Citizens Union is an American good government group. Founded in 1897 as a political party, the group was reconstituted in 1908 as a nonpartisan member organization with the broad mission of serving "as a watchdog for the public interest and an advocate for the common good." 
Citizens Union was founded by New York City citizens concerned about the growing influence of the Democratic Party political machine Tammany Hall. One of the founders was Laurence A. Tanzer, who stayed involved with the organization until his death in 1963, aged 88. One of its vice presidents was Dana Converse Backus. The organization helped to elect New York's first reform mayor, Seth Low, in 1901. 
Today, Citizens Union continues to act as a government watchdog organization, with campaigns that focus on voting rights and poll workers, campaign finance reform and government accountability. Its current Executive Director is Betsy Gotbaum.  
The Citizens Union Foundation, a nonprofit organization affiliated with Citizens Union, publishes the Gotham Gazette. 
Abud was born in Aleppo, Syria to a family of rabbis, his father Rabbi Avraham Abud, and his grandfather Rabbi Eliyahu Abud. In his youth, he studied the Torah, Halakhha, and poetry of Baqashot, among the rabbis of Aleppo. 
In 1907, he relocated to Buenos Aires to serve as a cantor (Hazzan) and a school teacher in the Jewish community of the city. In 1929 he came and settled in Jerusalem and founded the Talmud Torah "Nezer Aharon" in the city. He also established and managed a fund loan for the residents of Jerusalem and supported financially at Yeshivat Porat Yosef in the city. 
He was greatly influenced by Arab maqam music and he wrote lyrics Arabic melodies. These melodies were assimilated in the melodies of prayer among the Sephardi Jews. Wrote piyyut and gathered the poetry of Baqashot to a book "Shirayi Zimra Ha-Shalem" and was one of the founders of the shirat h- Baqashot custom on shabbat in Jerusalem. 
Rabbi abud taught maqam and piyyut on a volunteer basis until old age. The most famous of his students is Rabbi Ovadia Yosef among others the cantors Moshe Habusha and Yehiel Nahari. 
Abud and his wife, Leah, had 12 children. He died in Jerusalem on 7 June 1977. After his death, the Jerusalem City Council decided to honor his memory and named the street where he lived in his name. 
In the 2001 International Film Festival (in Badalona) Seyfi won the Best actor award for the short 1999 film The Cookie Thief. 
This article about a German film and television actor is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a location in Lincoln County, Wisconsin is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a location in Oneida County, Wisconsin is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Weaver was born in Lancaster, Ohio in 1909 and died at his home in San Clemente, California, age 68. 
After many years of dedication to research of MS treatment and strong support for recruiting young investigators, Dr. Weaver's accomplishments were honored by the NMSS through the awarding of the Harry Weaver Neuroscience Scholar Award. This award is offered to researchers who have completed their MS training and are beginning their work in MS research. The award include salary and research funding for a period of five years and is commonly given through universities. 
San Francesco is a gothic-style, former Roman Catholic church located in Montefalco, Province of Perugia, region of Umbria, Italy. The church and adjacent Franciscan convent now functions as the civic art museum. 
The convent also has works by Francesco Melanzio from Montefalco. The museum also displays frescoes from the followers of Alunno and Antoniazzo Romano. Archeological findings and marble gravestone fragments are displayed in the Crypt. 
It is currently their second highest selling album, with a total of 515,400 copies sold. Since their last album (with new material) 3rd: Love Paradise, two more generations of members had joined, which might have contributed to the album's overall success. The album contained such popular singles as "The Peace!" and "Ren'ai Revolution 21." The first pressing edition of the album came in special packaging, with a B3-sized folded poster. 
The 2019 Nigerian Senate election in Kano State held on February 23, 2019, to elect members of the Nigerian Senate to represent Kano State. Ibrahim Shekarau representing Kano Central, Jibrin I Barau representing Kano North and Kabiru Ibrahim Gaya representing Kano south all won on the platform of All Progressives Congress. 
A total of 30 candidates registered with the Independent National Electoral Commission to contest in the election. APC candidate Ibrahim Shekarau won the election, defeating PDP candidate Madaki Aliyu Sani and 28 other party candidates. Shekarau received 61.60% of the votes, while Aliyu Sani received 33.68% 
A total of 28 candidates registered with the Independent National Electoral Commission to contest in the election. APC candidate Jibrin I Barau won the election, defeating PDP candidate Ahmed Garba Bichi and 26 other party candidates. Barau received 61.37% of the votes, while Garba Bichi received 33.35% 
A total of 28 candidates registered with the Independent National Electoral Commission to contest in the election. APC candidate  Kabiru Ibrahim Gaya won the election, defeating PDP candidate Abdullahi Sani Rogo and 26 other party candidates. Gaya received 55.39% of the votes, while Rogo received 37.77% 
Quercus marilandica, the blackjack oak, is a small oak, one of the red oak group Quercus sect. Lobatae. It is native to the eastern and central United States, from Long Island to Florida, west as far as Texas, Oklahoma, and Nebraska. There are reports of a few isolated populations in southern Michigan, but these appear to represent introductions. 
It is sometimes an understory tree in pine stands on sandy knolls in the southeastern US. Along the coastal plain of New Jersey the probability of finding this species is increased in relatively sunny, open areas such as those near coastal salt marshes. It often occurs near scarlet and post oaks as well as pitch pine; understory companions include winged sumac, bracken, sweetfern, and bayberry, and can be found as far north as parts of Ohio and New York. 
The wood is very dense and produces a hot flame when burned, which functions as an excellent source of heat for barbecues and wood-burning stoves. However, the wood is not desirable for wood fireplaces because the heat causes popping, thereby increasing the risk of house fires. 
This biographical article about a football midfielder from Uruguay born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This is a list of games for the Commodore 64 personal computer system, sorted alphabetically. See Lists of video games for other platforms. 
Pavlensky's "events" are inspired in part by Pussy Riot, as demonstrated in Seam, and follow in the tradition of artists such as Chris Burden, the Viennese Actionists, and Moscow Actionists Oleg Kulik and Alexander Brener, Fluxus and Joseph Beuys. 
Pavlensky and Oksana Shalygina founded an independent online newspaper Political Propaganda in 2012, which was dedicated to contemporary art in political contexts, "overcoming cultural chauvinism, implemented by the government", feminism and gender equality. 
Seam is said to reference David Wojnarowicz's actions in Rosa von Praunheim's documentary Silence = Death (1990), in which Wojnarowicz had sewn his own lips shut in protest of the Reagan administration's lack of action against the AIDS epidemic. 
On November 14, 2012, Reuters published its list of the 98 best photos of the year which included Seam. 
On November 10, 2013, while sitting naked on the stone pavement in front of Lenin's Mausoleum on the Red Square, Moscow, Pavlensky hammered a large nail through his scrotum, affixing it to the stone pavement. His political art event coincided with the annual Russian Police Day. When the police arrived, they covered him with a blanket and later arrested him. 
"A naked artist, looking at his testicles nailed to the cobblestone is a metaphor of apathy, political indifference, and fatalism of Russian society," declared Pavlensky in his statement to the media. 
On February 23, 2014, Pavlensky organized an event called Freedom inspired by Maidan and the 2014 Ukrainian revolution. The artist and his friends built an imitation barricade on Tripartite Bridge in Saint Petersburg, burned tires, and beat drums. The event was interrupted by Saint Petersburg police who arrested Pavlensky and his colleagues. 
On October 19, 2014, Pavlensky cut off his earlobe with a chef's knife while sitting naked on the roof of the infamous Serbsky Center to make visible political abuse of psychiatry in Russia. This art event was an homage to Van Gogh. 
The criminal case against Pavlensky was opened on November 9, 2015 under the "vandalism" section of Article 214 of the Russian criminal code. He was held in a psychiatric ward for a few weeks, and spent seven months in prison waiting for his trial. 
According to gallerist Marat Gelman, the action shows Pavlensky's "obvious symbolism". "The Lubyanka door is the gate of hell, the entrance into the world of absolute evil. And against the backdrop of hellfire is a lonely artist, waiting to be captured ... Pavlensky's figure at the door of the FSB in flames - very important symbol for today's Russia, both political and artistic." 
On 8 June 2016, the Moscow criminal court declared Pavlensky guilty of vandalism and sentenced him to a fine of 500,000 rubles, which Pavlensky refused to pay. 
On 13 August 2016, Pavlensky gave a lecture in Odessa, Ukraine which ended with the inebriated Ukrainian journalist and screenwriter Vladimir Nestrenko instigating a fight that ended with his stabbing one of two security guards who tried to subdue him. The second of the two security guards suffered a fatal heart attack after the incident. 
In 2020, Pavlensky innovated with a new political art event called "Pornopolitics" for which he launched a website presented as "the first political porn platform". This action aims to expose the lies of civil servants, politicians, representatives of power who "impose puritanism on society while despising it". 
On February 12, the artist published intimate videos and sexually connoted messages sent by the deputy and Paris mayoral candidate Benjamin Griveaux to a woman. Pavlensky explained that this material demonstrates "the hypocrisy" of the candidate who campaigned by putting forward "traditional family values". Benjamin Griveaux then withdrew from the mayoral elections. Pornopolitique.com was taken offline three days after the event. 
Pavlensky was arrested and placed in police custody with his partner Alexandra de Taddeo who was the recipient of the sexually explicit content. 
In 2012, Pavlensky participated in the alumni and students art exhibition Oculus Two organized by the Pro Arte Foundation. 
In 2013, in front of the State Hermitage Museum in Saint Petersburg, he organized a street art exhibition titled Ghosts of Identity, which came as a project of his Political Propaganda periodical. 
In 2017, Pavlensky participated in Art Riot at the Saatchi Gallery in London. This exhibition ranks among the top 10 of most popular contemporary art exhibitions of the year. 
In 2018, his work is exposed as part of the exhibition Us or Chaos at BPS22 and Talking about a revolution at 22Visconti. 
Pavlensky was also nominated for Russia's "Innovation" art prize in 2016, but was later barred by the National Centre for Contemporary Art on the grounds that he had broken the law, prompting four members of the jury to leave in protest. 
As in The Newsroom, George Findlay (Ken Finkleman) is the protagonist of More Tears, as a documentary producer, who manipulated his subjects in order to create better television drama.  In the final installment, Findlay abandoned the documentary form to film a satire of the neo-conservative government of Mike Harris, the Premier of Ontario. The programme also explored the personal life of George Findlay, his unhappy marriage, and his unhappy extra-marital affairs. 
The European qualification for the 2015 FIVB Volleyball Men's U21 World Championship, in Mexico will be played over two rounds.  
In the first round of qualification, 21 teams are split into six pools. The pool winners will qualify for the second round and join the champions and the runners-up of the 2014 U20 European Championship already secured in the second round. 
Greenway, also referred to as New Inn, is a hamlet on the southern slopes of the Preseli Mountains in Pembrokeshire, Wales. It sits on the crossroads between the B4329 old Cardigan to Haverfordwest turnpike and the B4313 road between Fishguard and Narberth and is the site of a former inn serving travellers on these routes, now a private dwelling. Greenway is in the parish of Morvil and the community of Puncheston, and the nearest village is Rosebush. 
Ann Wannemacher was born in 1948 in Morrison, Illinois, to Rita and Rudolph Wannemacher of Hooppole. 
Nardulli joined the university's lab run by Benita Katzenellenbogen, and eventually became a professor of the Department of Molecular and Integrative Physiology with her own lab, teaching and studying the effects of estrogen in women. 
 Nardulli's work concentrated on the specifics of estrogen activities, including the proteins it binds with, and the mechanisms that the hormone uses to manipulate chromatin and DNA. According to Katzenellenbogen,
Among the research topics explored by her team were the plasma membrane proteins and their effect on breast cancer cells as well as the proteins that these cells secrete. Later research focused on the brain and estrogen action in it. 
At the university, Nardulli "was particularly fond of spending time with the Hormone Chixx, a group of women from across campus who studied the effects of hormones in the body. She discovered that introducing students to the wonders of human physiology and endocrinology was extremely rewarding and was recognized for her teaching excellence." 
As an active member of the Endocrine Society, she served as "chair of the Advocacy and Public Outreach Core Committee and visited Washington, D.C., numerous times to meet with legislators on Capitol Hill and lobby for increased scientific research funding." She was also a member of the society's Scientific Statements Task Force and a member of the editorial board for the academic journal Endocrine Reviews and Molecular Endocrinology. 
The World Group II was the second highest level of Fed Cup competition in 2013. Four of the winners advanced to the World Group Play-offs, and the losing nations resorted to the World Group II Play-offs. 
Arizabalo moved to Puerto Rico, beginning his military career there with Artillery commander. In Puerto Rico went to Santo Domingo in 1809 to fight the French. 
From Puerto Rico he returns to Venezuela between 1827 and 1829 and organized a guerrilla with the title of commanding general of the royalist troops Costa Firme. With little or no support from the Spanish fleet of Caribbean of Angel Laborde, ruled by Miguel de la Torre in Puerto Rico, finally on August 18, 1829, without any hope of success, and after spending many hardships, Joseph Arizabalo capitulates to republican General Lorenzo Bustillos, being reshipped in La Guaira. 
Philips was featured in the book North Shore Chronicles and was in the film Blue Crush.[citation needed] 
Philips was appointed in 2005 to a four-year term on the Hawaii State Commission on the Status of Women by the Governor of the State of Hawaii.[citation needed] 
The Syriac Catholic Eparchy of Our Lady of Deliverance is a Syriac Catholic Church ecclesiastical territory or eparchy of the Catholic Church in the United States. The territory of the eparchy encompasses the entire United States. Its cathedral is St. Joseph Syriac Catholic Cathedral, in Bayonne, New Jersey, near the episcopal see of Newark. Bishop Yousif Benham Habash has led the eparchy since April 2010. 
Until 1995, Syriac Catholic congregations in the United States and Canada were under the ordinary jurisdiction of the local Latin Church bishops. 
On November 6, 1995, Pope John Paul II erected the Eparchy of Our Lady of Deliverance, immediately subject to the Holy See, and appointed bishop Joseph Younan as the first eparch, with his see at Newark, New Jersey. 
In 2009, Bishop Younan was elected as Primate of the Syriac Catholic Church and Patriarch of Antioch and all the East of the Syriacs. In 2010, Pope Benedict XVI appointed Bishop Yousif Benham Habash as the second eparch. 
On 7 January 2016, it lost its (southeastern) Canadian territory (then five communities in Ontario and Quebec provinces) to the newly erected Syriac Catholic Apostolic Exarchate for Canada. 
The degree of Li force one can employ in kung fu depends on several variables such as resilience of muscles, strength of bones, speed and timing of attack and so on.  An effective way to enhance the Li force is to exercise one's muscles and bones by applying increasing pressure on them (weight training, gym exercises, etc.).  The stronger one's muscles and bones become, the more powerful and skillful the level of kung fu is. 
On the other hand, the level of the Neijing force depends on the extent one can exercise over one's will power to release an inner qi energy. Within the framework of Chinese martial arts, every person is believed to possess the inborn energy of qi. Martial artists can harness the force of qi so that it is strong enough to be applied in combat. When qi is being directed by one's will, it is called Neijing. 
The kung fu component of Li force is limited by one's physical condition. When a person passes his/her prime age, one's kung fu ability will pass the optimum level, too. The degree of kung fu will decline when muscles and bones are not as strong as they used to be. On the other hand, the kung fu aspect of Neijing is said to continually grow as long as one lives. 
Neijing trainees are often reminded to refrain from using the Li force, because the energy of Neijing will be locked and blocked whenever the Li force is applied. So, Neijing and Li are said to be mutually exclusive. 
The AC 3000ME was based on a prototype called the Diablo built by the Bohanna Stables company and shown at the London Racing Car Show in 1972. 
Peter Bohanna was an automotive body structures engineer. His experience included working with fibreglass structures as a boat engineer and a stint with Ford's Advanced Vehicle Operations in the UK doing bodywork for the Ford GT40. In late 1967 Bohanna was at Lola cars working on the T70, where he met Robin Stables, who prior to his arrival at Lola had been a racing mechanic and Lotus dealer. 
Bohanna Stables had sought interest from both AC and TVR before the Diablo was shown at the Racing Car Show, but neither company committed to the project. After the car's debut  AC's Keith Judd drove the Diablo to the company's Thames Ditton headquarters and convinced AC owner Derek Hurlock to take the project on. 
AC acquired the rights to the Bohanna Stables Diablo design and assigned two of their engineers, Alan Turner and Bill Wilson, to develop it into a production car. AC also hired Bohanna and Stables to consult on the redesign. The Diablo's steel tubing spaceframe was completely re-engineered. A new engine had to be found for the car, as British Leland expected to need all of the E-series engines produced at their Cofton Hackett factory for their own models. The substitute chosen was a Ford V6. 
Several pre-production prototypes were built, with their number variously reported as eight, nine or eleven cars. 
As early as August 1975 AC was planning to offer a turbocharged version. The forced induction system was originally expected to be supplied by Broadspeed. 
The chassis of the 3000ME was a perimeter frame whose central tub was made of folded sheet steel with an integrated roll-over bar. Some reviews of the car call the central tub a monocoque. Subframes were fitted at the front and rear. Bodywork was of glass-reinforced plastic (GRP). Weight distribution was 40/60 front/rear. 
The transmission was a 5-speed manual that, like the engine, was installed transversely. The transmission was an AC design, using an aluminium case produced by AC and a gear-set from Hewland. The engine drove the transmission via a triplex chain supplied by Renold. The driver selected gears with a Ferrari-like gated gearchange. 
The 3000ME was equipped with electric windows, a sunshine roof panel, Pilkington Sundym laminated glass, an adjustable steering column, and a radio with a powered antenna. 
Former racing driver and Ford technical sales specialist John Parsons and Ecosse Technical Director Aubrey Woods purchased the assets of AC (Scotland) with plans to resume production of the 3000ME. By this time the name and intellectual property of the original AC Cars had been bought by Brian Angliss of Autokraft, so Parsons and Woods incorporated their company as the Ecosse Car Company Ltd., and renamed the car the Ecosse Signature. The company was based in Knebworth, Hertfordshire. 
The exterior of the Ecosse Signature was restyled by Peter Stevens. Working from the AC (Scotland) Mark II prototype, the Alfa V6 powertrain was removed and a turbocharged Fiat Twin Cam engine and transmission from the Fiat Croma were substituted. 
AC provided Ghia with two cars, one completely assembled and one rolling chassis, on the condition that they would be able to display the car at the 1981 Geneva Motor Show. The complete 3000ME left Thames Ditton on 16 October and arrived in Turin 4 days later, leaving 4 months for the work to be completed. 
The aerodynamic shape of the car allowed it to record a drag coefficient (     c   d      {\displaystyle c_{\mathrm {d} }}  ) of just 0.30. Some references report that the original Essex V6 was replaced by a Cologne V6, but was still mated to a 5-speed manual transaxle. 
The car remained on the showcar circuit until 1986. It appears to have been sold at auction by Ford in 2002 for a price of $45,825 and remained in private collections after that. It was sold again at auction in January 2014. 
Chassis 119 was progressively converted into a "Lightweight" special suitable for use in hill climbs and sprints. Much of the conversion work, which included first a single- then twin-turbo engine upgrades, was done by Robin Rew. The car was later returned to a road-legal state, but kept many of the performance upgrades. This car appeared on the cover of the September 1986 edition of Sports Car Monthly magazine. 
Chassis 156 was imported to Australia, where it was converted for rally use. Extensive work was done to prepare the car for racing, including adding an F.I.A.-compliant roll cage, and complete overhauls of both the suspension and engine. Consideration was also given to using the car on the Historic racing circuit. 
A special tube-frame car with a heavily modified 3000ME body was built for the Supersports series. This car is powered by a Cosworth BDA engine driving through a Hewland transaxle. It was featured in the February 1992 issue of Cars and Car Conversions magazine. 
Alessandro Golinucci (born 10 October 1994 in San Marino) is a Sammarinese footballer who plays for Tropical Coriano of the Italian lower leagues and the San Marino national football team. 
Having been at Tropical Coriano for over three seasons, Golinucci expressed appeasement with his situation there, forming a good relationship with his teammates and staff. 
This biographical article relating to Sammarinese association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 Martin Lee  (born 13 January 1978) is an English former professional tennis player. Born in London, he resides in Maidenhead, Berkshire. 
Lee was a promising junior, reaching No. 1 in the world junior rankings. In 1995 he won the Boys Doubles at Wimbledon. A left-hander, he turned pro in 1996. He struggled with constant knee and groin problems throughout his career, which eventually forced his retirement from the professional circuit in November 2006. 
Lee won two of his three matches for Great Britain in the Davis Cup, however these were only dead rubbers. Lee lost his only live match against Thailand's Paradorn Srichaphan in straight sets. 
 Saint Patrick for Ireland is a Caroline era stage play, written by James Shirley and first published in 1640. It is notable as an early development in Irish theatre. 
Forsythe notes significant parallels in structure and characterization with the Dekker/Massinger play The Virgin Martyr, among other works of the era. 
Lechytia is a genus of pseudoscorpions in the subfamily Lechytiinae within the family Chthoniidae. It is the sole genus in its subfamily and contains 22 described species from many parts of the world. 
"Behind the Laughter" is the twenty-second and final episode of the eleventh season of the American animated television series The Simpsons. It first aired on the Fox network in the United States on May 21, 2000. In the episode, a parody of the VH1 series Behind the Music, the Simpsons are portrayed as actors on a sitcom, and their dramatic inner turmoil and struggles are detailed. Told in a mockumentary format, the episode presents a fictional version of how The Simpsons began. 
The episode was directed by Mark Kirkland and written by Tim Long, George Meyer, Mike Scully and Matt Selman. The idea was pitched by Long, and the writers wrote the episode quickly without a draft. VH1 and the producers of Behind the Music allowed the crew to use the show's visual graphics package, and Behind the Music narrator Jim Forbes recorded narrations. In addition, country musician Willie Nelson guest stars as himself. 
The episode received critical acclaim, with many reviewers noting it as a highlight of the season and the series itself, and won an Emmy Award for Outstanding Animated Program (For Programming less than One Hour) in 2000. In addition, composer Alf Clausen won an Annie Award for "Outstanding Individual Achievement for Music in an Animated Television Production". 
In May 2004, the BBC chose it as the last episode to be aired, having lost the terrestrial broadcasting rights in February 2002, to Channel 4, who later aired the series in November 2004. 
The episode contains many references and allusions to Behind the Music, and one line the staff thought was humorous was pulled straight from the actual series. 
The episode was ranked as the fourth best The Simpsons episode by askmen.com. In 2012, Johnny Dee of The Guardian listed the episode as one of his five favorite episodes in the history of The Simpsons, noting The Simpsons is "good at self-parody". The Simpsons writing staff voted this in their list of Top 15 Simpsons episode becoming the newest episode in the list. Screen Rant called it the best episode of the 11th season. 
Until 1991, the office was named Ministry for Industry. However, the official name since then is Ministry for Enterprise and Innovation. Since 2014, the minister has been especially responsible for business, industry, enterprise and innovation. This includes small and medium-sized businesses, state-owned enterprises and industrial policy. 
The current Minister for Business, Industry and Innovation is Ibrahim Baylan from the Social Democrats who holds the office since 21 January 2019. 
Morals at Midnight (German: Moral um Mitternacht) is a 1930 German romance film directed by Marc Sorkin and starring Gustav Diessl, Camilla Horn and Vladimir Sokoloff. 
This article related to a German film of the 1930s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Maniac" is a song performed by American girl group Girlicious. Released as the second single from their second album, Rebuilt. It officially impacted Canadian radio on March 23, 2010. It was released to iTunes Canada on April 6, 2010. Maniac" reached number seventy-four on the Canadian Hot 100. It performed best on the Serbian Top 50 singles where it charted for eleven weeks and reached a peak of eleven. 
"Maniac" was written by Brent Paschke, Drew Ryan Scott & Joacim Persson. Natalie Mejia explained the main concept behind the song saying, "It is just about a love that kind of drives you crazy. You know how love can be. It is a universal law". Nichole Cordova later added, "We've all been through that crazy love, so that's what the song is about." 
The single was performed for the first time on March 12 at CHUM FM FanFest 2010. On 4 June 2010, they performed the single at Toronto Pride. 
On March 22, 2010 a 1:30 clip of the song premiered on the girl's official website and Myspace. A day later on March 23, 2010 the song was sent to top 40 Canadian radio stations for mainstream radio play. The single was digitally released to iTunes Canada on April 6, 2010. 
On the week of May 25, 2010 "Maniac" entered and peaked on the Canadian Hot 100 at number seventy-four. It remained on the chart for two weeks. On the Serbian Top 50 singles, the song charted for eleven weeks and reached a peak of number eleven. 
On Portal PopLine MTV Brazil, the "Maniac" video became the most requested and watched video ever, with more than 200 000 views. 
Yoshiyuki Saito (born April 9, 1970) is a Japanese professional wrestler best known by his ring name Super Shisa, currently wrestling for Dragon Gate. His gimmick is inspired by the Ryukyuan Shisa. He claimed to be a student of Toryumon alumni Saito, but was outed as being Saito himself in 2007. 
He would continue to be a top line player in early Toryumon, and would rename to Saito. In the spring of 2000, he and fellow Toryumon participant Chocoball KOBE would wrestle in Pro Wrestling Kageki. Saito would win the Hakata City Jr Heavyweight Title in a tournament, defeating Daiyu Kawuchi in the final round. 
He abruptly announced his retirement in late 2001, and stated that his first student, Super Shisa, would take his place. Saito would be given a "Sayonara Saito" series of matches by Toryumon. His record in the series was 0-5-1, the draw being a double countout against Yasushi Kanda. His final match as Saito would be a loss to Shuji Kondo on 10/28/2001. 
Shisa then aligned with Magnum Tokyo's PosHearts unit. PosHearts would go on hiatus due to an injury to Tokyo, and Shisa spent the latter part of 2005 and much of 2006 teaming with King Shisa, and occasionally with Dragon Gate dojo student Shisa Boy. The team broke up when King Shisa was outed as being Mexican heel Pentagon Black, and reverted to that gimmick. 
Towards the end of 2006, PosHearts would reunite, and Shisa would win his first title in Toryumon / Dragon Gate, winning the Open the Triangle Gate titles with stablemates BxB Hulk and Anthony W. Mori. The success was short-lived, as PosHearts lost the titles to the Muscle Outlaw'z, and then lost a follow up match forcing them to disband as a stable. It was during this match that Shisa was outed as being Saito; damage to the mask and blood loss forced him to voluntarily demask. 
Since the dissolution of PosHearts, Shisa has remained unaligned and wrestling low on the card. He is a trainer in the Dragon Gate dojo, and focuses primarily on those duties. While wrestling on the main roster, Shisa aligns with the "Mushozoku" Unit, a group of older wrestlers including Masaaki Mochizuki, K-ness and Magnitude Kishiwada. Aside from Dragon Gate, Shisa spends time in various smaller Japanese independent promotions. 
On February 27, 2010, his ranking in the promotion improved significantly when he defeated K-ness to become the Open the Brave Gate Champion. He held the title for just under two months before losing it to Tigers Mask of Osaka Pro Wrestling. 
Other wrestlers with a Shisa gimmick have appeared in Dragon Gate, aligned with Super Shisa. One of the current dojo students is Shisa Boy. Mexican wrestler Pentagon Black spent several months in Dragon Gate as King Shisa. Introduced as the leader of the Shisa clan, King Shisa was pushed further than Super Shisa ever was, even going so far as to get a Dream Gate title shot. He was eventually outed as being Pentagon Black by the Muscle Outlaw'z, and joined them. 
This biographical article related to Romanian football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pontoetoe is a village in the Sipaliwini District of Suriname, situated on the banks of the Tapanahony River. The village is close to Paloemeu, and can be reached by air using the Vincent Fayks Airport. 
"Rhinestone Eyes" is a song from British alternative rock virtual band Gorillaz featured on their third studio album, Plastic Beach. 
The song was initially intended to receive a full release as the fourth single from Plastic Beach, with copies of the physical single being sent to radio stations across the United States. However, just days after the copies were issued, the band made the decision to issue non-album single "Doncamatic" instead. 
The band performed the song live for the first time at the Wedgewood Rooms in Portsmouth, on 21 March 2010. The song was performed at all the shows of their Escape to Plastic Beach World Tour, held between October and December 2010. The band recorded a live set for the Late Show with David Letterman on 8 October 2010. The set was released on the show's webcast, with "Rhinestone Eyes" being played on the main show. 
Gorillaz also performed the song at the shows of their subsequent tours Humanz Tour (2017-2018) and The Now Now Tour (2018). 
A fan-made video featuring a fully animated, full-colour rendering of the aforementioned official storyboard was released on 31 August 2017 by South African-born Dutch American freelance animator Richard Van As. The video was received positively by the official Gorillaz YouTube channel in the comments section of the video. 
  The annual meeting of parishioners (also referred to as the annual vestry meeting) is held yearly in every parish of the Church of England to elect churchwardens and deputies (if any) for the forthcoming year. The meeting must be held by 31 May and is commonly held immediately prior to the annual meeting of the parochial church council. It is the last remnant of the old vestry meeting. 
Since this is a public meeting, notice must be given in writing with the minimum period of two Sundays before the date of the meeting and the notice must be displayed publicly. 
The meeting is convened and chaired by the minister (usually the incumbent or priest-in-charge), or if there is no minister or if she or he is unable or unwilling to chair the meeting, the churchwardens convene, and the meeting elects a chairman. 
The ship, along with the rest of the Argentine navy is poorly maintained maintenance and has inadequate staff training due to a lack of funding and import restrictions. In 2003, the ship fired on a friendly Brazilian warship during a joint training exercise. In 2012, the Almirante Brown class were short of spare parts and suffering engine problems, plus all their ordnance was past its expiry date. 
Squadron Leader Shikha Subas Pandey (born 12 May 1989) is an Indian cricketer and officer in the Indian Air Force (IAF). She plays for the national cricket team as a right-arm medium pacer and middle-order batter, and is an IAF air traffic control officer. 
Pandey made her international Twenty20 (T20) debut on 9 March 2014 against Bangladesh at Cox's Bazar cricket stadium in Bangladesh. In August of the same year, she made her One Day International cricket (ODI) and Test cricket debuts against England at Wormsley and Scarborough, respectively. 
However, she did not let her focus on game affect her academic performance. She particularly credits Ujwala Phadte, her lecturer in Applied Mathematics for helping her throughout this phase and making sure her grades were not inversely proportional to her on-field performance. 
After completing her engineering degree from Goa College of Engineering in 2010, three multinational companies offered her opportunities, but she declined all these placement offers and decided to take a year off and focus on her cricketing career completely. In July 2011, she joined Indian Air Force, and in June 2012 was commissioned as an air traffic controller. At the time of the 2020 ICC Women's T20 World Cup, she held the rank of Squadron Leader. 
Pandey was part of the Indian team to reach the final of the 2017 Women's Cricket World Cup where the team lost to England by nine runs. In January 2020, she was named in India's squad for the 2020 ICC Women's T20 World Cup in Australia. In May 2021, she was named in India's Test squad for their one-off match against the England women's cricket team. 
In October 2005, Air France Cargo and KLM Cargo, the two freight subsidiaries of the group, merged their commercial activities. The Joint Cargo Management Team now operates the organisation worldwide from the Netherlands. 
In 2008, it was the largest airline company in the world in terms of total operating revenues, and also the largest in the world in terms of international passenger-kilometres. 
In early April 2016, Alexandre de Juniac, Chairman and CEO since 1 July 2013 resigned and was replaced by Jean-Marc Janaillac on 4 July 2016. 
On 26 February 2019, the Dutch government announced that it had "purchased 12.68 percent of shares in Air France-KLM" and "plans to build up its stake to around 14 percent". 
Private shareholders own 81.4% of the company with 37% held by former Air France shareholders and 21% held by former KLM shareholders. The Government of France owns the remaining 15.9%. 
The company spends about a third of its revenue on staff, its biggest expense, while Lufthansa only spends around a quarter, so to save around 800 million euros (app. 1.04 billion US$) annually over the next three years, the company will make a recruitment freeze which will lead to 2,000 job cuts in 2012. 
Air France Services Ltd (AFSL) was one of the major ground handling companies at Heathrow airport. AFSL was created on 15 January 1997 and was in the beginning a partnership between Air France and Servisair Ltd. Servisair then decided to pull out.[citation needed] 
Hypotia mavromoustakisi is a species of snout moth in the genus Hypotia. It was described by Rebel in 1928, and is endemic to Cyprus and Israel. 
During the Arab Spring of 2011, Oum Ali District was home to hundreds of Tunisian refugee dissidents. 
The town's former official name of Montalban derives from the Spanish word Monte (Mountain), in reference to the numerous hills found within and surrounding the town. A common name for the municipality up to the present, it was its official name from its founding in 1909 until 1982 when the Batasang Pambansa officially renamed it to Rodriguez under Batas Pambansa Blg.275 in honor of Eulogio Rodriguez, Sr., a native of the municipality who served as Senate President. 
In 1982, the town was officially renamed to Rodriguez under Batas Pambansa Blg.275 in honor of the former Senate President and town native Eulogio Rodriguez, Sr. 
As early as 2018, the town's Sangguniang Bayan approved Resolution No. 60, Series of 2018 requesting the Senate of the Philippines thru its president, Vicente Sotto III and the House of Representatives through its speaker, Gloria Macapagal Arroyo to co-sponsor a bill for Rodriguez's conversion into a city.[citation needed] 
On July 3, 2019, Rizal 2nd District Representative Juan Fidel Nograles sponsored a bill to restore the town's name to the former name of Montalban. This is in response to the numerous requests from the town's native residents to return the town's name to the former after it was changed in 1982. 
Rodriguez is a town of mountains. From its north to south, a series of sloping ridges, hills and mountains ranges adorn the town. In fact, around 27% or the town is occupied by mountains and slopes. The town's highest peak is Mount Irid, 1,469 meters above sea level. 
The province of Rizal covers 1,175.8 square kilometers. Rodriguez makes up 26.6% of the entire province of Rizal, housing 11 barangays. Rodriguez's economic activities include agriculture and commerce such as the Avilon Zoo. 
The Municipality of Rodriguez is generally very rough in topography, with 83% of its total land area composed of upland areas, hills and mountain ranges. The remaining 17% low-lying terrain and rolling lands are found at the south-western portion of the municipality, along with the northern portions of the Municipality of San Mateo. 
The rolling slopes comprise the Marikina River Valley, where water from higher elevations drain towards the Marikina River and its tributaries at the south-western portion of the municipality. Elevations at these western lowlands range from 10 to 30 meter above sea level. The western portion of the flatlands gently rises towards the west, which is part of Quezon City. 
There are numerous elementary and high schools, both public and private, offering primary, secondary and tertiary education in the town of Rodriguez. There are also colleges and institutions that offer graduate and undergraduate programs in town. 
This article about a glacier in Princess Astrid Coast is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article related to the city of Bangkok, Thailand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jessica Thomas of Renowned for Sound said, "Cyrus sees Cyrus take his brand of smooth pop covering a plethora of popular tracks and breathing a fresh life into them. There are 11 songs on his debut and while the 10 cover performances boast a very similar aesthetic to the original tune they're all infused with that Cyrus twist which makes them stand well on their own." 
The reserve provides space outside of human development for some of the largest herds of hoofed in Asia: the vulnerable Tibetan wild yak (Bos mutus) (an estimated 10,000), wild ass (30,000), and Tibetan antelope (Pantholops hodgsonii) (up to 75,000).  The area is also an important habitat for the endangered Kozlov's Pika, and the relatively common Ladak pika.  There are also small populations of dholes (Wild Asiatic dogs). 
Access is restricted, and high permit fees are required to enter.  The soil is fragile and there are no permanent roads. 
Crandon Lakes is an unincorporated community and census-designated place (CDP) split between Hampton Township and Stillwater Township, in Sussex County, New Jersey, United States. As of the 2010 United States Census, the CDP's population was 1,178, of which 682 were in Hampton Township and 496 in Stillwater Township. 
Of the 441 households, 32.7% had children under the age of 18; 63.5% were married couples living together; 6.6% had a female householder with no husband present and 24.3% were non-families. Of all households, 19.5% were made up of individuals and 6.6% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.67 and the average family size was 3.05. 
23.2% of the population were under the age of 18, 7.6% from 18 to 24, 24.2% from 25 to 44, 32.9% from 45 to 64, and 12.1% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 41.2 years. For every 100 females, the population had 97.7 males. For every 100 females ages 18 and older there were 98.9 males. 
As of the 2000 United States Census there were 1,180 people, 405 households, and 326 families living in the CDP. The population density was 180.1/km2 (466.1/mi2). There were 492 housing units at an average density of 75.1/km2 (194.4/mi2). The racial makeup of the CDP was 97.71% White, 0.34% African American, 0.34% Native American, 0.51% Asian, 0.08% from other races, and 1.02% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.19% of the population. 
There were 405 households, out of which 45.9% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 66.2% were married couples living together, 10.4% had a female householder with no husband present, and 19.5% were non-families. 15.1% of all households were made up of individuals, and 6.7% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.91 and the average family size was 3.26. 
In the CDP the population was spread out, with 29.5% under the age of 18, 6.5% from 18 to 24, 33.1% from 25 to 44, 23.1% from 45 to 64, and 7.8% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females, there were 96.0 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 93.0 males. 
The median income for a household in the CDP was $56,188, and the median income for a family was $60,114. Males had a median income of $50,281 versus $36,429 for females. The per capita income for the CDP was $22,642. About 0.9% of families and 1.5% of the population were below the poverty line, including 1.2% of those under age 18 and none of those age 65 or over. 
Lost Musicals is a British musical theatre project established in 1989 by Ian Marshall Fisher. It is dedicated to presenting lost or forgotten musicals by famous American writers, and has been responsible for the first revivals of the lesser-known works of writers such as Stephen Sondheim, Cole Porter, Alan Jay Lerner, Richard Rodgers, Oscar Hammerstein II, Harold Arlen and Jerome Kern. 
In another interview, Fisher criticised what he reviewed as the recent trivialisation of musicals, saying "Those people who were involved in the Broadway musical wanted to speak to the public. The campery and kitschness is something that's been ladled on to it subsequently." 
This was followed in 2000 by a move to the Royal Opera House, Covent Garden. The Kurt Weill centenary was marked in December of that year by a semi-staging of One Touch of Venus, which included a reconstruction of Agnes de Mille's original choreography, which was performed by the Central School of Ballet. The cast included Jessica Martin and Louise Gold, with the Royal Philharmonic Concert Orchestra. 
Some of the revivals have been UK premieres or first revivals of the shows. For instance, in 2005 the company gave the stage premiere of Evening Primrose, a little-known 1967 television musical by Stephen Sondheim, with a cast including Betsy Blair and Gary Raymond. The same year saw the company's second production of Fanny, starring Liza Pulman and James Smilie, and Porter's Silk Stockings. 
In 2010 Lost Musicals presented the first complete revival of Alan Jay Lerner and Frederick Loewe's second Broadway musical, The Day Before Spring, following on from the rediscovery of the full vocal score. It was the first time all the music had been heard since 1946. 
In 1999 Lost Musicals was recognised by the British Charity Commissioners as an educational charitable trust, titled The Lost Musicals Charitable Trust. The project's educational output has been varied: for instance, in 2011 Princeton University invited Fisher to present a talk about the project to students and staff at Princeton. 
Uritskoye is located 63 km northwest of Nikolsk (the district's administrative centre) by road. Shirokaya is the nearest rural locality. 
This Nikolsky District, Vologda Oblast location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Lynette Frances Williams AM (born 1947) is an Australian educator and musician who held the position of Principal of the Guildhall School of Music and Drama from 2017 to 2021. Prior to taking up her role at Guildhall, she was CEO of Australia's National Institute of Dramatic Art and was the director of the Culture, Ceremonies and Education Programme for the London 2012 Olympic Games. 
Williams originally trained as a classical singer at the Sydney Conservatorium of Music. She was appointed Member of the Order of Australia in the 2019 Australia Day Honours. 
The chancel contains memorials to the Bothe family. The south aisle has a memorial to Edward Edmonson who died in 1589. To the west end is a plaque to John Trowell who died in 1766. The north aisle has two thirteenth century effigies and a stone slab to Richard Shylton who died in 1510. 
The churchyard contains war graves of five soldiers and an airman of World War I and an airman of World War II. 
The pipe organ dates from 1906 when an instrument was installed by Harrison and Harrison. Details of the organ can be found on the National Pipe Organ Register. 
In the spring of 1946, Ivan, an American soldier, returns home psychologically scarred after spending some time in a Japanese prison camp during World War II. Once back in his small Pennsylvania town, Ivan settles in, trying to put his life back together while living with his stoic peasant father. 
Maria heals Ivan's hand, but the unhappiness between them increases further. She is pursued by Clarence who tries to seduce her, but she remains faithful to Ivan and resists Clarence's advances. One day, unexpectedly, Ivan leaves town by train. Moving to a new city, he starts work in a slaughter house, making new friends. 
Left to her own devices, Maria finally succumbs to Clarence's advances. Though she quickly rejects him, she is pregnant. Maria searches out Ivan and tells him of her pregnancy and of the death of her grandmother, but Ivan is now cruelly indifferent towards her. 
Out with his friends one night, Ivan meets up with Clarence. Clarence does not remember him and tells the story of how he seduced Maria, and that she later refused to have anything further to do with him. Furious, Ivan hits a still incredulous Clarence. 
Ivan, still tormented by nightmares of his war experiences, is visited by his father, who tells Ivan that he is dying and that he must come back to Maria. Ivan returns home, admitting to Maria that he loves her baby. Now that Maria's chaste image has vanished, she and Ivan are able to make love for the first time. 
The film is the first American feature film by Konchalovsky. In his review of the film in Variety, Todd McCarthy indicated that Konchalovsky was probably the first Russian director to have made a major American film with well-known actors. 
The opening sequence features excerpts from John Huston's 1946 U.S. Army documentary Let There Be Light about posttraumatic stress disorder. 
Maria's Lovers has an approval rating of 33% on review aggregator website Rotten Tomatoes, based on 6 reviews, and an average rating of 5.88/10. 
The essay is largely concerned with qualifications of representatives and the frequency of their election. The Federalists argued that annual elections would not afford representatives enough time to learn about their office. They proposed biennial elections to allow representatives to gain experience without remaining in office for too long. 
Federalist paper no.52 also continues on to Federalist paper no.53 titled "House of Representative continued" to continue the argument about biennial election and reassuring that their liberty will be secure under the proposed constitution. 
Federalist 52 was Madison/Hamilton's attempt to explain the reasoning of the qualifications of the House of Representatives, and why it would be elected every two years. 
For more information about the structure and workings of both houses of Congress, see United States Congress. 
It was founded in 2013. It was Acquired by Smart Software Testing Solutions Inc., a Dublin, California based company. It provides mobile testing tools, automation testing tools and bot testing on real devices. 
With the (current) exceptions of the genera Sessea and Reyesia, the subfamily furnishes many colourful garden plants of considerable horticultural merit. 
Mr. & Ms. TV was a Hindi television reality show that was broadcast on Sony TV. The purpose of the show was to find the best of the best Hindi television stars, who would be crowned as Mr. & Ms. TV. The show was hosted by Shonali Nagrani.The show was won by Purbi Joshi and Swapnil Joshi who were crowned Ms. and Mr. TV respectively. 
There were originally 6 female and 6 male contestants chosen and then each contestant was paired with one of the opposite gender. After the selection, the pair together had to take  on  challenges like dancing, dubbing, and acting each day. The performances were evaluated by the judges: Sonali Bendre and Madhur Bhandarkar who would score them after every such tasks. The two contestants to receive the lowest total scores were then be eliminated from the competition every day. 
Willmott produced and directed this film from a script he wrote with Greg Hurd. It was shot in the town of Nortonville, Kansas. 
King John's Castle, also known as Carlingford Castle, is an enclosure castle and National Monument located in Carlingford, County Louth, Ireland. 
King John's Castle is located in Carlingford town's harbour, halfway along the south coast of Carlingford Lough. 
The east wing of the castle was added c. 1261. In 1326 the castle was committed to Geoffrey le Blound. Edmond Loundres was constable in 1388, Stephen Gernon in 1400. Henry MacShane O'Neill attempted to take the castle in 1596.[citation needed] 
During the Irish Confederate Wars, the castle was held by the Irish Catholic Confederation; then was taken by Sir Henry Tichborne, 3rd Baronet (Parliamentarian) in 1642, then by Murrough O'Brien, 1st Earl of Inchiquin in 1649 and Charles Coote, 1st Earl of Mountrath in 1650.[citation needed] 
During the Williamite War it was fired on by Jacobites in 1689 and used as a Williamite hospital by Frederick Schomberg, 1st Duke of Schomberg prior to the Battle of the Boyne. 
In September 2014, terminal three of the Ninoy Aquino International Airport was the target of a foiled bombing plot. 
Three individuals were arrested, and the motivation was initially speculated to be related to Islamist militants.  The office building is owned by DMCI Holdings, a company owned by Chinese Filipinos. 
The lawyer calls his organization "United States Allied Freedom Fighters of the East". Justice Secretary Leila de Lima called the actions of the group "misguided". The Director General of the National Security Council called the group a "dubious organisation led by delusional leaders." The Philippine Armed Forces called the bomb plot "comic relief", while the National Bureau of Investigation did not dismiss the attack. 
The three arrested individuals were charged with illegal possession of explosives. All were represented by a single lawyer, with ties to the Marcos presidency, who claimed that the three are fall guys in a plot by the Aquino Administration to create instability to allow the constitution to be amended so that President Aquino can serve more than one term. The charges were later endorsed by the Department of Justice, but charges of illegal possession of firearms were dropped. 
Following the bombing plot, and an unrelated kidnapping of a Chinese teenager, the Chinese Foreign Ministry issued a travel warning advising its nationals not to travel to the Philippines. 
The 1982 Baylor Bears football team represented Baylor University in the 1982 NCAA Division I-A football season.  The Bears finished the season fifth in the Southwest Conference. 
Monique Barbut, born in 1956 in Morocco, is a French public servant who served as the Executive Secretary of the United Nations Convention to Combat Desertification (UNCCD) from 2013 until 2019. She was appointed to this position by the United Nations Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon on 16 September 2013. 
Barbut obtained her Master of Philosophy in Economics and Bachelor of Arts in English from the University of Paris. 
Due to her role in the French government in the 1992 Earth Summit and the establishment of the French Global Environment Facility, Barbut became the first Chief Executive Officer of the French GEF. She subsequently held a number of high-ranking positions, including Chief Executive Officer and Chairperson of GEF (2006-2012) and Director of the Division of Technology, Industry and Economics at the United Nations Environment Programme (2003-2006). 
This article about a Members of the National Assembly of Quebec from the Conservative Party of Quebec is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Legnaro National Laboratories are the site of AURIGA, a gravitational wave detector for astrophysical gravitational waves research. It became operational in 2004, and has been continuously in operation since then. In 2016, it was proven that the AURIGA resonant mass detector is sufficiently sensitive for dark matter searches, and perhaps more suitable than more modern detectors such as LIGO. The experiment is closed and the AURIGA antenna is an exhibit at LNL (since April 2021). 
The GAMMA experiment is underway at several European laboratories including the Legnaro National Laboratories. It uses gamma-ray spectroscopy to study the structure of light nuclei, as well as their unbound states and roles in nucleosynthesis processes. At present, LNL is one of the facilities delivering stable ion beams, though the development of SPES will also allow contribution of high-intensity radioactive ion beams. 
Richard "Dick" Day (born March 9, 1937) is Minnesota, USA, politician and a former member of the Minnesota Senate who represented District 26, which includes portions of Dodge, Freeborn, Goodhue, Mower, Olmsted, Rice, Steele and Waseca counties in the southeastern part of the state. A Republican, he was first elected in 1990, and was re-elected in 1992, 1996, 2000, 2002 and 2006. Prior to redistricting in 1992 and 2002, he represented the old districts 30 and 28. 
Day was born on a farm in Rochester, Minnesota, where he graduated from Rochester High School. He earned a Bachelor of Arts degree in political science and business administration from Winona State College, now Winona State University. 
Day currently lives in Owatonna, Minnesota where he has worked in printing sales, franchise sales, Director of Franchise Sales and Development for Century 21, a real estate broker, and an IBM Salesman, from which he is now retired.  He served on the Owatonna City Council from 1976 to 1980, and was a Steele County commissioner from 1980 to 1988. He is married to wife, Janet, and has four children: Dan, Steve, Debbie and Julie. His favorite grandchild Is Ben. He is Catholic. 
Prior to his resignation, Day was a member of the senate's Business, Industry and Jobs Committee, Capital Investment Committee, Finance Committee, State and Local Government Operations and Oversight Committee, and Transportation Committee. He also served on the Finance Subcommittee for the Transportation Budget and Policy Division, and on the State and Local Government Operations and Oversight Subcommittee for Gaming. He was minority leader from 1997 to 2007. 
On May 27, 2008, Day entered the Republican primary in Minnesota's 1st congressional district. He lost to Brian J. Davis, a physician who was endorsed by the party, and who went on to lose the general election to the incumbent Congressman, Tim Walz. 
Aneirin Hughes (born Aneurin Hughes; 8 May 1958) is a Welsh actor and singer known for playing Chief Superintendent Brian Prosser in the BBC4 Welsh police drama Hinterland. He won a Best Actor BAFTA Cymru (or BAFTA Wales) for his appearance as Delme in Cameleon (1997), a Welsh language film. 
Hughes began his acting career in 1994 in the BBC Wales soap opera Pobol y Cwm. He went on to appear in Blood on the Dole, Casualty, Family Affairs as DI Patrick Grenham, Spooks, Take Me with Robson Green and EastEnders in January and April 2009 as Andy Jones, the adoptive father of Danielle Jones. He reprised the role in June 2016. 
He was an atheist but was very influenced by his wife, who was a Calvinist (his wife came from Louis Breguet's family). 
The VIII Army Corps / VIII AK (German: VIII. Armee-Korps) was a corps level command of the Prussian and then the Imperial German Armies from the 19th Century to World War I. 
Originating on 21 June 1815 as the General Command for the Grand Duchy of the Lower Rhine and established on 3 April 1820 as VIII Corps.  The headquarters was in Koblenz and its catchment area was the Rhine Province and the Principality of Birkenfeld of the Grand Duchy of Oldenburg. 
The Corps served in the Austro-Prussian War.  During the Franco-Prussian War it was assigned to the 1st Army. 
In peacetime the Corps was assigned to the V Army Inspectorate but joined the 4th Army at the start of the First World War.  It was still in existence at the end of the war.  The Corps was disbanded with the demobilisation of the German Army after World War I. 
The 25 peacetime Corps of the German Army (Guards, I - XXI, I - III Bavarian) had a reasonably standardised organisation.  Each consisted of two divisions with usually two infantry brigades, one field artillery brigade and a cavalry brigade each.  Each brigade normally consisted of two regiments of the appropriate type, so each Corps normally commanded 8 infantry, 4 field artillery and 4 cavalry regiments.  There were exceptions to this rule: 
On mobilisation, VIII Corps was assigned to the 4th Army forming part of the centre of the forces for the Schlieffen Plan offensive in August 1914.  It was still in existence at the end of the war. 
The Piano Sonata in E-flat major D 568 by Franz Schubert is a sonata for solo piano. It is a revision and completion of the Sonata in D-flat major D. 567. The D-flat major version was composed in June 1817, while the E-flat major revision and completion, published in 1829 after Schubert's death as Op. posth. 122, dates from sometime around 1826. 
Daniel Coren summarized the nature of the recapitulation in the first movement of this sonata as "syncopated primary material". 
Shane Andre Mosley (born September 7, 1971), often known by his nickname "Sugar" Shane Mosley, is an American former professional boxer who competed from 1993 to 2016. He held multiple world championships in three weight classes, including the IBF lightweight title; the WBA (Super) and WBC welterweight titles; and the WBA (Super), WBC, and Ring magazine light middleweight titles. He is also a former lineal champion at welterweight (twice) and light middleweight. 
In 1998, the Boxing Writers Association of America named Mosley as their Fighter of the Year. He was also given the same honor by the International Boxing Hall of Fame in 2000. In 2000 and 2001 he was named the world's best active boxer, pound for pound, by The Ring. 
Mosley was born in Lynwood, California, and raised in Pomona, California. He has two older sisters, Venus and Cerena. Mosley became interested in boxing after watching his father, Jack, box in street fights. Mosley has been trained and managed by his father since the age of eight. 
In January 1996, Mosley had his first fight outside of California since beginning his pro career. He fought at the Grand Casino in Biloxi, Mississippi knocking out 35-year-old Mike Bryan in round one. By May 1997, Mosley went 23 fights unbeaten, with 22 coming inside the distance. 
Mosley made his first title defense on November 25 at the County Coliseum in El Paso, Texas against Mexican Manuel Gomez (17-8, 14 KOs). Mosley knocked Gomez out in round 11 to retain his title. 
On February 6, 1998, Mosley defeated 24-year-old Demetrio Ceballos (20-1, 13 KOs) at the Mohegan Sun Casino in Uncasville. Ceballos was down once in round 4 after an overhand right and left hook to the body. He was down again in round 8 following a flurry of punches before referee Eddie Cotton called an end to the fight. At the time of stoppage, Mosley was ahead on all cards (70-61, 70-62, 70-62). 
In May 1998, Mosley knocked out former world super featherweight champion and world lightweight challenger John John Molina (45-4, 30 KOs) in round 8 at the Trump Taj Mahal in Atlantic City, New Jersey. Molina was also dropped to his knees in round 7. 
On June 27, 1998 Mosely knocked out Colombian boxer Wilfrido Ruiz (25-3, 19 KOs) in round 5. He then fought at the Madison Square Garden Theater in New York City on September 22, 1998 against Eduardo Bartolome Morales (26-0, 21 KOs). Morales was knocked down in the 3rd round, and eventually stopped in round 5. 
Mosley took only two months out returning to the ring to defend his title in January 1999 against American Golden Johnson (15-2-2, 10 KOs) at the Civic Center in Pensacola, Florida. The fight ended when Mosley connected Johnson with a flurry of punches as he was against the ropes and then dropped to both knees. He beat the count, but was put down again seconds later, ending the fight. 
On April 17, 1999, Mosley made his 8th and final defense of the IBF lightweight title against former USBA super featherweight champion John Brown (19-5, 10 KOs) at the Fantasy Springs Casino in Indio, California. The fight was stopped after round 8, when the ringside doctor intervened. Mosley won the fight via TKO to retain his title. 
Mosley vacated his lightweight title and moved up two weight divisions to welterweight, scored two consecutive knockouts against Wilfredo Rivera and Willy Wise, setting up a huge fight against Oscar De La Hoya for the WBC welterweight title. 
Mosley defended his newly won titles on November 11, 2000, at the Madison Square Garden Theater in New York against Mexican boxer Antonio Diaz (35-2, 24 KOs). The fight lasted six rounds, after Mosley knocked Diaz down twice. Diaz was also down once in round 2. 
On March 10, 2001, Mosley was scheduled to fight unbeaten Australian Shannan Taylor (28-0-1, 18KOs) at Caesars Palace in Las Vegas. Shannan was knocked down once in the first round. He was losing all rounds, up until the end of the fifth round. Taylor lost the fight when he decided not to return for round 6. 
On July 21, 2001 Mosley easily beat IBO World super welterweight champion Adrian Stone (30-3-2, 23 KOs) knocking him out in round 3. The fight took place at Caesars Palace in Las Vegas. Stone moved down to welterweight for the first time in three years to challenge Mosley and was losing the first 2-round before being stopped. Following the win, Mosley said he would like to have a rematch with De La Hoya in a split 50/50 fight or a unification fight against unbeaten Vernon Forrest. 
Mosley next fought five months later in September against undefeated former Mexico welterweight champion Jose Luis Cruz (33-0-2, 28 KOs) in 10 round bout. Much like the Estrada fight, Mosley won a unanimous decision with scores of 96-94, 97-93, and 98-92. 
It was announced on August 15, 2007 that Mosley would challenge undefeated Miguel Cotto (30-0, 25 KOs) for his WBA welterweight title. The fight, being billed as "Fast & Furious" was announced to take place at the Madison Square Garden in New York on HBO PPV. 
On May 22, 2010, Mosley was stripped of his WBA (Super) welterweight title, due to not making a mandatory defense, which in turn made WBA Champion Vyacheslav Senchenko the sole WBA titlist in the welterweight division. 
Mosley officially retired after this bout, ending his career with a record of 46-8-1, 39 KO's. He went 0-3-1 in his last 4 fights. 
On August 16, 2017, Mosley announced his retirement after being a professional for 24 years. Speaking to ESPN, he said his body was no longer in a state where he could get through training due to a botched elbow surgery. In a statement, he said,  
"I went in for a minor arthroscopic surgery to remove a couple loose bone fragments from my elbow and the surgery turned into a whole ordeal after the surgeon admittedly 'accidentally' burned me on my forearm, leading to a sick infection and needing like four or five days of IV antibiotics and two weeks of antibiotics at home. It was crazy and surreal to learn that I could never fight again."
He retired with 61 fights in the paid ranks. He won 49, with 41 coming inside the distance, 10 losses, having only been stopped once, 1 draw and a no contest. 
In November 2002, Mosley married Jin Sheehan. The couple had three children before divorcing in 2010. He has a son, Shane Mosley Jr., from a previous relationship. Mosley Jr. made his professional debut in 2014. He also has 2 children with his current partner, Trista Pisani. 
The gall can be a smooth, globular or a spindle-shaped swelling on a shoot. The gall chamber is in the pith and contains pale orange larvae or pupae in separate chambers. Correct identification of the host species is important, as the gall of R. degeerii is similar to R. salicis. In Britain the gall on  purple willow (Salix purpurea) is recorded as R. degeerii. Elsewhere the gall has been found on S. daphnoides and S. elaeagnos. 
This article relates to members of the fly infraorder Bibionomorpha is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He was born in Slaidburn, West Riding of Yorkshire, England in 1825, and moved to the United States at the age of 23, arriving in New York City and moving on to Buffalo, New York, where he went into the slaughtering business for a couple of years. In 1850, he sold out and moved to Wisconsin, and became a farmer and rancher. In 1851, his younger brother Thomas Sanderson left Slaidburn and came to Wisconsin with his wife and children, joining his brother in Columbia County. 
As of 1862, when he first appeared in the Assembly, he was 36 years of age, and had been in Wisconsin for 12 years; he was at that time a resident of Cambria, and a member of the Republican Party. 
He was first elected to the Assembly for the 1862 session, representing the 3rd Columbia County district (Courtland, Fort Winnebago, Marcellon, Randolph, Scott, Springvale and Wyocena, succeeding James H. Bonney (also a farmer and a Republican). He was assigned to the standing committee on railroads. He was succeeded in the 1863 term by Yates Ashley, a fellow Republican. 
Sanderson (now living in Poynette) returned to the Assembly for the 1866 session, this time from the 2nd Columbia County district, succeeding Jesse Hand, another farmer and member of the Union Party (the label which the Republicans were using during this era). He was assigned to the committees on the expiration and re-enactment of laws; and on agriculture and manufactures. 
TASE plays a major role in the Israeli economy. TASE lists some 544 companies, 56 of which are also listed on stock exchanges in other countries. TASE also lists some 180 exchange-traded funds (ETFs), 60 government bonds, 500 corporate bonds, 591 exchange-traded notes (ETNs) and more than 1000 mutual funds. 
Yossi Beinart was appointed TASE CEO in January 2014 and was a Director at the Tel-Aviv Stock Exchange Clearing House Ltd and on the MAOF Clearing House Ltd board. Beinart died in August 2017, and was succeeded by Itai Ben-Zeev. Amnon Neubach has been the Chairman of the TASE Board since April 2014. 
In 2005, non-Israeli investment in TASE reached an all-time high of NIS 2 billion, while the TA-25 increased 34%. By the end of the year foreign investment banks UBS, Deutsche Bank, and HSBC had become members of TASE. 
In May 2008 Northern Trust started the first US exchange-traded fund on the NYSE based on TASE's benchmark, the TA-25 Index. 
In February 2007 the TASE signed a formal memorandum of understanding with the London Stock Exchange intended to smooth the trading of securities listed on both exchanges. At the time, 50 Israeli companies were listed on the London Stock Exchange. A similar memorandum of understanding was signed with The Nasdaq Stock Market in November 2007. NASDAQ at the time had 70 Israeli companies listed on the exchange, with a combined global market capitalization of over US$60 billion. 
In 1983, TASE moved to 54 Ahad Ha'am Street, Tel Aviv, where it remained for 31 years, until it moved in 2014 to its current location at 2 Ahuzat Bayit Street, Tel Aviv. 
The modern building covers an area of 22,600 square meters and has 14 floors. It is optimized for computer trading. Its computer systems are located in an underground bunker in case of emergencies, in which there is space for emergency personnel. Architectural critic Keshet Rosenblum praised the new building, due to its appropriate design, restraint in its form and public access. The lobby of the building is public and there is cafe and stock exchange museum. 
The Exchange offers four programs under which companies can list on the exchange: three programs for normal operating companies, and an additional venture program for development-stage technology companies. In addition, the TASE has a program for the listing of Limited Partnership Units. 
TASE links to the U.S. markets with a direct link to DTC, a subsidiary of the Depository Trust & Clearing Corporation, which facilitates the trading of dually listed securities. 
The TASE is regulated by the Securities Law (1968), and falls under the direct supervision of the Israel Securities Authority. 
The Katharine Seymour Day House is a historic house at 77 Forest Street in the historic Nook Farm district of Hartford, Connecticut.  Built in 1884 for a local businessman seeking to compete stylistically with the adjacent Mark Twain House, it is a good local example of Queen Anne architecture.  It now serves as the administrative center and library for the Harriet Beecher Stowe Center.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1971. 
The house now houses the center's administrative offices, and a research library containing many of Stowe's materials. 
On June 26, 2018 second phase of the bridge's reconstruction costing 19.6 million euros was initiated. 
A hidden grotto can be found in Hrajel next to a river that feeds Nahr el Kalb. The grotto is rumored to be a far upward extension of the Jeita grotto but it is currently closed to the public.  
According to the 17th-century historian and Maronite patriarch Istifan al-Duwayhi, Hrajel was settled by Shia Muslims from Baalbek in the 16th century. Ottoman tax records, which do not differentiate different Muslim groups from each other, indicate the village had 62 Muslim households and two bachelors in 1523, 40 Muslim households and 13 bachelors in 1530, and 49 Muslim households and eight bachelors in 1543. 
Darknall was educated at the Middle Temple. In 1522, he was married to a widow named Alice Goseborne, the daughter and coheiress of the Canterbury MP, Henry Goseborne. They had at least two sons and one daughter. 
Darknall was a Member of Parliament for Canterbury in 1529, 1536, 1542, 1547, and March 1553, and for Rochester in October 1553. 
This article about a 16th-century Member of the Parliament of England is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Wietse Zweitze Venema (born 1951) is a Dutch programmer and physicist best known for writing the Postfix email system. He also wrote TCP Wrapper and collaborated with Dan Farmer to produce the computer security tools SATAN and The Coroner's Toolkit. 
The Treasury and Finance Department (Basque: Eusko Jaurlaritzako Ogasun eta Finantza Saila; Spanish: Departamento de Hacienda y Finanzas ) is the finance department of the Basque Government. 
Edgenuity, formerly Education2020 (E2020), is a standard-based online learning resource for school districts, which teaches kindergarten through 12th-grade in core, elective, credit recovery, technical, and career subjects, through both remedial and accelerated work.  As of 2019, Edgenuity serves more than four million students in the United States.  The site has been used for virtual learning during the COVID-19 pandemic, and has received criticism from its users. 
Edgenuity was founded in 1988 as Education2020 Inc. (E2020), and in 2011, was purchased by the company Weld North for an estimated US$50 million dollars. In 2014, Edgenuity launched My Path, a program learning path alternative for reading and math grades 6-12th. The same year, Edgenuity partnered with SOPHIA Learning to offer additional credit options. 
Edgenuity is a virtual alternative, and uses pre-recorded videos and primarily focuses on struggling students, and sticking at pace. Along with pre-recorded lecture, Edgenuity uses interactives and real-world problems. In addition to helping students who need extra support, the software is often used by schools to help students who have failed courses get the credits they are missing. 
In 2020, Digital Promise awarded Edgenuity's Courseware, Mypath, and Pathblazer services with the Research-Based Design Product Certification. 
Teachers also showed frustration with how Edgenuity handles student organization in their contracts. In Providence, Rhode Island, teachers were given an average of 52 students to handle each and weren't able to properly communicate with all of them in an orderly manner. In St. Tammany Parish, Louisiana, some teachers were even given up to 600 students to manage via email each. 
In 2021, CEO Sari Factor released a statement addressing the issues arisen by the public. She stated how some districts were using the site in unintended ways, and schools that were following procedure were benefiting off the program. She also mentioned how the students to teacher ration was off-balance due to the school having a lack of employment, and also blamed student struggle on the struggles of COVID on system and education. 
The Russian National Time Trial Championships are held annually. They are a cycling race which decides the Russian cycling champion in the time trial discipline, several categories of rider. The event was first held in 1998 and was won by Oleg Zhukov. Vladimir Gusev holds the record of most victories with 4.  The current champion is Ilnur Zakarin. 
This cycling race article related to Italian cycling is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dan Kelly provided play-by-play for the Black Hawks during the 1978 playoffs. Kelly had become available because St. Louis missed the playoffs. Chicago Tribune beat writer Bob Verdi was the analyst. 
Belgium was represented by Sergio and the Ladies in the Eurovision Song Contest 2002 with the song Sister. 
Eurosong '02 was the national final that selected Belgium's entry in the Eurovision Song Contest 2002. The competition consisted of four semi-finals that took place on 20 January, 27 January, 3 February and 10 February 2002, followed by a final on 17 February 2002 where the winning song and artist were selected. All five shows took place at the VRT studios in Schelle, hosted by Bart Peeters and broadcast on TV1. 
During each of the five shows, the expert jury provided commentary and feedback to the artists and selected entries to advance in the competition. These experts were: 
On 6 June 2001, VRT opened a submission period for artists and composers to submit their songs, with the deadline concluding on 31 October 2001. 351 entries were submitted, and on 13 December 2001, the broadcaster announced the twenty-eight entries selected for the competition. 
The first semi-final took place on 20 January 2002. "Without Love" performed by Wuyts and Schepens proceeded to the final. "All Out of Love" performed by Sonny also proceeded to the final as one of the three highest scoring second-placed entries. 
The third semi-final took place on 3 February 2002. "Someday" performed by Spark proceeded to the final. 
The fourth semi-final took place on 10 February 2002. "Take This Heart" performed by Yasmina proceeded to the final. "Sister" performed by Sergio and the Ladies also proceeded to the final as one of the three highest scoring second-placed entries. 
The final took place on 17 February 2002. "Sister" performed by Sergio and the Ladies was selected as the winner. 
A post office was established at Mount Pisgah in 1848, and remained in operation until it was discontinued in 1907. 
Sharon Lovelace Blackburn (born May 7, 1950) is a Senior United States District Judge of the United States District Court for the Northern District of Alabama. 
On April 11, 1991, Blackburn was nominated by President George H. W. Bush to a new seat on the United States District Court for the Northern District of Alabama created by 104 Stat. 5089. She was confirmed by the United States Senate on May 24, 1991, and received her commission on May 30, 1991. She served as Chief Judge from 2006 to 2013. She assumed senior status on May 8, 2015. 
Highway 22 parallels State Highway 15 throughout its route.  Highway 22 also intersects with Highway 15 at Hutchinson. 
The southern terminus for Highway 22 is at the Iowa state line, near Kiester, where Highway 22 becomes Winnebago County Road R50 (140th Avenue) upon crossing the state line. 
State Highway 22 was authorized in 1920 from St. Peter to Paynesville. In 1934, it was extended south to the Iowa state line, and its northernmost section between Eden Valley and Paynesville became part of State Highway 55. 
The section of Highway 22 between Mankato and St. Peter follows the original route of U.S. Highway 169.  When the parallel route west of the Minnesota River was first completed in the late 1950s, it originally carried the Highway 22 designation for a few years until it was redesignated U.S. 169 and Highway 22 reverted to its original alignment. 
Additionally he took advanced interpretation courses with Jan-Willem Jansen at the Conservatoire of Toulouse and with Michel Bouvard at the Conservatoire of Paris. 
Jan Verschuren was appointed organist in Mill and Boxmeer, the Netherlands. In 1998 he has been appointed as university organist of the University Leiden, the Netherlands. In 2001 Jan Verschuren succeeded Folkert Grondsma as titular-organist of the Hartebrug Church in Leiden. Moreover in 2006 Jan Verschuren has been appointed as university-organist of the Eindhoven University of Technology in Eindhoven. 
Organ-recitals took him to many organs in the Netherlands, Austria, Belgium, Germany, France, Hungary, Italy, the Czech Republic and Poland. Moreover, Jan Verschuren has made CD-recordings and performed on the Dutch radio. 
Enfield Grammar School (abbreviated to EGS; also known as Enfield Grammar) is a boys' Comprehensive school and sixth form with academy status, founded in 1558, situated in Enfield Town in the London Borough of Enfield in North London. 
Enfield Grammar School was founded on 25 May 1558. The school's first known headmaster was William Bradshawe who was head until 1600. 
In 1623, when the Prounces estate property was settled in trust, Prounces house became the schoolmaster's residence. One headmaster, Robert Uvedale, while continuing in his post at EGS much to the consternation of the trustees and some parishioners opened another rival private (fee-paying) boarding-school, the Palace School, in about 1660, which survived until 1896. 
In 1967, it was amalgamated with Chace Boys School to form a comprehensive school that retained the name Enfield Grammar School. The two schools were separated again in 1970. Chace Boys School has since become co-educational and has changed its name to Chace Community School. 
Academic performance at Enfield Grammar School is outstanding, with students entering EGS with very high levels of attainment. Progress and attainment in the Sixth Form are also exceptional. In the Ofsted report from 2014, EGS was rated 'outstanding' in all areas, including Achievement, Behaviour and Safety of pupils; Quality of teaching, learning and assessment; Personal development and Welfare; 16 to 19 study programmes; and Leadership and Management. 
The upper school buildings are next to the Enfield Town Market Place and St. Andrew's Church, and have been extended several times since 1586. A new hall and further extensions were completed shortly before World War II. 
The school motto, which is incorporated in the school badge is 'Tant Que Je Puis', which is Old French, and means 'As much as I can'. It was taken from the Uvedale family because Dr. Robert Uvedale was master from 1664 to 1676. 
The houses at Enfield Grammar School were originally the basis of a wide range of other competitive internal activities such as drama, debating, competitive sports and so forth. The school's existing house system is used for some internal sporting activities. The names of the houses are Forty, Myddelton, Poynetts, Raleigh, St. Andrew's and Uvedale. 
There is separate admission into the Sixth Form, which accepts up to 140 students a year. This is based on pupils' GCSE results. 
Alfred Groyer (born 8 January 1959 in Villach) is an Austrian former ski jumper who competed from 1978 to 1984. He finished seventh in the individual normal hill event at the 1980 Winter Olympics in Lake Placid, New York. 
This biographical article relating to Austrian ski jumping is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1838,  in the Ottoman era,   el Kuzazeh  was noted as  Muslim village, in the  Er-Ramleh district. 
A European traveler reported that he passed Qazaza in the 1860s on his way to examine a nearby tell. 
Socin found from an official Ottoman village list from about 1870  that  Kezaze had a population of 133, in 89 houses,  though the population count included men only. It was also noted that it was located  two hours southeast of Shahma. Hartmann found that  Kezaze  had 85  houses. 
In 1882, the PEF's Survey of Western Palestine (SWP)  described   Kerazeh  as "a small village of adobe and stone at the edge of the hills, with gardens and a well." 
In the 1922 census of Palestine, conducted by the British Mandate authorities, Qezazeh  had a population of 472 Muslims,  increasing in the 1931 census to 649, still all Muslims, in a total of 150 residential houses. 
The villagers  maintained a village mosque and some owned shops. An elementary school was first established in Qazaza in 1922. In 1945 Qazaza joined with the villagers of Sajad and Jilya and established a common school for all the three villages. This school had 127 students at the time of its founding in 1945. 
In  the 1945 statistics   the population was 940, all Muslims,  while the total land area was 18,829  dunams, according to an official land and population survey. Of this, a total of 11,757 dunums were allocated to cereals, while 131 dunums were irrigated or used for orchards, while 38 dunams were classified as built-up urban areas. 
On 16 July 1948, Givati HQ informed General Staff\Operations that "our forces have entered the villages of Qazaza, Kheima, Jilya, Idnibba, Mughallis, expelled the inhabitants, [and] blown up and torched a number of houses. The area is at the moment clear of Arabs". 
Today, the village lands are used by the Israel Defense Forces. As a closed military zone, it is not known what became of Qazaza's mosque, its elementary school (which had served the villages of Sajad and Jilya as well) or its more than 150 homes. 
The present Old City was first settled in either the Greek or at the latest by Roman times. It was settled in the valley downhill from Tel Rumeida, considered to be the center of biblical Hebron. It was not until the start of the Abbasid Caliphate that the current city became the center of Hebron, building up around the focal point of the Cave of the Patriarchs. 
It became the third World Heritage Site in the State of Palestine in 2017, and was inscribed on the official List of World Heritage in Danger as "Palestine, Hebron/Al-Khalil Old Town". 
1. Tomb of the Patriarchs; 2. The Castle, partly ruined; 3. Pool; 4. Pool; 5. Old well; 6. Old well; 7. Bijurd mosque; 8. Aly Bukka mosque "the second chief building in Hebron"; 
The U.S has provided no funding to UNESCO since Palestine was admitted as a full member in 2011. The Obama administration cited a pre-existing law that prohibits funding any UN agency or affiliate that grants full membership to non-states, which was put in place after Palestine applied for UNESCO and WHO membership in April 1989. The U.S. and Israel were among just 14 of 194 members that voted against admitting the Palestinians in 2011. 
A net installed in the Old City to prevent garbage dropped by Israeli settlers into a Palestinian area. 
The Leeds Library is the oldest surviving subscription library of its type in the UK. It was founded in 1768, following an advertisement placed in the Leeds Intelligencer earlier that year. The first secretary was Joseph Priestley. In 1779, James Boswell wrote, "In Leeds, where one would not expect it, there is a very good public library, where strangers are treated with great civility." 
The library moved twice before settling in the purpose built premises on Commercial Street, Leeds on 4 July 1808. This building is a grade II* listed Greek Revival building by Thomas Johnson with major 1880-81 extension to the rear by Thomas Ambler. 
As of June 2020[update] the library has over 1000 members who pay an annual subscription. The library is estimated to have a stock of over 140 000 titles with 1,500 new books being added annually. It also contains more modern items such as audiobooks and DVDs.  The library's extensive collection is frequently used by researchers who are not members. 
The library holdings also incorporate the stock of the short lived Leeds Foreign Library. The Foreign Library was founded in 1778 and incorporated into the Leeds Library in 1814. 
Ross was sworn of the Privy Council of Ireland in 1902. In 1919 he was created a baronet. In 1921, in succession to Sir James Campbell, Ross was appointed Lord Chancellor of Ireland. He was to be the last holder of that office, which was abolished in December 1922. Ross retired to London, but later he returned to live in Northern Ireland. 
He was president of the St John Ambulance Brigade in Ireland and during the First World War was in control of all Red Cross activities in southern Ireland. In 1914 he was made a Knight of Grace of the Grand Priory of the Order of St John of Jerusalem. During the war he was also chairman of the Irish board for the selection of candidates for commissions in the British army. 
In 1882 Ross married Katherine Mary Jeffcock (d. 1932), who was the only daughter of Lieutenant-Colonel Deane Mann, of Dunmoyle and Corvey Lodge, County Tyrone  and his wife Mary Stobart Jeffcock.  They  had one son, Major  Sir Ronald Deane Ross MC MP, and two daughters, Irene and May, the younger of whom predeceased her father. Ross died, of bronchial pneumonia, at his home, Dunmoyle Lodge, Sixmilecross, Co. Tyrone, on 17 August 1935, and was succeeded as the second baronet by his son. 
Oligopolies can result from various forms of collusion that reduce market competition. This leads to higher prices for consumers and lower wages for the employees of oligopolies. In the absence of collusion among market participants, an oligopoly will develop into a situation similar to perfect competition. Oligopolists have their own market structure. 
Thus the welfare analysis of oligopolies is sensitive to the parameter values used to define the market's structure. In particular, the level of dead weight loss is hard to measure. The study of product differentiation indicates that oligopolies might also create excessive levels of differentiation in order to stifle competition, as they could gain certain marker power by offering somewhat differentiated products. 
When compared with Cournot and Bertrand's model, it can be seen that price competition is more aggressive and competitive, and also it is easier to sustain collusion under price competition. 
For fighting collusion and cartels in an oligopoly market, competition authorities have taken measures or practices to effectively discover, prosecute and penalize them. Leniency program and economic analysis (screening) are currently two popular mechanisms. 
To determine the Nash equilibrium you can solve the equations simultaneously. The equilibrium quantities can also be determined graphically. The equilibrium solution would be at the intersection of the two reaction functions. Note that if you graph the functions the axes represent quantities. The reaction functions are not necessarily symmetric. The firms may face differing cost functions in which case the reaction functions would not be identical nor would the equilibrium quantities. 
Neither firm has any reason to change strategy. If the firm raises prices it will lose all its customers. If the firm lowers price P < MC then it will be losing money on every unit sold. 
The gap in the marginal revenue curve means that marginal costs can fluctuate without changing equilibrium price and quantity. Thus prices tend to be rigid. 
Many industries have been cited as oligopolistic, including civil aviation, agricultural pesticides, electricity, and platinum group metal mining. In most countries, the telecommunications sector is characterized by an oligopolistic market structure. Rail freight markets in the European Union have an oligopolistic structure. In the United States, industries that have identified as oligopolistic include food processing, funeral services, sugar refining, beer, pulp and paper, , automobiles 
Market power and market concentration can be estimated or quantified using several different tools and measurements, including the Lerner index, stochastic frontier analysis, and New Empirical Industrial Organization (NEIO) modeling, as well as the Herfindahl-Hirschman index. 
In an oligopoly, firms operate under imperfect competition. With the fierce price competitiveness created by this sticky-upward demand curve, firms use non-price competition in order to accrue greater revenue and market share. 
This biographical article relating to Kazakhstani association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Created by John Broome and Carmine Infantino, the character made his first appearance in Showcase #8 (June 1957). 
In the 2006 "One Year Later" storyline, he and several other Rogues are approached by Inertia with a plan to kill the Flash (then Barry Allen). Though Inertia was defeated, Captain Cold, Weather Wizard, Heat Wave, Mirror Master and Abra Kadabra killed Bart with a combined barrage of their elemental weapons. He, Heat Wave, and Weather Wizard seemed to express guilt, however, after learning the identity of the Flash and how young he was. 
Captain Cold is one of the exiled villains featured in the 2007-08 miniseries Salvation Run along with his fellow Rogues: Heat Wave, Weather Wizard, Mirror Master, and Abra Kadabra. 
In the 2009 The Flash: Rebirth miniseries, Captain Cold is seen with the other Rogues, reading about Barry Allen's return and claiming that they would need more of the Rogues. The Rogues are still debating Allen's return, with Cold saying it's time to pull out their contingency plan that Scudder came up with, stating "In case The Flash returns, break glass." 
In The Flash vol. 3, Captain Cold and the Rogues visit Sam Scudder's old hideout and unveil a giant mirror with the words In Case of Flash: Break Glass written on it and release beings from a Mirror World upon breaking it. However, Captain Cold is told by Mirror Master he had discovered that the giant mirror is actually a slow acting poison. 
In the Watchmen sequel Doomsday Clock, Captain Cold and his fellow Rogues are among the villains that attend the underground meeting held by Riddler that talks about the Superman Theory. 
Like the majority of the Flash's Rogues, Snart had no innate superhuman powers. He instead relied on his cold guns and instincts. Over the years, Snart had modified his weapons to allow a variety of effects such as: 
Fellow ice-based villain Mr. Freeze has noted that Cold is the only cold-themed villain in the DC Universe to have mastered "absolute zero" with his weapons. 
The boys' doubles of the tournament 2019 BWF World Junior Championships will be held from 7 to 13 October 2019. The defending champions is Di Zijian/Wang Chang from China. 
Shin Dong-hyuk (also known as Frank Shin) is a fictional character portrayed by Bae Yong-joon in the 2001 South Korean television drama series Hotelier. The character also appeared in a cameo appearance in the Japanese version television series of the same name, which was produced by Asahi TV. 
Shin was an attorney and takeover businessman of M&A, and is a Korean American. As a child, he had emigrated from South Korea to the United States. 
Shin reappeared as a minor role in the Japanese version of Hotelier, produced by TV Asahi, and was seen mainly in the first episode as well as a few cameo appearances in some of the subsequent episodes. In the Japanese version, he was a hotelier expert working in the M&A company, and Odagiri Kyoko (played by Ueto Aya) approached Shin for advice after the manager of  Tokyo Ocean Hotel fell ill at the time when it went into a period of financial crisis. 
Antonio Gonzaga Netto, or more known as Toni Netto is a former Brazilian football player and manager. 
He managed teams in Middle East (Kuwait, Oman, Qatar and Saudi Arabia) and Southeast Asia (Malaysia and Indonesia) during his career. 
In Malaysia, arguably his most well known successful stint in Perak FA from 2002 to 2005, bringing 2 league titles (Malaysia Premier One, predecessor to Malaysia Super League) and 2 cup titles (Malaysia FA Cup and Malaysia Charity Shield) to Perak. This includes winning the first league title for Perak in 13 years, in his debut year in 2002. For his services to Perak football, he received the Paduka Mahkota Perak award from Sultan of Perak, Raja Azlan Shah in 2005. 
He also managed Persipura Jayapura in early 2006, after his stint with Perak. But when the defending Indonesian champion made the worst start to the 2006 championship, losing two and drawing two of their first four matches, he was released in February 2006 along with his assistant Yusak Susanto. Later in the same year he was back in Malaysia for a short spell with struggling club MPPJ FC. 
This biographical article related to association football in Brazil is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
On 2 August 2012, Mera joined Russian Premier League side FC Alania Vladikavkaz on a three-year contract. 
Lucy Rose Doolan (born 11 December 1987) is a New Zealand former cricketer who played as an all-rounder, batting right-handed and bowling right-arm off break. She appeared in 40 One Day Internationals and 33 Twenty20 Internationals for New Zealand between 2008 and 2013. She played domestic cricket for Wellington Blaze, as well as stints for Essex, Nottinghamshire and South Australia. In March 2019, she announced her retirement from all forms of cricket. 
This biographical article related to a New Zealand cricket person born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
On February 4, Williams announced Flowers for Vases / Descansos via social media a day before its release, including the album's credits, also explaining that the album serves as a prequel or "detour" from her first studio album Petals for Armor. 
Flowers for Vases / Descansos was met with positive reviews from music critics. At Metacritic, which assigns a normalized score out of 100 to ratings from publications, the album received an average score of 79 based on 15 reviews, indicating "generally favorable reviews". 
The Center for Italian Modern Art is an American art museum and research center in the SoHo district of Manhattan, in New York. It specializes in Italian modern and contemporary art. It was started in 2013, and is a 501(c)(3) organization. It publishes an online journal, Italian Modern Art,[citation needed] and offers fellowships for study at the center or in Italy. 
Heilbronner Spielvereinigung was the younger side, founded in 1907 as Sportverein Adler. This club joined VfR for the first time in 1907, but was re-formed as a separate side in 1927. They joined Turnerbund Heilbronn in 1933 to form Heilbronner Spvgg 07. Through the years, the new club maintained good relations with VfR Heilbronn in all its incarnations, until the two sides finally merged in 2003. 
Heilbronner SpVgg never enjoyed even that level of success, only managing to work their way up to the Landesliga (VI) before the merger. 
Trimyristin is an ester with the chemical formula C45H86O6.  It is a saturated fat which is the triglyceride of myristic acid. Trimyristin is a white to yellowish-gray solid that is insoluble in water, but soluble in ethanol, acetone, benzene, chloroform, dichloromethane, ether, and TBME. 
Conner Duthie (born 2 February 1997) is a Scottish footballer, who plays as a midfielder or striker for Scottish League One side Dumbarton. He has previously played for Hibernian, Dunfermline Athletic, Spartans, Stenhousemuir and Forfar Athletic. 
Jeffery Bernard Simmons Jr. (born July 28, 1997) is an American football defensive end for the Tennessee Titans of the National Football League (NFL). He played college football at Mississippi State. 
After a standout career playing at Noxubee County High School in Mississippi, Simmons was considered a five-star prospect and committed to Mississippi State over Alabama and Ole Miss. 
Simmons played in 12 games, starting three, as a true freshman in 2016. He had a breakout season in 2017 and was a consensus selection to the 2017 All-SEC football team.  On December 20, 2018, Simmons declared for the 2019 NFL Draft. On February 12, 2019, Simmons tore his ACL while training for the draft. 
On May 22, 2019, Simmons signed a four-year $12.66 million rookie contract with a team option for a fifth year with a $7.23 million signing bonus. He was placed on the reserve/non-football injury list to start the 2019 season while recovering from his torn ACL. 
In college, Simmons was a two-time member of the SEC Academic Honor Roll. Simmons' brother, Dylan Bradley, played football at Southern Miss and then spent time with the Minnesota Vikings while his uncle, Jason Hatcher, played 10 total seasons with the Dallas Cowboys and Washington Redskins. Away from football, Simmons enjoys fishing and spending time outdoors. He has a son named Jeffery Jr. and two sisters, Brooke and Ashley. 
"I do want to say another thing. No. 98 [Simmons] for the Titans - I had that guy spit in my face today. I just want to put him on notice in the media. I've never done this in my career, but I just want to let you know that there's a right way and a wrong way to play football. That guy did not do it the right way today."
The oni was chosen on a rotating basis, from a branch of the ruling dynasty. Once a member was selected, they were secluded from the rest. Below the oni, in the state there were: palace officials, town chiefs, and rulers of outlying dependencies. The Ife model of government was adapted at Oyo. Eventually, Oyo turned into a constitutional monarchy, but this was not the actual government. Unlike the Yoruba, Oyo had cavalry forces. This helped develop trading further north. 
Bornu's prosperity depended on the trans-Sudanic slave trade and the desert trade in salt and livestock. The need to protect its commercial interests compelled Bornu to intervene in Kanem, which continued to be a theater of war throughout the 15th and into the 16th centuries. Despite its relative political weakness in this period, Bornu's court and mosques under the patronage of a line of scholarly kings earned fame as centers of Islamic culture and learning. 
Kapp Borthen is a headland in Wedel Jarlsberg Land at Spitsbergen, Svalbard. It is located at the western coast of Spitsbergen, at the front of the glacier Torellbreen.  The headland is named after Norwegian ship-owner Harry Borthen. 
Cirrhochrista diploschalis is a moth in the family Crambidae. It is found in Papua New Guinea, on the D'Entrecasteaux Islands (Fergusson Island). 
It is said that Basir was on his deathbed when a letter from Muhammad with permission to return to Medina reached him. He died while holding Muhammad's letter in his hand. 
Ibn Hajar al-Asqalani's Fath al-Bari contains one of the more detailed accounts of Abu Basir's life. 
Jalan Kesang Tasik (Malacca state route M112 and Johor state route J112) is a major road in Malacca and Johor state, Malaysia. 
In some cases an observatory would move to a new location, or the equatorial telescope itself would be removed. The space would then be converted, for example, into use as a classroom or library. These peculiar rooms can sometimes be found in buildings at old colleges and towns, with their former use long forgotten. 
This article related to a type of room in a building is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
SS Lexington was an American Passenger ship that collided with Jane Christenson and sank on 2 January 1935 on the East River in New York City while carrying general cargo and 201 passengers and crew from New York to Providence, Rhode Island. 
Short Stories is a studio album by the Kronos Quartet, containing works by Elliott Sharp, Willie Dixon, John Oswald, John Zorn, Henry Cowell, Steven Mackey, Scott Johnson, Sofia Gubaidulina, and Pandit Pran Nath. 
AllMusic's "Blue" Gene Tyranny describes this album as a, "fascinating collection," of nine pieces by, "very different composers," and that, "the Kronos Quartet is in top form throughout all these selections." A Wired review says that, "a fine mesh of brains and guts, Short Stories is an eclectic roller-coaster ride through 20th-century music." 
The 1936 NFL season was the 17th regular season of the National Football League. For the first time since the league was founded, there were no team transactions (neither a club folded nor did a new one join the NFL), and all league teams played the same number of games. 
The season ended when the Green Bay Packers defeated the Boston Redskins in the NFL Championship Game at the Polo Grounds in New York City. This was the first NFL title game to be held at a neutral venue, and is also the only time in NFL history that a team with the home field advantage declined to play at their own stadium, and elected to play at a neutral site. 
While the Eastern Division champion Redskins were the host team, their owner, George Preston Marshall, the Packers and the League mutually agreed to move the game from Fenway Park due to low ticket sales in Boston. 
The 1936 NFL Draft, the first ever draft held by the NFL, was held on February 8, 1936 at Philadelphia's Ritz-Carlton Hotel. With the first pick, the Philadelphia Eagles selected halfback Jay Berwanger from the University of Chicago. 
The Central America bioregion is a biogeographic region comprising southern Mexico and Central America. 
The bioregion covers the southern portion of Mexico, all of Belize, Costa Rica, El Salvador, Guatemala, Honduras, and Nicaragua, and all but easternmost Panama. 
WWF defines bioregions as "geographic clusters of ecoregions that may span several habitat types, but have strong biogeographic affinities, particularly at taxonomic levels higher than the species level (genus, family)." 
The bioregion lies in the tropics, and is home to tropical moist broadleaf forests, tropical dry broadleaf forests, and tropical coniferous forests. The higher mountains are home to cool-climate montane forests, grasslands and shrublands. 
Central America connects North America to South America. The land bridge was completed 2.8 million years ago, when the Isthmus of Panama was formed, linking the two continents for the first time in tens of millions of years. The resulting Great American Interchange of animals and plants shaped the flora and fauna of the Central America bioregion. 
Large mammals include the white-lipped peccary (Tayassu pecari), Baird's tapir (Tapirus bairdii), white-tailed deer (Odocoileus virginianus), Central American red brocket (Mazama temama), Yucatan brown brocket (Mazama pandora), giant anteater (Myrmecophaga tridactyla), brown-throated sloth (Bradypus variegatus), jaguar (Panthera onca), cougar (Puma concolor), and ocelot (Leopardus pardalis). 
Plants of South American origin came to dominate the tropical lowlands of Central America, as did South American freshwater fish and invertebrates. 95% of Central American freshwater fish are South American in origin, with only the Tropical gar (Atractosteus tropicus), three clupeids (Dorosoma), a catostomid (Ictiobus), and an ictalurid (Ictalurus) of North American origin. 
The montane vegetation of the region is distinct from the lowland vegetation, and includes species with origins in temperate North America, including oaks (Quercus), Pines (Pinus) and alders (Alnus), as well as a some species with origins in temperate South America, including Weinmannia and Drimys. 
Churchtown railway station was on the West Lancashire Railway (WLR) in England. It opened in 1878 and served the Southport suburb of Churchtown. 
In the Churchtown area, the railway ran above the streets on an embankment, and crossed Cambridge Road on an iron bridge. The station was on the east side of Cambridge Road immediately after the bridge, with the booking office situated at street level, on the westbound side of the station, roughly where Churchtown Medical Centre stands today. 
Originally services ran from Southport Central to Preston Fishergate Hill. However, upon the WLR's absorption by the Lancashire and Yorkshire Railway in 1901, both termini were closed to passengers and became goods depots. Services then ran from Southport Chapel Street to Preston. 
Upon closure of the West Lancashire Railway in 1964, Churchtown station was demolished within days, to prevent any possible acts of vandalism and arson, as the station had been made entirely of wood (as with Penwortham Cop Lane railway station), along with both of its platforms. 
Draco volans, also commonly known as the common flying dragon, is a species of lizard in the family Agamidae. The species is endemic to Southeast Asia. Like other members of genus Draco, this species has the ability to glide using winglike lateral extensions of skin called patagia. 
The coloration of the patagia and the dewlap play key roles in the courtship of D. volans, with the males stretching out and displaying their patagia and dewlaps to get the attention of the females. 
D. volans is diurnal, and is "commonly seen running along branches, displaying, and gliding". The species is exclusively arboreal. 
D. volans feeds mainly on ants, and possibly other insects. A study was conducted in Eastern Mindanao, Philippines, which found that the species exclusively feeds on ants. 
D. volans is commonly found in early second growth forests, in open secondary forest, and on forest edges. 
The "wings" of D. volans are supported by its ribs, which form the skeleton of the patagia. However, its elongated ribs are superadded to aid forming its "wings", and not to assist respiration. 
This species is considered a passive glider, or parachutist. However, previous studies have also shown that it can be considered a gliding animal. This means that it doesn't have to deal with the aerodynamic and metabolic imperatives required for active flight. 
The Club Nintendo/My Nintendo version of Flipnote Studio 3D limits the sharing of Flipnotes to local wireless between 3DS systems, though users may still export their creations to SD cards and download Flipnotes from the DSi version. 
A community-developed Flipnote Gallery: World service was created from the Nintendo DSi Library feature of European and American versions of Flipnote Studio 3D named Kaeru Gallery (formerly Project Kaeru and kaeru:world). However, this service is only able to be accessed with a modified Nintendo 3DS. 
The Jordan national rugby team represents Jordan in international rugby union. They have yet to make their debut at the Rugby World Cup. 
Jordan played their first test match against Lebanon on May the 14th, 2010, in Dubai. Despite losing 27-8 they won the Division 4 title of the 2010 HSBC Asian Five Nations. 
He was educated at the Seminary of Imola, from 1922 until 1925 as well as the Regional Seminary Benedetto XV in Bologna from 1927 until 1934 where he earned a master's degree in dogmatic theology. He continued his studies at the Pontifical Institute "S. Apollinare" in Rome where he earned a doctorate utroque iuris (in both canon and civil law), with his thesis on De vita et operibus Alexandri Tartagni de Imola, 1939. 
This biographical article related to a Spanish association football goalkeeper is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Grandidierites appear bluer in color the more iron (Fe) they contain. A recently discovered gemstone, blue ominelite, is the Fe-analogue (Fe, Mg) to grandidierite (Mg, Fe). 
Grandidierites display strong trichroic pleochroism. That means that it can show three different colors depending on the viewing angle: dark blue-green, colorless (sometimes a very light yellow), or dark green. 
While trichroism can usually help distinguish grandidierites from other gems, lazulites can occur with blue-green colors and show colorless/blue/dark blue pleochroism. Nevertheless, lazulites have somewhat higher refractive indices and specific gravity. Grandidierites also have greater hardness, with a 7.5 on the Mohs scale. 
Large transparant faceted grandidierite specimens are extremely rare. The largest cut specimen currently known to the GIA weighs in at 763.5 carats. 
Megalodon is an extinct genus of bivalve molluscs that reportedly lived from the Devonian to the Jurassic period. It is not clear, however, that all the fossils assigned to Megalodon from that span of time really belong in the same genus. Jurassic relatives of Megalodon such as Pachyrisma grande were closely related to the rudists. 
Anwar Ratol (sometimes spelt Anwar Rataul) is a small, yellow variety of mango known for its sweetness and fiberlessness. It is sometimes called the 'mini powerhouse'. It is cultivated in the Punjab and Sindh regions of Pakistan, and near the village of Rataul in Uttar Pradesh, India. It is very sweet in taste with less fiber. 
The early season variety is fragile and prone to the climate elements. Much of the crop is destroyed by strong wind and heavy rain, but it is also the most popular and sweeter of the two varieties. Its growing season is very short - just a few weeks in May and June. 
The late season variety is more stable, with a thicker skin and is less sweet. It grows in July and August. 
Since 1981, Pakistan has been sending Anwar Ratol to heads of state and diplomats as part of its mango diplomacy to promote their mangoes around the world and create better relations with other countries like Australia and India. 
Stanyslav Kashtanov (born 31 July 1984 in Donetsk) is a Ukrainian (until 2014) and Russian (since 2015) boxer. 
This biographical article related to a Ukrainian boxer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Russian boxer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mellish was called in 1882 to the Bar at the Inner Temple. Instead of practicing law, he had a career in Nottinghamshire County government and served as a magistrate. He attained the rank of lieutenant-colonel of the Nottinghamshire Volunteers and Territorial Force.[citation needed] 
In competitive rifle shooting he represented England in the Elcho Shield in over twenty occasions at Wimbledon and Bisley. 
Frank Allen (born Francis Renaud McNeice, 14 December 1943, Hayes, Middlesex, England) is an English bass guitarist. 
He has played bass guitar with Cliff Bennett and the Rebel Rousers and The Searchers (since 1964 when he replaced original bass guitarist Tony Jackson), and remained with  them until they played their final gig in 2019. Allen joined Cliff Bennett and the Rebel Rousers as rhythm guitarist in 1961, and changed over to bass guitar in early 1962, following the departure of Ben Jordan. 
When Tony Jackson left the Searchers in August 1964 after a string of hits (including "Sweets for My Sweet", "Sugar and Spice" and "Needles and Pins"), Allen was asked to join the group. They then recorded "When You Walk in the Room",  with Mike Pender and Frank Allen singing a dual lead line. 
Allen wrote a book of touring recollections called Travelling Man in 1999. His definitive and detailed biography of the Searchers entitled The Searchers And Me - A History of the Legendary Sixties Hitmakers was published in April 2009. 
Carr won the title of Miss Teen International 2011 as Miss Teen Virginia International in Chicago, Illinois . She also received the Preliminary Fun Fashion Award, Photogenic Award, and was the winner of the Go Red Online Voting Award.  She traveled over 100,000 miles during her reign as an advocate for animals and the International Pageants national platform - The American Heart Association . Her crowning moment was featured in Times Square, New York. 
Carr also won the title of Miss Tennessee International 2016 as Miss Tri-Cities International in Franklin, Tennessee on April 2, 2016. She also received the Woman of Excellence Award, Community Service Award, and Best Overall Evening Gown Award. She will compete for the title of Miss International 2016 in Jacksonville, Florida in July 2016. 
Research Project Intern for The Humane Society of the United States at their corporate headquarters in Gaithersburg, MD - Summer 2015  
Advocate for the Stop Puppies Mills Campaign at the International Animal Care Expo 2012, Las Vegas, NV resulting in the closing of a loophole in the Animal Welfare Act for online breeders  
Appreciation Award from the American Heart Association 2012 - "For your support of the mission of the American Heart Association" 
Certificate of Recognition awarded by the Student Outreach Department of The Humane Society of the United States  
Publications for The Humane Society of the United States to supplement internationally aired webinars for Humane Society Academy. Researched and written by Jurnee Carr as an intern at The Humane Society of the United States corporate headquarters in Gaithersburg, Maryland in summer 2015. 
Nidhamu is a recording by the jazz musician Sun Ra and his Astro-Intergalactic-Infinity Arkestra, documenting their first visit to Egypt. 
Tracks 1-3 were recorded live at the Ballon Theatre in Cairo on December 17, 1971; track 4 is a solo keyboard performance recorded a week previously. 
Oberthueria guiteli is a species of beetle in the family Carabidae, the only species in the genus Oberthueria. 
The series ended on September 18 after 50 episodes. The 49th episode of the series aired on September 12, 2021 logged a national average viewership of 32.6% with 5.8 million viewers watching the episode, it placed the series at 7th rank among 'Top 50 series per nationwide viewers in Korea'. 
The series opens with the murder of a mother that is committed during  parent's divorce proceedings and all members of the Lee family and the extended family are suspected of murder. This series further tells the suspenseful but humorous story of the aftermath of the murder. 
Meanwhile, since Han Ye-seul was 12, he had dreamt of becoming a trot singer.After dropping out of high school, he came to Seoul to pursue his dream.He is hard-working,kind and righteous. 
With this series Yoon Joo-sang is celebrating his 50th year of debut. He along with Go Won-hee, Ji Sung-won, Song Young-jae and Kim Na-yoon got an opportunity to come together again after 2015 TV series The Stars Are Shining. The cast line up was confirmed in December 2020. 
As per Nielsen Korea, the 49th episode aired on September 12, 2021 logged a national average viewership of 32.6% with 5.8 million viewers watching the episode, thereby breaking its own highest ratings. It also takes the series at 7th place among 'Top 50 series per nationwide viewers in Korea'. 
Savannah's website is split into two domain names: savannah.gnu.org for software that is officially part of the GNU Project, and savannah.nongnu.org for all other software. 
Unlike SourceForge or GitHub, Savannah's focus is for hosting free software projects and has very strict hosting policies, including a ban against the use of non-free formats (such as Macromedia Flash[citation needed]) to ensure that only free software is hosted.  When registering a project, project submitters have to state which free software license the project uses. 
Project owners do not have the freedom of deleting their submitted projects on their own wish and the staff has a policy of refusing all deletion requests, unless the project was approved by mistake or has always been empty. 
CERN took interest in the sourcecode and hired Mathieu Roy, a savannah-hacker, to work in Geneva. It led to the development of Savane (software) starting in 2003. 
GNU Savannah was totally or partly offline for months and, ultimately, did not move to GForge, which itself turned into proprietary software. 
Mitchell Gregory Reginald Austin (born 3 April 1991) is a professional association football player who plays as a winger. 
Born in England to an Australian father, Austin began his senior career at Stalybridge Celtic in 2010. Three years later, he joined Cambridge United and, after loans to Lincoln City, Brackley Town and Southport in 2014, Austin moved to Australian side Central Coast Mariners in 2015. He remained in Australia for four further years, playing at Melbourne Victory, Newcastle Jets and Sydney FC. In 2019 Austin moved to Scotland, playing one year for Partick Thistle. 
Mitch Austin was born in Rochdale, Greater Manchester on 3 April 1991. He has a twin sister named Brittany. His father is the Australian rugby league, and rugby union footballer Greg Austin. He left England at the age of eight when his father retired from playing professional rugby and moved the family back to Australia. 
Mitch Austin was a Manly United junior in Sydney, Australia. He was spotted by the scouts of Rotherham United in 2009 whilst on a tour of the UK with Manly United and was offered a scholarship with the youth academy. 
On 13 September 2014, he made his professional debut for Cambridge United against Dagenham and Redbridge 
In May 2015, Cambridge United announced, that Austin was one out of 12 players, who would leave the club in the summer 2015 expressing his wish to return to Australia . 
On 1 June 2015, Central Coast Mariners announced that they had signed Austin to a two-year contract. After making 23 appearances in the first year of his contract, Austin asked to terminate his second year and was released by Central Coast Mariners. 
On 17 June 2016, Melbourne Victory confirmed the signing of Austin as a straight swap for winger Connor Pain. 
He made an outstanding start to his Victory career, earning Man of the Match honours in the club's pre-season friendly win over Juventus at the MCG. 
Austin suffered an anterior cruciate ligament injury in training in November 2017, ruling him out for several months. 
On 1 February 2018, Austin was selected to represent Melbourne Victory in the E-League's inaugural season, alongside Mouad Zwed, becoming one of a handful of professional football players to compete in e-sports as well. 
With George Dantzig and D. R. Fulkerson, Johnson pioneered the use of cutting-plane methods for integer linear programming in solving the travelling salesman problem. He also made important contributions to the theory of scheduling production processes, writing an early paper on the flow shop scheduling problem that set the stage for much future research. 
This biographical article relating to a South Korean baseball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The game features many minigames and three main modes, and can be played alone or head-to-head with a second player. 
The game received mixed reviews from critics, receiving a 69 out of 100 from Metacritic. Louis Bedigian on Gamezone gave it a 5 out of 10, stating that "while the game is successful in some areas and downright creative in others, Active Life: Outdoor Challenge is not be the most entertaining or most beneficial way to get in shape." Nintendo World Report reviewed the game, saying that the game "is a very promising start to a series and a great complement to Wii Fit." 
On a few occasions, the energy of her Honey System goes out of control and begins to destroy everything that she touches. When this happens, Honey sleeps for three days and then goes into a berserk mode. To prevent this, Seiji has a device that will drain away the excess energy and return her to normal. To date, this has only occurred twice. 
After finding out that both Miki and Yuki could transform as well, she tries to unite the three of them against Panther Claw. However, their clashing personalities have made this difficult. It was also revealed that she was the one who buried her father, Doctor Kisaragi, one year ago. However, she does not know the cause of his death. 
This version of Cutie Honey is more empty-headed than her previous incarnations, possessing a very poor grasp of social conventions and an almost perpetually upbeat attitude, which has caused animosity amongst her peers in her class. Unlike the original where she was a Catholic school girl, in this version she attends a standard all-girls high school. 
He constantly goes after different women. He confesses his love for Saotome Miki in a letter that he gives her, which she then proceed to tear up in front of him. He also expresses feelings for Yuki, but she also rejects him. Although he is rejected by both girls, he still continues to court them, especially Yuki. 
Some time after the final battle was over, Hayami returned to the Kisaragi residence to gather up Doctor Kisaragi's research.  His original intention was to safeguard the information from Panther Claw and similar criminal organizations, but after discovering Doctor Kisaragi's notebook and learning the truth about Honey's creation, as well as Miki and Yuki, he instead throws all of Doctor Kisaragi's work in a burn barrel, effectively destroying it. 
Yuki was originally a young girl living in a hospital.  She was dying of a terminal disease when she was discovered by Doctor Kisaragi, who remade her in a second attempt to recreate his daughter.  The experiment was initially a success, but just like with Miki, she was eventually discarded when flaws were shown in her system. 
Natsuko seems a bit nerdy, and she has glasses that she constantly adjusts. She often expresses concern about her looks, the size of her breasts being an especial worry for her. 
He runs an illegal gambling operation, creating and executing spectacular bets for the wealthy elite to place their money on. In the first episode, for example, he breaks three men out of prison, gives them advanced weaponry and takes bets on who will last the longest. However, he also rigs the results of these gambles by using his henchmen to interfere. 
His role in Panther Claw is to create the cybernetic "human weapons" that they use as henchmen and in auctions to sell for profit. He accomplishes this using a medical care group as a front, using hospitals to change innocent patients into brainwashed bio-mechanical weapons. 
In combat, she uses tekagi-shuko. By putting on a special half-mask, she can transform into her own armored form resembling a harlequin. In this form she can extend her hair to bind her opponents. 
Hiromi was perhaps the most successful of the four Panther Claw leaders in obtaining the Honey System had she not lost control of Yuki. When Honey destroys the backup limiter, Hiromi assumes that Yuki was broken, but later suffered the same fate as Yuji as the liberated Yuki once again used "Honey Flash" and penetrated her with the chakram. In death, Hiromi asks her husband and son to "take care of the rest" before dissolving into molecules, leaving behind a starfish and various fishes. 
She uses various frozen sea creatures as her weapons, from exploding starfish she throws like shurikens to a large fish which she wields like a sword. Naturally, they lose their effectiveness once they have thawed. Hiromi's most powerful weapon is a rocket launcher installed within her stomach. 
Dasi Ruz (professionally also known as Ingrid Ruz) is an Australian actress who has been in several films and television shows. 
Ruz is known for her role in the 2007 action-thriller film, The Condemned, written and directed by Scott Wiper. Ruz's character is Rosa, who was awaiting execution in Mexico with her husband, Paco. Rosa and her husband are chosen as contestants and taken to an isolated island, where the program would take place. 
This article about an Australian film and television actor is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Thad Aaron Cockrell is an American singer-songwriter. He has released five solo albums, along with a collaborative album with Caitlin Cary and two albums with LEAGUES. Cockrell often writes emotional songs with the intent of inclusion. 
Cockrell, the son of a Baptist pastor, grew up mostly in Tampa, Florida. His father was the pastor of an Independent Fundamental Baptist Church, and president of Cockrell's school.  While in school, Cockrell discovered his love of country music and rock n' roll, which was forbidden in his home. Cockrell cites bands such as The Everly Brothers, The Cure, and Nelson as early influences. 
After high school Cockrell went on to graduate from Liberty University. He then studied at the Southeastern Baptist Theological Seminary in Wake Forest, North Carolina. It was there that Cockrell would begin writing songs. 
In 2003 Cockrell again worked with producer Stamey for his second release Warmth and Beauty. CMT.com picked the album as a top independent release. Allmusic proclaimed that the album is "pure country music, untainted by commercial considerations and without rock influences". Cary and Tift Merritt lent harmony vocals on the song "Why Go". 
Cockrell again collaborated with Cary for the 2005 duet album Begonias.  A review in the Washington Post praises the album for conveying the complexities of marriage, writing that it is "as good a traditional country album as we're likely to hear this year". Alternative country magazine No Depression praises Cockrell's lyrics as "straightforward simplicity", and also compliments the singing on the album as "intimate, immediate and intentionally under-rehearsed to capture an edge of freshness". 
During his time in Nashville, Cockrell co-wrote and recorded a duet with Mindy Smith for her 2007 Christmas album My Holiday, entitled "I Know the Reason". 
In the spring of 2016, Cockrell announced that he was working on his fifth solo album If In Case You Feel The Same, which was released via ATO Records in 2020. 
The following is a partial list of minor planets, running from minor-planet number 132001 through 133000, inclusive. The primary data for this and other partial lists is based on JPL's "Small-Body Orbital Elements" and "Data Available from the Minor Planet Center". A detailed description of the table's columns and additional sources are given on the main page including a complete list of every page in this series, and a statistical break-up on the dynamical classification of minor planets. 
Also see the summary list of all named bodies in numerical and alphabetical order, and the corresponding naming citations for the number range of this particular list. Note that new namings may only be added to this list after official publication, as the preannouncement of names is condemned by the Working Group Small Body Nomenclature of the International Astronomical Union. 
Lauren Elaine (born November 7, 1983) is an American fashion designer, actress, and model. As a designer, she has appeared as a guest on America's Next Top Model. As an actress, she has appeared in Fox Searchlight's The Ringer (as "Brandi") and in Miramax'Sin City. She appeared in Dierks Bentley's music videos as "Becky" in "What Was I Thinkin'", "How Am I Doin'", "Lot of Leavin' Left to Do" and "Am I the Only One" as the same character. 
Elaine's first big break in the entertainment industry was in 2003, when she was cast in the role of "Becky", the white tank-top-wearing beauty in Dierks Bentley's first video "What Was I Thinking". The video reached #1 on the CMT charts and the song on the Billboard charts, leading to three further appearances as Becky in successive videos. After this exposure, Elaine went on to have movie roles in Fox Searchlight's The Ringer and Miramax's Sin City. 
In addition to her couture Black Label Collection, Elaine unveiled a Swim Collection in Hollywood in 2010 and the Laine by Lauren Elaine collection in 2013. 
The song was used by Evolution again, when Triple H, Flair and Batista reunited the stable for one-night only in December 2007. As a result, the song was included in WWE's 2007 compilation album, Raw Greatest Hits: The Music. It is also featured in the video games WWE 13 and WWE 2K15. 
The song was used once more on the April 14, 2014 episode of Raw, when Orton, Triple H, and Batista reunited the stable once more in a post-match confrontation with the Shield. 
Seconds Before The Accident is a live album by the alternative rock  band Archers of Loaf released in 2000. It was the band's last release until Curse of the Loaf, another live album released in 2015. 
Pitchfork gave the album 7.0 (out of 10), stating "to fans, this will prove a fitting swansong, and excellent documentation for an experience lost to another time." 
He was educated at Queen's College, Oxford where he graduated BA in 1602, MA in 1605, BD in 1614 and DD in 1636. 
He was appointed to the eighth stall in St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle in 1638 and held the canonry until 1639. 
The Chilean player Paul Capdeville was the defending champion. However, he was eliminated by Benjamin Balleret in the first round. 
Marchant presided over West v. Barnes (1791), which would be the first case appealed to the Supreme Court of the United States.[citation needed] 
Marchant was a member of Second Congregational Church of Newport. His farm, the Henry Marchant Farm, is located in South Kingstown.[citation needed] 
The island was named Melville Island by Matthew Flinders during his circumnavigation voyage in 1803.  The island was renamed Bremer Island in 1934 to avoid confusion with the larger Melville Island, part of the Tiwi Island Group just north of Darwin. A European settlement named Fort Dundas had been established on the larger Melville Island in 1824 by Sir James J. Gordon Bremer, but the settlement was unsuccessful and was abandoned in 1828. 
Alcohol consumption is illegal on Bremer Island. Only tourists are allowed to consume small quantities.[citation needed] Only up to eight tourists are allowed to stay on the island at any given time. The only tourist facility is the small Banubanu Wilderness Retreat  at the northern tip of the island. 
This biographical article relating to Argentine rugby union is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
During the Second World War Gimpel served in the French resistance, for which he was awarded the Croix de Guerre, the Resistance Medal and the Legion of Honour. 
Author Ken Follett was inspired and informed by Gimpel's work and later retained him as a consultant while writing The Pillars of the Earth. 
This article about a French historian or genealogist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
April 29: The 30th and 60th fronts of the FARC launch a series of attacks against police stations in the Cauca Department. 
Between January and early May 2011 the Colombian government claimed that FARC-EP killed 167 soldiers and policemen. 
In 2010 the FARC killed at least 460 members of the security forces, while wounding more than 2,000, according to state statistics. 
Mid Glamorganshire was a county constituency in Glamorganshire, Wales.  It returned one Member of Parliament (MP) to the House of Commons of the Parliament of the United Kingdom, elected by the first past the post system. 
The constituency was created by the Redistribution of Seats Act 1885 for the 1885 general election, as a result of the division of the old two-member Glamorgan county constituency into five seats. The new constituency had an overwhelmingly working-class electorate. It was abolished for the 1918 general election. 
Created in the redistribution of seats in 1885 & from the old Glamorganshire constituency which had been in existence since 1541, the seat covered a wide area that included Maesteg, Llangeinor, Llynfi Valley, Aberpergwm, Margam Park, Briton Ferry, Glyncorrwg, Resolven. It was scrapped in the next redistribution of seats that took place in 1918. 
Upon Talbot's death in 1890, his successor was Samuel Thomas Evans, a grocer's son from Skewen who was initially a militant nonconformist radical and supporter of Welsh Home Rule through Cymru Fydd. Evans, however, later toned down his radicalism on achieving ministerial office. 
Evans is appointed president of the probate, divorce and admiralty division of the High Court of Justice, prompting a by-election. 
Another General Election was scheduled to take place before the end of 1915. The political parties had been making preparations for an election to take place and by the July 1914, the following candidates had been selected;  
This page lists board and card games, wargames, miniatures games, and tabletop role-playing games published in 1988.  For video games, see 1988 in video gaming. 
Darkening Sky is a 2010 American science fiction horror thriller film directed by Victor Bornia and stars Rider Strong, Danica Stewart and Ezra Buzzington. 
Grad student, Eric Rainer, has a thesis: UFOs and ETs are modern-day myths designed to explain events that seem unexplainable. But after a disturbing alien abduction nightmare, Eric must face the sudden and mysterious disappearance of his girlfriend. 
Desperate for answers, he meets a beautiful stranger (Danielle Keaton) who lost her boyfriend Josh Donald under similar circumstances.  Together, they unravel the mystery, going deeper and deeper into a bizarre world of alien shape-shifters, implanted objects, organ harvesting, and humans seemingly possessed by malevolent forces. 
The film was shot in the end of the Summer 2009 in and around Los Angeles. Shooting wrapped at the end of August 2009, post production mid-2010. 
Darkening Sky premiered at the 2010 Hollywood Film Festival, screening at the Arclight Hollywood on November 16. 
Darkening Sky is being distributed worldwide by Maverick Entertainment Group. The DVD became available on November 1, 2011. 
He was a five-time world champion in FMW as he won the Brass Knuckles Heavyweight Championship three times, Independent Heavyweight Championship one time and the WEW Heavyweight Championship one time. He also became a two time Brass Knuckles Tag Team Champion, a two time WEW World Tag Team Champion, a two time World Street Fight 6-Man Tag Team Champion and a two time WEW 6-Man Tag Team Champion. He also won All Japan Pro Wrestling's All Asia Tag Team Championship once. 
In his post-retirement years, Ezaki promoted the Wrestling Marvelous Future (WMF) promotion, which spun off from FMW, but the promotion was a failure and ended in 2008. He headlined many pay-per-view events for FMW including the company's premier show Anniversary Show a record six times, consecutively for four years between 9th and 12th editions of the event. 
Trained by former All Japan Pro Wrestling star and sumo wrestler Takashi Ishikawa, Eiji Ezaki made his professional wrestling debut at an independent show on November 2, 1987, teaming with Masashi Honda against three upper classmen. He and Honda would struggle in the very small indy circuit for four years before joining Frontier Martial Arts Wrestling's dojo, headed by another former AJPW alumnus Tarzan Goto. 
Between January 1995 and April 1995, Ezaki wrestled in the United States, mainly in the Florida area. During this time, the World Wrestling Federation (WWF) was interested in Ezaki and offered a tryout, but he declined and remained with FMW. 
Ezaki later pursued a career as a singer. He promoted a new wrestling company called WMF (Wrestlings Marvelous Future) that contained up-and-coming wrestlers. The name was chosen since, spelled backwards, the initials are FMW in honor of the late company. He traveled to a few WWE events where he met old friends such as Sabu, Rob Van Dam, and Rey Mysterio backstage. He also took photographs with Vince McMahon, Shane McMahon, and Triple H, and spoke with Jeff Hardy. 
Ezaki attended the PWU (Pro Wrestling Unplugged) FAHRENHEIT: 3RD DEGREE event on August 19, 2006, at the New Alhambra (formerly known as ECW Arena). This was his first appearance in the USA since 2000, the last time being at E3 in Los Angeles, helping promote TOKYOPOP's FMW DVDs by having a 6-man tag match. He also participated in a shoot interview with RF Video. 
Ezaki was active in working with the Dragon Gate promotion. He recorded a debut album with Dragon Kid titled Trust! which came out in November 2007. He partook in the company's first US tour, joining them in their appearance in Los Angeles on September 5 and Hawaii on September 8, 2008. Ezaki also designed the tour's T-shirt. When asked about his career in an interview, Ezaki said that one never knows what the chances are of a return to the ring. 
On 3 April 2015, Hayabusa was part of a press conference announcing the return of FMW. He served as the executive producer of the promotion. 
Many of the industry's wrestlers like Chris Jericho, Jonathan Gresham, Jack Evans, AJ Styles, Pac, and Kalisto were inspired by Hayabusa at some point in their careers. 
Ezaki was the oldest of two sons. His maternal grandparents were owners of a hotel, which later his parents took over. 
Ezaki married his wife Harumi on April 7, 1997. Together, they had two daughters, Ayane (born October 19, 1997) and Shie (born May 10, 1999). He and Harumi amicably divorced in 2004, but remained friends, while sharing custody of their daughters. 
Ezaki has been close friends with Jushin Thunder Liger since 1994. The two had a falling out in 1996 after Ezaki turned down a deal with NJPW, but they mended their friendship in 2005. 
In May 2005, he performed a play called The Shinichi Amano Story at the Tokyo Shinjuku Theater. He portrayed the main character's best friend Fuyuki Hayato, an injured air pilot soldier in World War II, who is wheelchair-bound. His performance was given positive reviews and the play was a huge success.[citation needed] 
Ezaki died of a cerebral hemorrhage on March 3, 2016, at age 47. His body was found when the owner of a nearby tavern, with whom he was scheduled to meet concerning a March 7 event, went to his home after Ezaki failed to arrive for their planned meeting. 
Live at XM is an EP by Wheatus released on 15 December 2004 and exclusively available at Apple's iTunes Store. It features five songs from a live performance that was part of an hour-long Wheatus special, broadcast by XM Satellite Radio. The song 'Lemonade' on the EP was dedicated to Brendan B. Brown's neighbors. 
The 2010 La Crosse Spartans season was the team's first season as a football franchise and first in the Indoor Football League (IFL). One of twenty-five teams competing in the IFL for the 2010 season, the Spartans were members of the Central North Division of the United Conference. The team played their home games at the La Crosse Center in La Crosse, Wisconsin. 
Hoffner had played in the 1921 International Challenge Match held at the Gleneagles Kings Course in Scotland. The match was the forerunner to the Ryder Cup matches. Upon his return to Philadelphia, Hoffner wrote an article in The Philadelphia Inquirer about the importance of the international sporting match for the greater good of relations between the people and governments of the two continents. 
Hoffner was born in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, in 1896, the son of Ellerslie W. Hoffner and his wife Matilda.  His first exposure to golf came as a caddie at Bala Golf Club in Philadelphia. At the young age of just 16, in 1912, he was promoted to assistant professional there and he remained in that position for the next two years. 
He had two brothers, George and Robert, who were both accomplished players. His wife, Anna E. Smith of Philadelphia, was a descendant of Robert Morris, Jr., one of America's founding fathers. Their son, Charles Hoffner, Jr., was the head professional at several golf clubs in the Boca Raton, Florida, area. 
Hoffner won the 1919 Pennsylvania Open at Whitemarsh Valley Country Club and was runner-up to Cyril Walker in 1921 and Johnny Farrell in 1927. He won the 1922 Philadelphia Open at Merion Golf Club east course. He was victorious in the Wood Memorial Tournament in 1947 and 1948. 
NYF = Tournament not yet founded NT = No tournament DNP = Did not play WD = Withdrew ? = Unknown R64, R32, R16, QF, SF = Round in which player lost in PGA Championship match play "T" indicates a tie for a place 
Point de chute (English titles: Stumbling Point, Falling Point) is a 1970 French film, directed by Robert Hossein and starring Johnny Hallyday. 
This article related to a French film of the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Goss v. Lopez, 419 U.S. 565 (1975), was a US Supreme Court case. It held that a public school must conduct a hearing before subjecting a student to suspension. Also, a suspension without a hearing violates the Due Process Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment of the US Constitution. 
Nine students, including a student named Dwight Lopez, were suspended from Central High School in Columbus, Ohio for 10 days for destroying school property and disrupting the learning environment. 
The law required students' parents to be notified of the action within 24 hours to be given the reason. 
A three-judge District Court struck down the law as a violation of students' right to due process of law. The United States District Court for the Southern District of Ohio held: 
Having chosen to extend the right to an education to people of appellees' class generally, Ohio may not withdraw that right on grounds of misconduct or absent fundamentally fair procedures to determine whether the misconduct has occurred, and must recognize a student's legitimate entitlement to a public education as a property interest that is protected by the Due Process Clause, and that may not be taken away for misconduct without observing minimum procedures required by that Clause.
The District Court reprimanded the school for its violation of the 14th Amendment, as there were "minimum requirements of notice and a hearing prior to suspension, except in emergency situations." The case was appealed by the school to the Supreme Court. . 
Justice Byron R. White delivered the opinion of the Court, on behalf of a narrow 5-4 majority. It held that the state had violated due process by suspending the students without a hearing. The state had made education a fundamental right by providing for free public education for all residents between 5 and 21. The Court stated that protected interests are created not  by the Constitution but by its institutions (Board of Regents v. Roth). 
The Court held that a 10-day suspension was not a de minimis deprivation of property. It also stated that suspending students had the potential of seriously harming their reputation and affecting their future employment and education. The Court also held that the state had no authority to deprive students of their property interest in educational benefits or their liberty interest in reputation, without due process of law. 
The Court reiterated the principle, first clearly formulated in Tinker v. Des Moines School Dist. but established in a long line of decisions before that case, students "do not shed their constitutional rights at the schoolhouse door." 
Lewis Powell wrote the dissent that argued that the Ohio statute had granted the right to education, not the right to education without discipline. He challenged the court's finding that the suspension was severe enough to bring the Due Process Clause into play. 
Powell also argued that the safeguards provided by the Ohio statute were sufficient. The statute required the student's parents and the Board of Education to be given written notice of the suspension and "reasons therefor" within 24 hours. Powell also argued that the informal hearing proposed    by the majority would not provide significantly more protection. 
"Imaginary Monsters" is the EP by the Canadian rock band The Birthday Massacre, and contains three new tracks, and five remixes. It was released August 9, 2011. The whole album was made available for streaming direct from the band's Myspace on August 4, 2011. Album artwork by Owen Mackinder, the band's keyboardist. 
Behold the Man (1969) is a science fiction novel by British writer Michael Moorcock. It originally appeared as a novella in a 1966 issue of New Worlds; later, Moorcock produced an expanded version which was first published in 1969 by Allison & Busby. The title derives from the Gospel of John, Chapter 19, Verse 5: "Then Jesus came out, wearing the crown of thorns and the purple robe. And Pilate said to them Behold the Man". 
In the novel, Moorcock weaves an existentialist tale about Karl Glogauer, a man who travels from the year 1970 in a time machine to 28 AD, where he hopes to meet the historical Jesus of Nazareth. 
In the end, determined to live the story of Jesus to its decidedly bitter end, he orders a puzzled Judas to betray him to the Romans, and dies on the cross. His last, agonised words, however, are not Eloi, eloi, lama sabachthani, but the phonetically similar English it's a lie ... it's a lie ... it's a lie ... 
After Karl's death on the cross, the body is stolen by a doctor who believed the body had magical properties, leading to rumours that he did not die. The doctor is disappointed when the body begins to rot as any normal human would. 
The Burger King Basketball Classic, formerly known as the McDonald's Classic from 1983 to 2010, is a four-team boys high school basketball invitational tournament held each year since 1983 in Erie, Pennsylvania. 
Since its inception in 1983, the Burger King Classic has been considered one of the best four-team high school tournaments in the country. Maxpreps.com and Eddie Oliver from Hoops USA called it "the best" and ESPN.com has called it one of the most impactful events of MLK weekend. Each year, nationally ranked teams with future NCAA Division-I and NBA  players travel to Erie to battle for the championship and the opportunity to play against other top talent. 
The Burger King Classic has hosted the nation's top-ranked team eight times, over 25 state champions and nearly two dozen All-Americans and future NBA players. Hosted by Cathedral Preparatory School, the tournament has drawn thousands of basketball fans from across the nation each year. Kennedy Catholic (PA) is the defending Classic champions while Rice (CA) has won the tournament a record four times. 
The Burger King Classic has been played at three locations in its history. The Erie Insurance Arena was used to house the tournament in the 1980s. In 1989, the location was moved to Gannon University's Hammermill Center. In 2016, the tournament was moved to the JoAnn Mullen Gymnasium at the Hagerty Family Events Center.  The Classic is held in mid-January over a Friday and Saturday. 
Ron Sertz, former Cathedral Prep Athletic Director and Director of Operations for the Erie Otters, founded the tournament and ran it for its first 25 years of existence. In 1983, after a year as Athletic Director at Cathedral Prep, he decided to begin a top-level tip-off classic for the community. 
In 2010, Burger King signed a multi-year sponsorship deal with the Classic, taking the event's title away from rival McDonald's, who had held the moniker since 1983. 
The tournament is composed of four teams in a round-robin format. Classic teams usually arrive on the Thursday before the tournament begins. Each team is assigned a host from Cathedral Prep who caters to them for the entire day, makes sure they get to meals, and finds places they wish to visit. Each team is given rooms at the Sheraton Erie Bay front Hotel. 
Thursday is usually spent as a time to settle in for each team. On Friday, practices are scheduled by the host for each team to attend. Each practice is held at Cathedral Prep's gymnasium and is usually a shoot-around for the team. The first game normally tips off Friday night at 7:00. 
On Saturday, teams may schedule a shoot-around at the Prep gymnasium if they wish or they may travel around Erie. The consolation match takes place at 7:00 between the two teams who lost the previous night and then the night is highlighted by the Classic Championship at 8:30. After the championship game, a presentation ceremony takes place and words are said from the winning coach on the tournament. Sunday morning the teams return to their respective schools. 
Since its inception in 1983, the Classic has been hosted by Cathedral Prep of Erie, Pennsylvania. Cathedral Prep is a male-only Roman Catholic high school in Erie, Pennsylvania, in the Roman Catholic Diocese of Erie. Prep, as the school is commonly called in Erie, was established in 1921 by then Bishop John Mark Gannon. Bishop Gannon founded Prep as an all-male Catholic high school. 
The first Classic runs as a tip-off tournament as Cathedral Prep stuns Philadelphia Roman Catholic in overtime on opening night. The host Ramblers would go on to lose to New York powerhouse Bishop Loughlin, 70-63. Prep would go on to the state finals. 
New York state champion Christ the King hands defending Pennsylvania champ Williamsport a loss in the finals. Prep loses 51-50 to the Millionaires on the first night of action but would bounce back with a consolation-game win over Benedictine. 
DeMatha Catholic enters the Classic as the #1 ranked team in the nation, but leaves an upset victim to Hopkinsville High, the Kentucky state champs, 74-69. Meanwhile the host Ramblers get a nice win in the consolation game versus Ohio power Canton McKinley. 
Cleveland St. Joseph comes to Erie featuring the tallest front line in America. Superstar Treg Lee leads the Vikings to a 65-58 victory in the finals over Meadville, a team that would make it all the way to the PA State AAAA championship game. 
Coach Marcel Arribi makes his coaching debut at Prep and sneaks past archrival McDowell, 56-54, on opening night. Then the Ramblers pull off one of the most stunning upsets in Prep history in the finals by handing top-ranked national power Oak Hill Academy. 
No tournament played. Tournament moved from a season tip-off into January and from the Civic Center to Gannon University. 
National Champion New Jersey St. Anthony, led by Bobby Hurley, Terry Dehere and Jerry Walker, make easy pickings of Admiral King and Cleveland St. Joseph en route to an undefeated season. 
Oak Hill Academy, led by Anthony Cade, returns to the Classic as America's top-rated team and gains a measure of revenge for their loss in 1987 by handling Prep in the title tilt. 
Detroit Country Day, led by unanimous All-American Chris Webber, came to the Classic as the favorites, but were upset in the first round by Brooklyn's Bishop Loughlin, who were led by Kentucky-bound Andre Riddick. Loughlin's joy was short-lived, however, as they fell victim to the host Ramblers on a last-second 3-pointer by Jim Hamilton. 
This year again featured the nation's top-ranked team, Baltimore Dunbar, and the Poets live up to advance billing by thrashing #3 Oak Hill on opening night, then crushing Dayton Dunbar in the finals. Dunbar would finish the season as National Champions. 
Bishop Loughlin makes a third Classic appearance as the favorites, but does not make the finals due to an upset loss to New York LaSalle Academy. Ed Elisma, a 6'10" shot-blocker, is touted as New York City's finest and leads LaSalle into the finals against Prep. But the Ramblers stun LaSalle to win their third Classic crown. 
Rice High School arrives in Erie as the #1 team in the country, led by the nation's best player, Felipe Lopez. The Raiders do not disappoint as they demolish St. Patrick, 78-49, and Villa-Angela St. Joseph, 80-58. Prep defeat St. Patrick 62-47 to win the consolation. 
Paterson Catholic gets a record 41 points from the nation's #1 player, Tim Thomas, to edge Simon Gratz, 69-66, on opening night. Prep's own All-American, Jed Ryan, notches 31 the same night to lead the Ramblers over Chester High, 59-52. Paterson wins the title over Prep, 62-55, as Thomas garners 23 more points for a tournament-record 62. 
Paterson Catholic becomes the Classic's first repeat champion with a relatively easy 70-50 title game conquest of St. Frances from Baltimore. Tim Thomas, in his second Classic, scored 29 points in the championship game, added to the 25 he compiled on opening night in a 65-51 ousting of LaSalle Academy. Prep finished fourth after a loss to St. Frances, 86-60, and a heartbreaking double overtime defeat to LaSalle, 44-40. 
Prep neutralizes All-American Sam Clancey, who scores only nine points, but Steve Logan and Gino Bartalone combine for 27 tallies to lead St. Edward to the crown over the Ramblers, 52-41. In the consolation contest, Javin Hunter's 30 points is not enough, and Detroit Country Day falls to Admiral King 63-62 in overtime. 
Rice High School becomes only the third team in Classic history to win more than one title by dominating Hatboro-Horsham 80-61, led by Anthony Glover. All-American Matt Carroll scored 25 points in the opener to lead Hatboro Horsham over Prep, but the Ramblers bounced backed with a solid 51-42 consolation win against Simon Gratz.  
New Jersey St. Patrick avenged their disappointing 1994 performance and won the Classic Crown with an opening night 55-47 win over L.A. Westchester and a 57-45 finals victory against Washington Archbishop Carroll. Jerome Holman and Samuel Dalembert were Celtic standouts. Prep lost both nights to Carroll, 54-47, and Westchester, 65-45. 
LaSalle Academy finally takes home a Classic crown, led by Rodney Epperson and Famous Brown. Defending Pennsylvania AAAA champ Williamsport, featuring All-American Chevy Troutman, is the victim 63-55. LaSalle defeated Prep, 59-44, on opening night, while Williamsport dismantled Simon Gratz, 70-52. Gratz routed Prep, 59-30 in the consolation. 
Rice High School won their third Classic title with a 79-61 win over Lexington Catholic. Shagari Alleyne, a 7'4" sophomore sensation, teamed with Ken Eusey for 43 points. LaSalle Academy nudged Prep, 49-47, for consolation honors. Rice blasted last year's champs, LaSalle, 77-46 and Jack Heissenbuttel led Lexington over Prep 74-66 on opening night. 
Westchester High entered the Classic as the nation's #1 team and did not disappoint. Setting tournament records for most points, rebounds and steals, the Comets easily disposed of D.C. Dunbar, 93-51, in the opener and routed Chester 100-50 to claim their first Classic title. Chester edged Prep 54-48, on opening night, but Prep, led by Andy Kubinski and Mike Sertz, bounced back to claim consolation honors, 69-62, over Dunbar. 
McQuaid Jesuit was ranked #6 in the nation, but faced 3-time Classic champion Rice High in the finals. Rice, ranked #16, was led by 7'3" Shagari Alleyne, but Tyler Relph, Ryan Pettinella and Marty O'Sullivan combined for 55 points to lead McQuaid to a 69-63 win. McQuaid dropped Prep in the opener, 78-50, while Rice disposed of Georgetown Prep which was led by 7'2" Roy Hibbert and 6'9" Davis Nwankwo, 59-55. Georgetown grabbed consolation honors over the Ramblers, 49-43. 
Orlando's Edgewater High lived up to their preseason billing as the nation's #1 team by beating a tenacious Mount Vernon squad, 69-67, to win the '04 Classic crown. All-American superstar Darius Washington converted a layup with only 15 seconds to play to seal the win. Mount Vernon was #4 in the national rankings. Edgewater snuck by Philadelphia Cardinal Dougherty (#7 ranking) on opening night, while Mount Vernon thrashed Prep 72-43. Dougherty made Prep 0-2 with a 78-60 consolation win. 
Fairley High from Memphis, Tennessee, pulled a mild upset of Virginia's Bishop O'Connell High, 49-44, to win the '05 Classic title. Fairley, led by Anthony Mason Jr., barely edged powerful Westbury Christian on opening night, while O'Connell, starring North Carolina-bound All-American Marcus Ginyard, pounded Prep 79-58. Prep gave a strong effort in the consolation before succumbing 51-46 to Westbury Christian. 
Four-time Wisconsin State Champion Rufus King High from Milwaukee rode into town and carried off the Classic championship by knocking off New York power Mount Vernon, 67-57, on opening night, and then overwhelming Cathedral Prep, 65-48, in the title tilt. Prep, which hadn't been in the finals since 1997, beat AAAA Pennsylvania champion Chester High, 88-84 in overtime to reach the championship game. 
St. Edward, led by National Junior of the Year Delvon Roe, made the short trip to Erie and won their second Classic title by edging Westchester, 68-65 in the opening round before trouncing Solon High, 70-41, in the finals. Solon had squeaked by Prep on opening night, but Prep pulled off the biggest upset in the tournament over #10 ranked Westchester, 64-60, in the consolation game. 
Rice won their record 4th McDonald's Classic with a blowout over the host Ramblers and a tight win over St. Patrick in the finals. Attempting to defend their title without injured star Delvon Roe, St. Edward suffered their first loss in three appearances in the Classic. However, the Eagles bounced back to beat host Cathedral Prep in the consolation game. 
Coming in with a 1-5 all-time tournament record, Chester (PA) nudged the host Ramblers before pounding Washington DC's Archbishop Carroll in an anti-climactic final. Rahlir Jefferson led Chester in the final with 26 points and 11 rebounds. Houston's Westbury Christian defeated the host Ramblers in the consolation game. 
Defending PIAA AAAA champion Penn Wood sneaks by Classic veteran Mount Vernon and newcomer Nichols to win the Classic in their first ever appearance. Wood's Jabarie Hinds set a Classic record with nine three-pointers and 39 points against host Cathedral Prep. The Ramblers played both opponents tough, but fell by a combined 23 points.  Final year as the "McDonald's Classic". 
Defending McDonald's/Burger King Classic champion Penn Wood joined Paterson Catholic as the only schools to repeat as the tournament's ultimate victors, as the Patriots won a close contest with St. Edward, followed by their title-clinching triumph over newcomer Charlotte Christian. The host Ramblers extended their Classic losing-streak to eight games after an opening overtime loss to Charlotte Christian and a consolation defeat to St. Edward. First year as the 'Burger King' Classic. 
In one of the most dominating displays in Classic history, ESPN #17 Milton won their two games by a combined 62 points. The Eagles were led by Auburn commit Shaq Johnson who scored a team-high 36 points on a number of thunderous dunks. Despite falling to Jamesville-Dewitt in the opening round, the host Ramblers earned their first Classic game win since 2007, topping Niagara Falls by five in the consolation. 
In a Pennsylvania-dominated Classic, Imhotep Charter outlasted Lower Merion in an all-Philly final. Balanced scoring and toughness inside helped Imhotep throughout a physical tournament. The Panthers crushed host Cathedral Prep in the opening game, but the Ramblers responded in the consolation, upsetting nationally-ranked Bishop O'Connell. 
Archbishop Carroll, the top team in Pennsylvania, finally captured a Classic title in their third appearance, grinding past the host Ramblers before dominating Chicago's St. Rita's in the final. In the consolation game, Cleveland's Villa Angela-St. Joseph took it to Prep, sending the Ramblers to their first consolation game loss since 2011. 
St. Edward closed out the tournament's Hammermill Center era by winning their third Classic title, defeating PA #1 Constitution 70-63 in the first overtime championship game in Classic history. The Eagles became the first team to win a Classic title in three different decades. Nationally-ranked Pope John XXIII rebounded from a tough opening game loss to take the consolation game against the host Ramblers. 
In the first Burger King Classic held at the Prep Events Center, Philadelphia-based Neumann-Goretti defeated defending-champion St. Edward in the opening round before topping Toronto St. Michael's to win the tournament crown.  Quade Green (eventual Kentucky commit) led the way for the Saints, totaling 48 points in the two-game span. Meanwhile, the host Ramblers suffered a buzzer-beating three-point loss to Toronto St. Michael's before dropping the consolation game to St. Ed's. 
Westerville South's Kaleb Wesson set the single-game Classic record with 43 points - surpassing Tim Thomas' 41 in 1995 - in an opening-round win over the host Ramblers. In the championship game, West had 19 rebounds and finished the tournament with 34, second all-time behind Andre Kibbler's 36 in 1983.  However, it was Virginia's Paul VI Panthers that ended up taking the crown, topping Wesson and the Wildcats in the title match.  Cathedral Prep was blown out in both of its games. 
The D.C.-based Cadets used a second-half surge to power past the Bronx-based Gaels in the opening round before defeating the Mustangs to win the tournament crown.  Navy commit Richard Njoku led St. John's with 24 points for the tournament.  Prep would drop both of its games, extending the Ramblers' tournament losing streak to 10 games. 
In a series of dunk-filled contests, the Golden Eagles overwhelmed the  Eagles before claiming the crown over the Colonials.  West Virginia commit Oscar Tshiebwe led the way with 48 points and set a Burger King Classic record with 37 rebounds, surpassing Andre Kibbler's record from 1983 (36).  The host Ramblers dropped their opening game against Plymouth-Whitemarsh before suffering a 12th straight loss in their tournament in double overtime in the consolation game. 
In one of the weakest fields in Classic history, the host Ramblers began their tournament run with a victory over Thurgood Marshall, their first Classic win since 2013. However, Imhotep Charter, which defeated Andrews Osborne in the opening game, edged Prep for its second Classic crown.  Notre Dame commit Elijah Taylor led the way with 27 points for the tournament. 
No tournament played, due to the Coronavirus pandemic.  First time since 1988 that the event was canceled for the year. 
In the McDonald's Classic 25th Anniversary game program, director Ron Sertz revealed his favorite memories from the history of the event. 
St. Anthony (N.J.) from Classic '89 ("eventual national champions led by Bobby Hurley, Terry DeHere and Jerry Walker") 
Marcel Arribi, Cathedral Prep ("never blessed with national talent, yet led Prep to 6 title game appearances and three titles") 
Bishop Loughlin vs. Cathedral Prep, 1991 Championship ("Prep's Jim Hamilton won the Classic in a monumental upset with a buzzer-beating 3 pointer") 
Cathedral Prep's 1987 Title run ("in the most exciting Classic ever, Prep defeated cross-city archrival McDowell in the opener and upset national #1 Oak Hill Academy in the final 58-48") 
Cathedral Prep over Oak Hill, 1987 ("no one gave Prep a chance but coach Arribi out coached Oak Hill's Steve Smith and came away with the first of his three titles") 
Lenny Cooke shatters a backboard, 2000 ("a pregame warm up dunk broke the backboard and delayed the title game by an hour") 
Melvin Levitt's dunk, 1994 ("Levitt elevated completed over Prep's Keith Nies' head and threw it down from 6-8 feet from the hoop") 
Schools from all over America have competed in the Burger King Classic. Over 33 years, 56 different schools have participated: 
Listed below are the win/loss records, by winning percentage, and number of tournaments played by all Classic participants. 
In 2008, for the 25th Anniversary of the McDonald's Classic, tournament director Ron Sertz compiled a list of the greatest players and coaches who have participated in the tournament. He chose four teams with six players (one from Cathedral Prep) and a coach on each. Selections were based on tournament performance, not future college or professional success. 
Six fixed arms are connected in an asterisk pattern, with two sets of two seats attached at right angles to the arms. The arm assembly is connected to a main arm. Twenty-four riders at a time can be loaded onto the ride. Riders are restrained by an over-the-shoulder harness, with their legs dangling free for excitement. 
The trailer version of the ride fits onto a standard road trailer, and can be assembled or racked in approximately 2 hours by two people. 
"Zamperla Rides - Power Surge". Archived from the original on September 27, 2007. Retrieved 2007-01-26. 
This article about an amusement ride or roller coaster is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Anywhere" is a 2002 single by English songwriter Beth Orton. It was released both as a CD, and as a DVD (the only Beth Orton release to appear on DVD format) and peaked at #55 in the UK charts. The song appears on the album Daybreaker. 
Martin Elbourne (born 19 January 1957 in Carlisle, Cumberland) is an English performing arts promoter. Elbourne was brought up near the village of Knebworth, Hertfordshire. His first job, at age fifteen, was working for the local stately home Knebworth House which in the mid-seventies became the biggest venue in the United Kingdom for outdoor shows and hosted bands such as Led Zeppelin, The Rolling Stones and Pink Floyd. 
He is best known as the promoter of rock concerts and is a well-known figure for his work in music and music festivals in the UK. He has been an advisor to, and one of main bookers for, the Glastonbury Festival for 30 years and has helped and advised numerous other festivals. 
Elbourne ended up working for Rough Trade as a booking agent. His most famous clients were New Order and The Smiths. His relationship with New Order continued until the death of Rob Gretton. He managed various bands including Green on Red, David Rudder, and Gaye Bykers on Acid, and gradually became more involved with the Glastonbury Festival, ending up as its main booker. 
In 2003, Elbourne co-founded The Great Escape Festival, held in Brighton, which has music industry related conferences during the day and features live music in the evenings. 
U.K.-based artist manager Stephen Budd, Jon Mac, who co-founded The Great Escape; Vijay Nair, the managing director of India-based promoters and artist management company Only Much Louder; and Elbourne organized the NH7 Weekender Rock Festival in India in 2010. 
Bidyut Baran Chaudhuri (B. B. Chauduri) is a senior computer scientist and the pro-vice-chancellor (academic) of Techno India University, West Bengal, India. He is also adjuncted to Indian Statistical Institute (ISI), where he was a Professor for about three decades. He was the founding Head of Computer Vision and Pattern Recognition Unit (which was established in 1994) of ISI. Moreover, he was a J.C. Bose Fellow and INAE Distinguished Professor at ISI. 
His primary research contributes to the fields of computer vision, image processing and pattern recognition.  He is a pioneer of "Indian language script OCR". 
Chaudhuri received his BSc (Hons.), BTech and MTech degrees from University of Calcutta, India in 1969, 1972 and 1974, respectively and PhD Degree from Indian Institute of Technology Kanpur in 1980. He did his Post-Doc work during 1981-82 from Queen's University, U.K, through Leverhulme Overseas Fellowship. 
He is within World's Top 2% Scientists and Top-10 Indian AI Scientists according to a study conducted by Stanford University. 
During the American Revolution Moncrief served in various campaigns throughout the colonies. In 1776  he served as guide to the 4th Regiment of Foot (now King's Own Royal Border Regiment) during a river crossing on the march to Philadelphia and participated in the Battle of Brandywine. 
Captain James Moncrief Engineer and 50 Hessians, recovered the gun unspiked and all the detachment except 2 subalterns, 5 grenadiers and 2 artillery men. During this day the Rebels fired 3,000 Cannon Shot at this battery from the instant day broke. The Troops being few and harassed no work this night. This morning cold and white frost.
Moncrief was briefly captured by an American raid on the Flatlands Jans Martense Schenck house as part of the Whaleboat War in 1788. He later became Chief Engineer responsible for the defenses during the Siege of Savannah by combined American and French forces in 1779  and took part in the Battle of Stono Ferry in South Carolina. 
In 1780 he took part in the successful Siege of Charleston by the British Army which resulted in the capture of 5,000 troops of the Continental Army. 
Moncrief took command of the Black Pioneers a black Loyalist force, and had strong faith in the African American's ability to fight. After Lord Cornwallis' surrender at Yorktown he wrote General Clinton in New York to remind him of the invaluable service to Britain performed by those under his command while building the defenses at Savannah and Charleston and offered to continue the war with a brigade of African American soldiers. 
In thermodynamics, the thermal effusivity, thermal inertia or thermal responsivity of a material is defined as the square root of the product of the material's thermal conductivity and its volumetric heat capacity. 
A material's thermal effusivity is a measure of its ability to exchange thermal energy with its surroundings. The SI units for thermal effusivity are       W      s     /  (    m  2   K   )   {\displaystyle {\rm {W}}{\sqrt {\rm {s}}}/({\rm {m^{2}K}})}  , or, equivalently,       J    /  (    m  2   K      s    )   {\displaystyle {\rm {J}}/({\rm {m^{2}K}}{\sqrt {\rm {s}}})}  . 
If two semi-infinite[i] bodies initially at temperatures      T  1     {\displaystyle T_{1}}   and      T  2     {\displaystyle T_{2}}   are brought in perfect thermal contact, the temperature at the contact surface      T  m     {\displaystyle T_{m}}   will be given by their relative effusivities. 
This expression is valid for all times for semi-infinite bodies in perfect thermal contact. It is also a good first guess for the initial contact temperature for finite bodies. This result can be confirmed with a very simple "control volume" back-of-the-envelope calculation: 
One application of thermal effusivity is the quasi-qualitative measurement of coolness or warmth feel of materials on textiles and fabrics. When a textile or fabric is measured from the surface with short test times by any transient method or instrument, the measured effusivity includes various heat transfer mechanisms, including conductivity, convection and radiation, as well as contact resistance between the sensor and sample. 
Fernando Peixoto Costanza (born 28 November 1998) is a Brazilian footballer who plays as a right back. 
Born in Rio de Janeiro, Costanza joined Botafogo's youth setup in 2014, from Fluminense. In December 2016, he signed a professional contract with the club. 
On 28 August 2018, Costanza moved abroad and joined Lille OSC on a one-year loan deal. In the following March, after only appearing for their reserve team in the CFA, he was recalled. 
The Men's Freestyle 68 kilograms at the 1996 Summer Olympics as part of the wrestling program were held at the Georgia World Congress Center from July 30 to July 31. The gold and silver medalists were determined by the final match of the main single-elimination bracket. The losers advanced to the repechage. These matches determined the bronze medalist for the event. 
Shane Whereat (born 10 June 1970) is an Australian former professional rugby league footballer who played in the 1990s. His outstanding speed saw him mostly play on the Wing. 
A former junior rugby union player, Whereat switched to rugby league in the early 1990s and made his first grade debut on the bench for Eastern Suburbs in round 10 of the 1993 NSWRL season against the Penrith Panthers at Penrith Stadium. He went on to play 10 games and scored 4 tries in his debut season. 
A noted speedster, Whereat took place in the Rugby League Sprint race held during the Botany Bay Gift in March 1993. Over 75 meters, Whereat finished in fourth place behind winner Brett Dallas, second placed John Minto, and third placed Lee Oudenryn. Despite losing this race, Whereat gained a reputation as one of the fastest ever players in rugby league. 
After spending three seasons with the Parramatta Eels, Whereat retired at the end of the 1999 season. He finished his stint with the Eels scoring 25 tries in 38 games. 
The Lexington Men O' War were a minor league professional ice hockey team and member of the ECHL.  The name Man o' War is from a thoroughbred race horse that was bred in Lexington, and also the name of a highly traveled road in Lexington. The Men O' War played at Rupp Arena in Lexington, Kentucky from 2002 to 2003. 
There Is Love in You is the fifth studio album by English electronic musician Four Tet, released on 25 January 2010 by Domino Recording Company. The lead single from the album, "Love Cry", was released as a limited edition 12" on 2 November 2009. 
This article about a Norwegian politician born in the 1850s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kristian Thorstvedt (born 13 March 1999) is a Norwegian professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Jupiler Pro League club Genk and the Norway national team. 
On 1 February 2018, Thorstvedt signed a one and a half year contract with Viking. He was awarded young player of the season in the 2018 1. divisjon. 
This biographical article related to a Norwegian association football midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The IAR 95 Spey was a Romanian project to produce a supersonic fighter jet for the Romanian Air Force. The project was started in the late 1970s and cancelled in 1981. Shortly after, the project was restarted again. The project was cancelled for good in 1988 due to lack of funds before a prototype could be built, although a full-scale mockup was being constructed. 
The design was a high-wing monoplane with lateral air intakes, a single fin, and a single engine. Designs with two fins and two engines were also considered, but it was decided to go with the single-engine single-fin design.  Other designations given to this project are IAR-101 and IAR-S and refer to different design layouts. 
Romania considered a joint program with Yugoslavia, but the latter declined because it was designing its own supersonic fighter jet, the Novi Avion. 
The Anthology 1961-1977 is a compilation album of songs by Curtis Mayfield when he was with the Impressions and when he was solo. Of the 40 tracks, 30 are from Mayfield's time with the Impressions. The album includes liner notes written by Robert Pruter. In 2003, the album was ranked number 178 on Rolling Stone's 500 Greatest Albums of All Time, maintaining the rating in a 2012 revised list. 
It is a typical Mediterranean river, with low water level throughout the year and violent floods during autumn and sometimes during spring. 
The Museum was founded following a proposal from the Brooklyn Institute of Arts and Sciences (now the Brooklyn Museum) on December 16, 1899, in the Adams House. The museum operated under the direction of the Brooklyn Institute and received approximately $70,000 in funds from New York City each year to supplement the donations it received. Attendance grew quickly, with monthly visitation exceeding 13,000 by October, 1905. 
In 2005, it was among 406 New York City arts and social service institutions to receive part of a $20 million grant from the Carnegie Corporation, which was made possible through a donation by New York City mayor Michael Bloomberg. 
In the same year, work began on the $43 million expansion that was to nearly double the size of the museum, and handle more than 400,000 visitors each year. As part of its commitment to environmental integrity and energy efficiency, the institution has taken credit for being the first New York City museum to use geothermal wells for heating and cooling purposes. 
Armitage is a science fiction series appearing in the British comic anthology the Judge Dredd Megazine, created by Dave Stone and Sean Phillips in 1991. The protagonist is a Detective-Judge in Brit-Cit, a British mega-city in the universe of Judge Dredd. He has also made occasional appearances in the main Judge Dredd series in 2000 AD, as well as two spin-off novels and an audio drama. 
Armitage is a tall, white haired man with a goatee, usually wearing a trenchcoat, suit and tie. His real name is unknown: "Armitage" was a fake ID he used in 2080. 
Although this means he has gained a reputation for being impossible to work with, Armitage has done outstanding work in the Brit-Cit Justice Department's plainclothes Homicide Division. He has managed to not only irritate his higher-ups though but also most of the other Judges, to the extent that when Shok-Tak (Brit-Cit's SWAT division) entered a building to rescue a Judge in danger, they remarked with disgust "aw, drokk it, it's only Armitage". 
He has appeared in his own eponymous comic series as well as two Judge Dredd novels and audio play. In the audio, he was played by Trevor Littledale. 
The Victoria was the second of twelve sternwheelers that would work on this section of the Fraser River. She was larger than the Enterprise and more powerful. The two steamers worked together for only three years, when in 1871, the Enterprise was taken up to Takla Landing and abandoned on Trembleur Lake. The Victoria would work alone on the Soda Creek to Quesnel route for fifteen more years until 1886. 
Francesca Ekwuyasi is a Canadian writer and artist. She is most noted for her debut novel Butter Honey Pig Bread, which was published in 2020. 
Originally from Lagos, Nigeria, she is currently based in Halifax, Nova Scotia. In addition to her writing, she had an exhibition of paper cutout art at Halifax's The Khyber in 2019, and has directed short documentary films including Reconcile and Black & Belonging. 
Butter Honey Pig Bread was selected for the 2021 edition of Canada Reads, where it was defended by celebrity chef Roger Mooking. The book was longlisted for the 2020 Giller Prize, and shortlisted for the 2021 Lambda Literary Award for Lesbian Fiction, the 2021 ReLit Award for fiction, the Amazon.ca First Novel Award and the 2020 Governor General's Award for English fiction. 
The Cairn Valley Light Railway was a rural railway line built to connect Moniaive and other communities in the Cairn Valley with the main railway network at Dumfries. It opened in 1905 but usage was disappointing, and declined further when bus companies started competing. It was closed to passengers in 1943, and completely closed in 1949. 
The Glasgow and South Western Railway (G&SWR) fully opened its main line between Glasgow and Carlisle via Dumfries in 1850, revolutionising transport facilities at the places served. Communities that were by-passed began to feel disadvantages of not having a railway connection. 
The Directors planned an official opening of the line for 31 December 1904, but this proved impossible as the Board of Trade Inspecting Officer was unable to schedule his visit to approve the opening; a celebratory dinner took place nonetheless. In fact the ceremonial opening took place on 28 February 1905 and the full public opening of the line followed the next day, 1 March 1905. There were three passenger trains each way daily, four on Wednesdays an Saturdays, and none on the Sabbath. 
At this time the main line railways were introducing railmotors, light vehicles in which a small steam engine is closely coupled to a passenger coach with through driving controls, as an economic means of operating lightly used lines. The G&SWR decided to operate the Cairn Valley line with such a vehicle, and one was built at Kilmarnock Works for the purpose. Two more followed from November 1905. Railmotor no. 3 is shown at Dumfries in a photograph following page 56 of Smith's Tales. 
The passenger carryings on the line did not live up to early expectation, and in fact declined from 4,800 journeys in 1906 to 3,600 in 1913, 2,500 in 1918 and dropping to 1,000 in 1923. There was little goods traffic on the rural line. 
When constructed, the line had a novel signalling system, consisting of a modification of Sykes Lock and Block system for single lines, obviating train staffs, and elevated disc fixed signals. Treadles at stations verified the passage of trains and interlocked signals for conflicting moves; if a train operated the treadle at the entrance to the line to the next block post, it had to proceed, there being no method of cancelling the movement. 
The connection with the main line was at Cairn Valley Junction, a little over a mile north of Dumfries. 
HMS Fly (1813) was a Royal Navy  Cruizer-class brig-sloop built by Jabez Bailey at Ipswich.  She was ordered 23 April 1812, launched on 16 February 1813 and commissioned May 1813. 
In December 1826 Fly, under Captain F. A. Wetherall, supported the short-lived settlement of Western Port, in southern Victoria, Australia. 
The 1998 Hel van het Mergelland was the 26th edition of the Volta Limburg Classic cycle race and was held on 4 April 1998. The race started and finished in Eijsden. The race was won by Raymond Meijs. 
The men's 220 yards event at the 1930 British Empire Games was held on 17 August at the Civic Stadium in Hamilton, Canada. 
From 1763-1768, Schwerdtfeger served the Lutheran congregation of Frederick, Maryland after which time he served as an itinerant pastor for congregations in southeastern Pennsylvania and central New York before settling in Brunswick in about 1770. 
Schwerdtfeger remained in New York for the duration of the American Revolution but his loyalist sympathies led him to accept a position in 1791 with the community of United Empire Loyalists in Williamsburg, Ontario where he would spend the remainder of his life. As the first Lutheran minister in Upper Canada, Schwerdtfeger served two churches: the German Evaangelical Church in Williamsburg, Ontario, and a church in nearby Matilda. 
The site of Williamsburg's German Church was inundated by the St. Lawrence Seaway but Schwerdtfeger is commemorated by a nearby historical plaque in the Township of South Dundas. 
Burge was a student at Marlborough College before World War I. He joined the British Army early in the First World War, and won the Military Medal during mid-1916 while serving in the ranks. He transferred into, and was commissioned in, the Royal Flying Corps in 1917. 
On 3 May 1918, Burge shared in the destruction of a Rumpler reconnaissance aircraft over Mercatel. On 16 May, he scored twice in the same dogfight, destroying an Albatros D.V and driving another down out of control. On consecutive days, 20 and 21 May, he destroyed Halberstadt reconnaissance machines for victories seven and eight. 
He would not score again until 19 July 1918, when he destroyed another Fokker triplane south of Lille. The next day, he, Edmund Tempest, and another pilot cooperated to ruin a Rumpler over Drocourt. On 22 July 1918, he won for the last time, destroying an Albatros D.V over Harnes. His final tally was six enemy airplanes destroyed solo, three more shared destructions, and two enemy fighter sent down out of control. 
On 24 July 1918, Phillip Scott Burge was killed in action when his plane was set afire in midair. His conqueror is generally conceded to be Unteroffizier Marat Schumm of Jagdstaffel 52. Burge was interred in Dud Corner Cemetery in Loos, Pas-de-Calais, France. 
This article about a Party of the Democratic Revolution politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Pink Opaque is a 1986 compilation album by Scottish alternative rock band Cocteau Twins, composed of tracks recorded between 1982 and 1985. A joint release by the UK-based 4AD  and the American Relativity Records, it was their first official U.S. release. 
The larvae feed on Syzygium cumini and Syzygium jambos (Myrtaceae). They mine the leaves of their host plant. 
This article relating to moths in subfamily Gracillariinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Emily Olivia Leah Blunt (born 23 February 1983) is a British actress. She is the recipient of various accolades, including a Golden Globe Award, a Screen Actors Guild Award, and a Critics' Choice Movie Award, in addition to nominations for three British Academy Film Awards. 
Emily Olivia Leah Blunt was born on 23 February 1983 in the London Borough of Wandsworth, the second of four children born to Joanna, a former actress and teacher, and barrister Oliver Blunt, QC. Her siblings are Felicity, Sebastian, and Susannah. Her grandfather was Major General Peter Blunt, and one of her paternal uncles is Crispin Blunt, Conservative Member of Parliament for Reigate. 
From age seven to 14, Blunt had difficulties with stuttering. She credits a school teacher for helping her manage the stutter through acting. She went on to sit on the board of directors for the American Institute for Stuttering. Blunt attended Ibstock Place School in Roehampton, southwest London and, at age 16, went to Hurtwood House near Dorking, Surrey, a private sixth form college known for its performing arts programme. There, she was discovered and signed by an agent. 
In November 2008, Blunt began dating American actor John Krasinski. They became engaged in August 2009, and married on 10 July 2010 in Como, Italy. They reside in the Brooklyn Heights neighborhood of New York City, and have two daughters, one born in 2014 and the other in 2016. 
In August 2015, Blunt became a naturalised citizen of the United States. She took dual citizenship in the United States, suggesting the status helped her tax situation. She has stated that she feels "conflicted" over abandoning her sole allegiance to the United Kingdom. 
According to the review aggregator site Rotten Tomatoes and the box office site Box Office Mojo, Blunt's most critically acclaimed and commercially successful films include The Devil Wears Prada (2006), Looper (2012), Edge of Tomorrow (2014), Into the Woods (2014), Sicario (2015), The Girl on the Train (2016), A Quiet Place (2018), and Mary Poppins Returns (2018). 
There are 13 U.S. metropolitan areas with sports teams competing in the four major leagues: Major League Baseball, National Hockey League, National Football League and National Basketball Association. The New York and the Los Angeles metropolitan areas, the two largest cities in the country, are the only two regions with at least two teams in each major sports league, with the New York metropolitan area being home to three NHL teams. 
Italicized teams play outside the city limits of the metropolitan area's core city or cities; the specific location is given in parentheses. The core city or cities of a metropolitan area are identified in this reference. 
Minnesota is the least populous state to have a team in each major sport. It has almost three million fewer people than Virginia, the most populous state with no major sports teams. 
The largest television market area with no teams in the four major leagues is the Hartford & New Haven (Connecticut) area. Hartford was formerly home to the NHL's Hartford Whalers, who moved to Raleigh in 1997 and are now the Carolina Hurricanes. 
The largest television market areas that have never had a team in the four major leagues are Austin, Texas, who will gain an MLS team in 2021 (Austin FC), and the West Palm Beach-Ft. Pierce (Florida) area, though that is usually considered part of the territory of Miami-area teams. 
After the St. Louis Rams moved back to Los Angeles, Houston, which lacks an NHL team, became the largest metropolitan area that does not have a franchise in all four major professional sports. Los Angeles had been the largest area without all four leagues from 1995 to 2016. 
New York and Los Angeles are the only two metropolitan areas with two or more teams in all four major sports (New York has MLB's Yankees and Mets, the NBA's Knicks and Nets, the NFL's Giants and Jets, and the NHL's Rangers, Islanders, and Devils. While Los Angeles has MLB's Dodgers and Angels, the NBA's Lakers and Clippers, the NFL's Rams and Chargers, and the NHL's Kings and Ducks.) The San Francisco Bay Area has MLB's San Francisco Giants and Oakland Athletics. 
Since the formation of the NBA in 1946, New York is the only city to consistently host at least one team in each of the four leagues every year. 
The most recent city to be added to this list is Los Angeles, which regained the football Rams in 2016 after they had played the prior 21 seasons in St. Louis. (In 2017, the Chargers also moved to the city from San Diego, becoming the Los Angeles Chargers.) 
Among those states that have no metropolitan areas with all four sports, only Ohio has teams in all four major sports: the NFL's Cincinnati Bengals and Cleveland Browns; MLB's Cincinnati Reds and Cleveland Indians; the NBA's Cleveland Cavaliers; and the NHL's Columbus Blue Jackets, the only team outside Cleveland and Cincinnati. 
Additionally, while the metropolitan area of New York City has both of its football teams play in New Jersey, the state of New York still has all four major sports leagues represented with the NFL's Buffalo Bills. 
Alabama is the most populous state that has neither a major-league team nor a connection to a media market area with a major-league team. However this distinction changes depending on if the Atlanta media market is defined to extend into Alabama. If it is, then Iowa is the most populous state with neither a team nor a connection to a media market with a team. 
Cleveland, Kansas City, St. Louis, and Atlanta formerly hosted teams in all four major sports leagues. Of these four cities, the two Missouri cities currently have two teams each, and the other two cities have three. 
Major League Soccer in the United States was founded in 1993, and has been active since 1996. Of the 13 metro areas with Big Four teams, 11 also host MLS franchises as well. Detroit and Phoenix currently do not have Major League Soccer teams. 
Both Miami and the San Francisco Bay Area lost five-sport status for a period of time when the Miami Fusion folded in 2002 and the San Jose Earthquakes moved to Houston to become the Dynamo in 2006. The Bay Area regained it with the reactivated Earthquakes in 2008 and Miami resumed being a five-sport city with Inter Miami CF in 2020. 
Of cities that formerly held four-sport status, only Atlanta and Kansas City have current MLS franchises, while St. Louis has an approved MLS expansion franchise. 
No Ohio city can claim five-sport (or four-sport) status, but the state itself can via Cincinnati, Cleveland, and Columbus sports teams with Columbus Crew SC and FC Cincinnati. 
The debut of MLS's Toronto FC in 2007 gave Toronto five major professional sports teams, although its football team plays in the Canadian Football League. 
 Dibaya is a small town in Kasai-Central province of southern Democratic Republic of the Congo. As of 2009 it had an estimated population of 5,213. Dibaya has an airport with regular flights to Kinshasa, Kikwit and Angola.  
This Democratic Republic of the Congo location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The vegetation is dominated by Sarcocornia quinqueflora and Senecio pinnatifolius.  Recorded breeding seabird and wader species are the little penguin, short-tailed shearwater, fairy prion, common diving-petrel, Pacific gull, silver gull, sooty oystercatcher and Caspian tern. 
The Grimsby Chums was a British First World War Pals battalion of Kitchener's Army raised in and around the town of Grimsby in Lincolnshire in  1914.  When the battalion was taken over by the British Army it was officially named the 10th (Service) Battalion, The Lincolnshire Regiment.  It was the only 'pals battalion' to be called 'chums'. 
In February 1918 the battalion moved to the 103rd Brigade, 34th Division. The 10th Battalion was disbanded on 3 June 1919. 
A memorial in St James' Church, Grimsby, was erected to the memory of the 810 members of the 10th (Service) Battalion who were killed in action or died on service. 
Born in Barry's Bay, he held a number of jobs prior to founding a lumber firm in 1902. A local politician for nearly a decade before being elected to the Legislative Assembly of Ontario as the member from Renfrew South, he  served in the Assembly for 16 years, before being defeated in the 1945 provincial election. 
This article about an Australian corporation or company is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Heine was raised by her mother, Rebecca Beke Paiaina, a lei maker. She initially attended the Kamehameha Schools, but graduated from President William McKinley High School in 1958. Her first job was at the Waikiki eatery called Woody's Restaurant. She married her husband, Samuel Ladd Heine, in 1963, with whom she had four children. 
Heine performed hula solo with The Brothers Cazimero, the Hawaiian musical duo composed of Robert and Roland Cazimero, earning her the nickname, "the third brother." Their professional relationship dates to 1976. 
In 2010, Heine chose the theme song for the Prince Lot Festival, "Na Punawai O Moanalua," which translates to "The Wellspring of Moanalua". She explained the choice of the song in an interview with the Honolulu Star-Advertiser, telling the newspaper, "All of life is water. Without water, there is no life." 
Geoffrey Price Thomas (born 3 July 1941) was President of Kellogg College, Oxford, and Director of Oxford University Department for Continuing Education until 2008. 
He was educated at Maesteg Grammar School, University of Wales (Swansea) (BSc, (First Class Honours, Physics)) and Churchill College, Cambridge (PhD). He is also a Master of Arts of the University of Oxford. 
He has been a visiting scholar at the Smithsonian Institution, Harvard University, University of Washington, University of California, Berkeley, and Northern Illinois University. In 2002, he delivered the Louise McBee Lecture at the University of Georgia. 
He was a member of the Higher Education Funding Council for Wales from 2000-2008, and has been a member of the Council of the British Association for the Advancement of Science, a member of the Universities Association for Continuing Education, and a member of the Cabinet Office Committee of Inquiry on the Public Understanding of Science. 
Professor Layton and the Diabolical Box is an adventure/puzzle game.  The player controls the movements of the eponymous Professor Layton and his young assistant Luke through several locations, unlike in the previous game which is confined to just one town. Along with completing many different types of puzzles, players must explore different areas, solve mysteries, and aid the Professor on his quest. 
As a reward for completing a puzzle, the player may earn one of three rewards. Hamster toys are collected to help Luke give a morbidly obese hamster a workout. Pieces of a shattered camera that Sammy accidentally dropped can be assembled to repair it. Also, players can earn tea ingredients to brew new recipes and serve cups of tea to Luke, Layton and people they meet. 
There are also two bonuses in "The Hidden Door" that are only available after the player finds one unique code each in the game's predecessor and sequel. Other bonuses include a soundtrack, cut-scenes, soundbites, character profiles, and scenes from the game. 
The train makes a stop in Dropstone, a town celebrating the fiftieth anniversary of its founding. As they enjoy the celebration, Layton and Luke learn that the town's founder, Sophia, also had an interest in the Elysian Box, but she died the year before, and her granddaughter Katia continues to seek it out.  Don Paolo, Layton's arch-rival, kidnaps Flora and disguises himself as her, leaving her behind in Dropstone as the train departs. 
On returning to the hotel, Layton and Luke find that the remainder of the train's contingent has arrived, and Chelmey has arrested one of the conductors named Thunder as a suspect in the theft of the box and Schrader's death. Layton proves him wrong, revealing Don Paolo after exposing his disguise. Don Paolo escapes but leaves behind the Elysian Box. Layton and Luke open it but find the box is completely empty, so Layton eventually suggests visiting Anton to solve the mystery. 
After the credits, the game ends showing "to be continued" along with a picture of Layton and Luke standing in front of a time machine which continues on to the next adventure Professor Layton and the Unwound Future. 
The music of the game was composed by Tomohito Nishiura with the entire soundtrack later released on an album titled Layton Kyouju to Akuma no Hako Original Soundtrack, in Japan only. The ending theme song "Iris" was sung by Salyu, though it was omitted from the album. The international release of the game utilizes an instrumental version, though it similarly was not included on the album either due to not have being created at the time. 
The album scored slightly higher than its predecessor. Square Enix Music Online gave it a score of 7 out of 10, criticizing that "there are no masterpieces on this score, even though the variety and entertainment is much more enhanced [over Curious Village's]." RPGFan Music stated "At 75 minutes, this one disc is packed with goodies, though one might also argue that it's packed with filler." 
The game was released in North America during August 2009, as Professor Layton and the Diabolical Box. It would be released in PAL regions during September of the same year, as Professor Layton and Pandora's Box, where it would become the fastest-selling Nintendo DS game ever released within the United Kingdom. 
Professor Layton and the Diabolical Box received "favorable" reviews according to video game review aggregator Metacritic.  In Japan, Famitsu gave it a score of two nines and two eights for a total of 34 out of 40. 
As of July 9, 2008, the game sold 815,369 copies in Japan, according to Famitsu. IGN gave the game Editor's Choice Award, and rated it the eleventh best Nintendo DS game as of 2010. GameTrailers gave the title its best puzzle/parlor game of 2009 award. 
Upon its release to Western countries, the game sold more than 1.26 million units by September 2009. 
Peterboro, located approximately twenty-five miles southeast of Syracuse, is a historic hamlet and current administrative center for the Town of Smithfield, Madison County, New York, United States. The National Abolition Hall of Fame and Museum is located at the former Smithfield Presbyterian Church, in Peterboro. Peterboro has a post office with ZIP code 13134. 
In 1795, Peter Smith Sr., a partner of John Jacob Astor's who built his fortune in the fur trade, founded Peterborough, naming the town after himself. Smith moved his family to Peterborough in 1804 and built the family home there.  In 1894 the town name was changed to Peterboro, which is the form it retains to this day. 
In the 1820s, Gerrit Smith took over the business interests of his father, Peter Smith Sr., managing his family's property holdings in the town and the surrounding area. The Peterboro Land Office was built as the office for these activities. 
Gerrit Smith's commitment to both the abolition and temperance movements led to the Smith estate in Peterboro becoming a stop on the underground railroad and to Smith building one of the first temperance hotels in the country in Peterboro. The Smith estate also served as an important meeting place for abolitionists from both New York and other parts of the country, including John Brown and Frederick Douglass. 
In 2001, the Gerrit Smith Estate was designated a National Historic Landmark. The Peterboro Land Office building and Smithfield Presbyterian Church are listed on the National Register of Historic Places. 
He was named an officer in the Order of Polonia Restituta in 1923. Just before his death (from natural causes), he became a member of TOW. Many of his works were lost when his former studio burned down during the early days of the Warsaw Uprising. 
Ignacio Ramonet Miguez (born 5 May 1943) is a Spanish academic, journalist and writer who has been based in Paris for much of his career. After becoming first known for writing on film and media, he became editor-in-chief of Le Monde diplomatique, serving from 1991 until March 2008. Under his leadership, LMD established editorial independence in 1996 from Le Monde, with which it had been affiliated since 1954. 
Ramonet published an editorial in December 1997 in LMD on the Tobin tax that led to the launching of ATTAC. This is an activist organization promoting taxation of foreign exchange transactions. 
He has been a professor of Communication Theory at Paris Diderot University. He also taught at the Sorbonne. He first started writing journalism as a film critic and writer about film for various magazines. Ramonet later wrote more frequently about media culture, communications, and national affairs, becoming associated with Le Monde Diplomatique, started in 1954 as a monthly publication associated with the newspaper. 
He was elected as editor-in-chief in January 1991, serving to March 2008. Under his leadership, the magazine became editorially independent of Le Monde in 1996. It has been an independent critic outside academia of media culture and its ties to national society. 
Ramonet says that it is a betrayal of socialism for some social democrat parties to have chosen the third way between socialism and capitalism. 
The NGO Reporters without Borders had written about Ramonet's strong relationship with Fidel Castro. Ramonet denied this claim in 2002. In May 2004,  Ramonet supported Castro in a direct television interview when Castro protested about Forbes Magazine's list of country leaders' wealth. Castro was number 7 on the list. 
Ramonet has called for autarky and for regulation, taxes and tariffs that reduce international trade. 
According to Ramonet, globalization and ultra-liberalism threaten the sovereignty of national states. In his December 1997 editorial "Disarming the markets", Ramonet attributed the Asian economic crisis to globalization, and said that it threatened the identity of national states. To counter this, he called for an NGO to promote the Tobin tax on foreign exchange. He became a founder of Association for the Taxation of Financial Transactions and for Citizens' Action (ATTAC). 
This article related to a protected area in North Dakota is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Womack had a remarkable amateur career, defeating future legend Evander Holyfield several times (one by walkover,) with two of the losses being avenged by Evander at the Olympic Box-offs, and cutting Ricky's way to the 1984 Summer Olympics. 
Womack jumped into heavyweight already in 1982, winning the AAU Nationals, and proving he's comfortable in that weight class, but he soon came back into light heavyweight, reportedly to prove to his long-lasting nemesis, Holyfield, that he was the better man. As Holyfield later recalled: 
Womack turned pro in 1984 and began his career with a promising string of victories, including a victory over future champion Uriah Grant, and was undefeated in his first nine bouts until troubles outside of the ring derailed his career. 
Womack was sentenced to 25 years for armed robbery. After serving 15 years, Womack was released in November 2000. 
The franchise originally joined the NAHL as the Pittsburgh Forge from 2001 to 2003. They relocated to Toledo, Ohio, and became the Toledo IceDiggers from 2003 to 2005. They then became the Alpena IceDiggers, playing in the Northern Lights Arena located in Alpena, Michigan, from 2005 to 2010. 
Meynardo Asa Sabili (born June 2, 1957) is a Filipino politician and businessman who served as yorme of Lipa from 2010 until 2019. Previously, he served as the member of the Batangas Provincial Board from the 4th District from 1991 until 2001. 
MDPI or Multidisciplinary Digital Publishing Institute is a publisher of open access scientific journals. Founded by Shu-Kun Lin as a chemical sample archive, it has established over 200 broad-scope journals. MDPI is the largest open access publisher in the world and the 5th largest publisher overall in terms of journal paper output. The number of published papers has been growing significantly in the last decade with year over year growth of over 50% in 2017, 2018 and 2019. 
MDPI traces its roots to Molecular Diversity Preservation International, also abbreviated MDPI, which was founded by Shu-Kun Lin in 1996 as a chemical sample archive, with some scholarly publishing and conference activities. The second organisation, Multidisciplinary Digital Publishing Institute, was founded in 2010, primarily as a publisher. All of MDPI's journals have been open access and since 2008 published under a Creative Commons Attribution License (CC-BY). 
Molecular Diversity Preservation International was founded and registered as a non-profit association (Verein) by Shu-Kun Lin and Benoit R. Turin in Basel in 1996 to enable the deposit and exchange of rare molecular and biomolecular research samples. 
MDPI, a publisher of open-access scientific journals, was spun off from the Molecular Diversity Preservation International organization. It was formally registered by Shu-Kun Lin and Dietrich Rordorf in May 2010 in Basel, Switzerland, and maintains editorial offices in China, Spain, Serbia, and the United Kingdom. It is primarily based in China and has established over 200 broad-scope journals, usually with one-word titles. 
The number of published papers has been growing significantly in the last decade with year over year growth of over 50% in 2017, 2018 and 2019, with 110,000 papers published in 2019. As of 2020, MDPI is the largest open access publisher in the world and the 5th largest publisher overall in terms of journal paper output. 
In December 2011, the MDPI journal Life published Erik D. Andrulis' theoretical paper, Theory of the Origin, Evolution, and Nature of Life, aiming at presenting a framework to explain life. It attracted coverage by the popular science and technology magazines Ars Technica and Popular Science, which characterized it as "crazy" and "hilarious". A member of the editorial board of Life resigned in response. 
The journal Magnetochemistry accepted a paper in 2019 by a controversial scientist Susan Pockett which stated that "scientists are suppressing evidence that microwave radiation from smartphones and other devices cause harm to people". The paper was later that year retracted due to lack of a scientific contribution and being an opinion article. The journal initially invited Susan Pockett to submit a paper according to the author's own account. 
In 2019, MDPI journal Psych published an editorial on race and intelligence by Richard Lynn, who had previously had his emeritus status revoked due to his promotion of discredited sexist and racist views, such as scientific racism. MDPI later issued an expression of concern and they changed the status of the article from editorial to opinion, three months after publication. According to science journalist Angela Saini, Psych had also published other similar work defending scientific racism. 
In 2013, one of MDPI's journals was targeted in the Who's Afraid of Peer Review? sting operation and rejected the fake paper. 
MDPI was removed from Beall's list in 2015. Beall's list was shut down in 2017; Beall later wrote that he had been pressured to shut down the list by his employer University of Colorado Denver and various publishers, specifically mentioning MDPI as a publisher that had "tried to be as annoying as possible to the university so that the officials would get so tired of the emails that they would silence me just to make them stop." 
In August 2016, MDPI was breached, leaving exposed 17.5 GB of data, including 845,000 e-mail addresses and e-mail exchanges between authors, editors and reviewers. According to MDPI, the unprotected instance at which the data was breached has since been protected. 
In August 2018, 10 senior editors (including the editor-in-chief) of the journal Nutrients resigned, alleging that MDPI forced the replacement of the editor-in-chief because of his high editorial standards and for resisting pressure to "accept manuscripts of mediocre quality and importance." 
Delma butleri, also known as unbanded delma, Butler's legless lizard, or spinifex snake-lizard, is a species of lizard in the Pygopodidae family endemic to Australia. 
Co-founder Collier left the company in early 2009 to join parent company Activision. In 2010, West and Zampella were fired by Activision for "breaches of contract and insubordination", they soon founded a game studio called Respawn Entertainment. On May 3, 2014, Neversoft was merged into Infinity Ward. 
In May 2014, Neversoft was merged with Infinity Ward to form a single 'super-studio' after both collaborated on the development of Call of Duty: Ghosts. Neversoft studio head Joel Jewett and studio director Scott Pease retired shortly after the completion of the merger. 
In 2010, Infinity Ward was ranked third by Develop 100 only running up to developer Nintendo and Bungie for the top 100 developers based on the sales of their games in the UK. 
The sequel to Modern Warfare 2, Call of Duty: Modern Warfare 3, sold 6.5 million copies in the US and UK alone and grossed $400 million within 24 hours of going on sale. 
Call of Duty: Modern Warfare 2, uses an upgraded engine dubbed "IW 4.0", which is a generation more advanced than the engine used in Call of Duty 4: Modern Warfare. Call of Duty: Modern Warfare 3 uses IW 5.0 (MW3 Engine), an improved version of the IW 4.0 engine. Improvements on the engine allow better streaming technology which allows larger regions for the game while running at a minimum of 60 frames per second, improvements to the audio of the engine have also been made. 
Modern Warfare (2019 reboot) and Call of Duty: Warzone uses a heavily rebuilt IW engine for the series, allowing for the use of more detailed environments, advanced photogrammetry and rendering, better volumetric lighting, and the use of ray tracing. The new engine had been in development five years prior to the release of the game, and was a collaborative effort between the main Infinity Ward studio in California and the new studio in Poland. 
The James H. Brooks House is a historic house in Somerville, Massachusetts.  Built about 1880, it is one of the finer examples of Second Empire architecture in the city.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1989. 
The house was built for James Brooks, a dry goods dealer in Union Square.  The land it was built on was platted for development in 1870 by Ira Hill, a leading force in the development of Union Square as the city's commercial center.  The Prospect Hill area, elevated above the square to the south, was promoted by Hill as a fashionable upper-class residential neighborhood. 
A conflict atlas, also called conflict partiture, is a graphical representation of the development of a particular conflict. The graph shows important events, appointments, and their interlinkage over time.  
Anwell Newman (born 10 December 1966) is a South African cricketer. He played in eight first-class matches for Boland from 1993/94 to 1997/98. 
This biographical article related to a South African cricket person born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Du Londel Troupe was a French 18th-century theatre troupe. From 1753 to 1771, it was active as the French Theatre of Sweden, where it played a great part in that country's theatre history. 
The Du Londel troupe is mostly remembered in history for interrupting the development of the Swedish theatre and replacing it with a theatre which was only understandable for those who could speak French; but the current view is that they made "The gracious French singing theatre" popular in Sweden, and thereby inspired to the foundation of the Royal Dramatic Theatre and the Royal Swedish Opera. 
Bendigo South East College (BSE) is an Australian secondary school in Bendigo, Victoria, for year 7-10 students. 
BSE occupies a building originally known as the Bendigo Girls' School. That school had been founded in 1916, originally located in the Quarry Hill suburb of Bendigo but moving to the Flora Hill suburb in 1959. 
In 1974, the school became co-educational, under the name Flora Hill High School, which was later renamed to Flora Hill Secondary College. 
In 2008/2009 Flora Hill Secondary College and Golden Square Secondary College combined and were renamed Bendigo South East Secondary College. 
As of 2013[update], the new buildings have been completed. The last of the classrooms from 1959 was demolished in August 2011. Although the main construction project has been finalised, the hall is still under renovation for the new athlete development program which was established in 2014. 
The Athlete Development Program at BSE is a complete sports education and training program aimed to assist students in the pursuit of sporting and academic excellence. The program runs for the entire school year. Students are eligible for selection every year they attend the school. 
Another specialist program introduced in 2016 is the Academy of Creative Arts (ACA). The Bendigo South East College Academy of Creative Arts (ACA) nurtures the creativity, artistry and scholarship of students. Students can apply to be in one of the five fields: drama, vocals, visual arts, music or dance. 
Golden Square Secondary College was closed at the end of 2008 and was demolished in late 2009; the site is currently vacant. 
Grace was born on June 9, 1872 in Great Neck, New York.  He was the son of businessman and two time mayor of New York City, William Russell Grace. 
A devout Roman Catholic, Joseph Grace was a member of the international organization the Sovereign Military Order of Malta, a Catholic organization that aids the sick and poor through the establishment of hospitals and clinics around the world. He also served as president of Grace Institute, a charity created in 1897 by his father and his uncle, Michael Grace, that provided tuition-free education and training in business and administrative skills to economically disadvantaged women. 
On the death of his father, William R. Grace in 1904, Edward Eyre, the company secretary and a director, was appointed president of W. R. Grace and Company. In 1907, Eyre was made company chairman and Joseph Grace became president. In 1929, Joseph Grace took over as chairman when Edward Eyre retired and Joseph's friend from his college days, D. Stewart Iglehart, was appointed president. 
In 1945, Grace suffered a debilitating stroke and in 1946 both he and D. Stewart Iglehart retired.  His son, Joseph Peter Grace Jr., took over management of the company. 
In 1908, he married Janet MacDonald, the daughter of Charles B. Macdonald, a major figure in early American golf who built the first 18-hole course in the United States. Together, they were the parents of five children: 
His wife died on December 31, 1937 at age fifty-three.  Joseph Grace died of a stroke at his home in Great Neck, New York on July 15, 1950. 
The MasterWorks Festival is a month-long intensive summer training program for classical performing artists. Beginning in 2018, MasterWorks will be held in Spartanburg, SC, USA, at Converse College. It was co-founded in 1997 by the former artistic director of the Christian Performing Artists' Fellowship (CPAF), Dr. Patrick Kavanaugh and his wife Barbara, and by the trombonist James Kraft and his wife Mary Jeane. 
In 2004, MasterWorks expanded outside the US and MasterWorks Europe took place in London, England. Since then, other non-USA MasterWorks Festivals have taken place in Winchester, England, and in China. 
U-79 conducted three patrols whilst serving with 1st U-boat Flotilla from 13 March 1941 to 30 September. She was then reassigned to the 23rd U-boat Flotilla from 1 October until she was sunk. 
The boat's first patrol began with her departure from Kiel on 5 June 1941. Her route took her north 'up' the North Sea and through the gap separating Iceland and the Faroe Islands toward the Atlantic Ocean. 
She was unsuccessfully attacked with depth charges by convoy escorts near the Portuguese coast on 12 August. 
U-79 returned to the North African coast for her fifth patrol at the end of November but her luck had deserted her. She returned to Salamis with nothing to show for her efforts on 8 December. 
This list shows the IUCN Red List status of the 150 wild mammal fauna of Turkey. Two are critically endangered, two are endangered, fourteen are vulnerable, and three are near threatened. The following tags are used to highlight each species' global status as published by the International Union for Conservation of Nature: 
The order Erinaceomorpha contains a single family, Erinaceidae, which comprise the hedgehogs and gymnures. The hedgehogs are easily recognised by their spines while gymnures look more like large rats. 
The "shrew-forms" are insectivorous mammals. The shrews and solenodons closely resemble mice while the moles are stout-bodied burrowers. 
The bats' distinguishing feature is that their forelimbs are developed as wings, making them the only mammals capable of flight. Bat species account for about 20% of all mammals. 
The order Cetacea includes whales, dolphins and porpoises. They are the mammals most fully adapted to aquatic life with a spindle-shaped nearly hairless body, protected by a thick layer of blubber, and forelimbs and tail modified to provide propulsion underwater. 
There are over 260 species of carnivorans, the majority of which feed primarily on meat. They have a characteristic skull shape and dentition.  
Even-toed ungulates' weight is borne about equally by the third and fourth toes, rather than mostly or entirely by the third as in perissodactyls. There are about 220 artiodactyl species, including many that are of great economic importance to humans. 
North Iowa Community School District is a rural public school district headquartered in Buffalo Center, Iowa. 
The district includes sections of Kossuth and Winnebago counties. It serves Buffalo Center, Lakota, Rake, and Thompson. 
St. George was a census-designated place (CDP) in Broward County, Florida, United States. The population was 2,450 at the 2000 census. It now serves as a neighborhood of Lauderhill, Florida. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 2,450 people, 748 households, and 613 families residing in the CDP.  The population density was 2,102.1/km2 (5,460.3/mi2).  There were 776 housing units at an average density of 665.8/km2 (1,729.5/mi2).  The racial makeup of the CDP was 1.39% White, 97.35% African American, 0.04% Pacific Islander, 0.41% from other races, and 0.82% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.10% of the population. 
There were 748 households, out of which 28.9% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 42.6% were married couples living together, 31.4% had a female householder with no husband present, and 18.0% were non-families. 14.7% of all households were made up of individuals, and 6.4% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 3.28 and the average family size was 3.59. 
In the CDP, the population was spread out, with 29.7% under the age of 18, 8.7% from 18 to 24, 23.9% from 25 to 44, 28.1% from 45 to 64, and 9.6% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 35 years. For every 100 females, there were 89.0 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 80.5 males. 
The median income for a household in the CDP was $38,750, and the median income for a family was $39,043. Males had a median income of $32,378 versus $22,286 for females. The per capita income for the CDP was $13,410.  About 9.4% of families and 10.9% of the population were below the poverty line, including 9.4% of those under age 18 and 3.1% of those age 65 or over. 
As of 2000, English as a first language accounted for 98.35% of all residents, while Spanish was the mother tongue of 1.64% of the population. 
Tonantzin Carmelo is an American actress. She is known for her acting roles in film, TV and stage productions including in the Steven Spielberg miniseries, Into the West, for which she received a Screen Actors Guild nomination for Outstanding Performance by a Female in a Television Movie or Miniseries. 
In 2021, Carmelo filmed roles in Spain and Australia for the television series The English (BBC) and La Brea (NBC). 
Carmelo grew up in Orange County, southern California and is of Indigenous and Latina descent. As a youth, she participated in Native dances and music, touring with cultural groups throughout North America. She also became a technically trained dancer and performed with the modern dance company Daystar. 
Carmelo attended the University of California, Irvine, where she earned a bachelor's degree in Environmental Studies and a minor in Dance. While in college, she began acting in theater productions and independent films. 
Carmelo began her professional acting career in an educational musical theater show produced by Carmen Zapata at the Bilingual Foundation of the Arts. The production toured the Los Angeles area. 
In addition, Carmelo is a choreographer. Her work was featured in the Amazon TV series, Undone, and in the opera, Sweetland. She has also performed as a singer with the band Trio del Alma and has recorded on three albums for Canyon Records. 
In 2012, Carmelo testified for the United States Senate Committee on Indian Affairs on the images of Native Americans in Hollywood. 
Carmelo has also appeared in several video games, including Dead Space, The Crew, Lego Marvel's Avengers, and Cyberpunk 2077. Her memorable motion-capture and voice performance portrayal of the villainous character Kendra Daniels for Dead Space led Maxim Magazine to add Kendra to their Hottest Video Game Babes of the Year list. Today, the character continues to attract legions of loyal fans. 
She has had an ongoing relationship with Native Voices at the Autry Museum in Los Angeles, where she has performed on stage and has served on the advisory board. 
On January 5, 2006, Carmelo was nominated for the Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Television Movie or Miniseries for her performance as Thunder Heart Woman in Into the West. 
Carmelo also won the American Indian Film Festival award for Best Actress and was nominated for the Best Actress award at the Hoboken International Film Festival for this role. She was also named "An Indie Darling to Crave" at the Sundance Film Festival 2015 for her role as Teresa, opposite John C. Riley in the film Entertainment. Below is a list of her awards and nominations. 
MTI Home Video is a United States-based movie distributor in the direct-to-video market. MTI most often purchases the distribution rights to independent films and televised films that did not see a theatrical run in the U.S., for direct release to DVD. 
MTI Home Video was founded in 1984 by music industry veteran Larry Brahms. One of the company's first releases was Freedance, an interactive fitness workout video featuring Marine Jahan from the film Flashdance. 
The company was one of the first studios to successfully transfer from VHS to DVD format in 1999 by waiting until the major studios had decided upon standards before changing their business model. 
MTI pioneered the sales of DVDs through alternative retailers such as dry cleaners, convenience stores and other non-traditional entertainment retail outlets in 2004. 
The company releases an average of forty films each year and partners with studios such as the Asylum, Artist View Entertainment, Bedford Entertainment, Delta Entertainment, Fangoria Presents, and Redrum Entertainment. Although mostly known for releasing titles in the B-movie genre such as Sharknado and Stalked at 17; MTI has a line of family-oriented films and has released other independent films such as Bloom and Nate and the Colonel. 
Bukovinka is a municipality and village in Blansko District in the South Moravian Region of the Czech Republic. It has about 600 inhabitants. 
The house was purchased by Maxwell Bramlette in 1947. It was inherited by David Clay Bramlette III in 1976. 
This article about a property in Mississippi on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a building or structure in Mississippi is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Pontiac Commercial Historic District contains parts of sixteen blocks in downtown Pontiac including the single block within the original 1984 district. This block contains sixteen buildings, of which fourteen contribute to the historic nature of the district. The remainder of the district contains an additional 84 buildings, of which 53 contribute to the historic nature of the district. 
Todd Rosenthal is an American scenic designer. He won the 2008 Tony Award for Best Scenic Design and the 2009 Laurence Olivier Award for Best Set Design for Steppenwolf Theatre Company's August: Osage County. 
A native of Longmeadow, Massachusetts, Rosenthal received a Bachelor of Arts degree from Colgate University and a Master of Fine Arts from the Yale School of Drama, where he received the Donald M. Oenslager Scholarship for Stage Design. He also studied at the Art Students League of New York and Moore College of Art. 
Rosenthal made his Broadway debut with August: Osage County. He considered the three-level set, which he called a juxtaposition of the "gothic and the whimsical," to be a central character in the play. Of it he said, "It's immovable, an indelible image ... people move out, but the house never changes." 
Rosenthal's regional theatre credits include productions for the Goodman Theatre, Steppenwolf Theatre Company, Centerstage in Baltimore, Alley Theatre in Houston, the Philadelphia Theatre Company, San Jose Repertory Theatre, Alliance Theatre in Atlanta, Yale Repertory Theatre, Lyric Opera of Chicago, Arena Stage in Washington, D.C., the Paper Mill Playhouse in Millburn, New Jersey, Notre Dame Shakespeare Festival, and the Big Apple Circus. 
Rosenthal's commercial projects include micro-brewery-themed restaurants for Anheuser Busch; a pirate-themed restaurant at the Treasure Island Hotel and Casino on the Las Vegas Strip; and a mining-themed tavern and restaurant for the Copper Mountain Resort in Colorado. 
Rosenthal was an adjunct professor of design at DePaul University from 1995 until 2003. He has been a professor in the Department of Theatre at Northwestern University since Autumn 2003. 
Imerman Angels is a non-profit organization that aims to provide personalized connections with a focus on one-on-one support. The organization connects cancer fighters, survivors and caregivers through a database composed of volunteered survivors. The organization focuses on cancer patients with their goal being to create awareness and a community between cancer patients and survivors, build alliances between other organizations and raise funds. Their services are offered for free. 
Imerman Angels expanded to a total of 6,000 Mentor Angels throughout 65 different countries and made over 10,000 matches since its inception. One fifth of these matches are breast cancer survivors. Of those 2000 matches 1,165 individuals have become breast cancer Mentor Angels. Mentor Angels can be found in all 50 states. 
In 2017, Imerman Angels becomes a beneficiary for @gives back. @gives back is a community foundation composed of agents, employees and people involved with @properties. @gives back partners with its corporate sponsors to cover high medical bills of families. This year @give back has partnered with Imerman Angels to fundraise money. 
Cancer survivors can apply to become a Mentor Angel through the Imerman's Angels official website. Mentor Angels are recruited worldwide and offer support, empathy, and understanding to cancer fighters. Mentor Angels are screened and trained by Imerman's Angels staff members. 
Caregivers, people who have cared or are caring for someone else with cancer, can also apply through Imerman Angel's official website to become a Caregiver Mentor Angel. Caregiver Mentor Angels provided one-on-one support to families and caregivers of cancer fighters. 
Imerman Angels holds its annual Wings of Hope Gala to commemorate years of providing assistance and resources to cancer fighters, survivors and caregivers. Price of attendance and contributions support the program through the next year. 
Imerman Angels held its first annual En Noir fundraiser in 2017. En Noir is a black tie, James Bond themed event. The event offers guests cocktails, live music, gambling tables, aerialist performances, and hors d'oeuvres throughout the night. A partial amount of proceeds raised directly benefit Imerman Angels. 
The Battle of Nam Bac was one of the major engagements of the Laotian Civil War. Despite misgivings about their potential performance the Royal Lao Army moved in to occupy the Nam Bac Valley in August 1966; the position would block a traditional Vietnamese invasion route that led to the Lao royal capitol, Luang Prabang. 
The location was problematic. It was closer to the North Vietnamese border than to Luang Prabang; any Vietnamese communist invaders would also enjoy the use of Route 19 for part of their route to the valley. Nam Bac itself could only be resupplied by air from Luang Prabang, and its supply line was dependent upon use of an airstrip sited on low ground within artillery range of nearby heights. Those surrounding hilltop positions would have to be held if assaulted by invaders. 
While American troops in the Vietnam War fought communist guerrillas, in neighboring Laos the situation was much different. The People's Army of Vietnam invaded the Kingdom of Laos with regular army formations, while Lao guerrilla forces tried to expel them. In an unprecedented situation, the American Ambassador to Laos was granted presidential power to direct the war in Laos. The exercise of this power is most famously associated with William H. Sullivan and G. McMurtrie Godley. 
In 1961, the Royal Lao Army had moved out of the Nam Bac Valley north of the Lao royal capitol, Luang Prabang. The communist Pathet Lao moved in a couple of companies to occupy it. They would remain directly unchallenged until August 1966. 
However, the CIA sponsored Auto Defense Choc militia training behind enemy lines, north of Nam Bac, in 1964. Raised without use of Thai or U.S. trainers, several companies of these guerrillas were operational by early 1965. In the west were five companies clustered in a makeshift battalion around Doi Saeng. Several camps were established just north of Nam Bac, around Lao Ta and Ban Pha Thong. In the far north, at Nam Houn in Phong Saly Province, there was a Hmong stronghold. 
One problem Lair pointed out was logistical. He believed that once the troops were emplaced, there would be no Royal Lao officer capable of keeping Nam Bac's front-line troops supplied with the necessities of war even if its airfield could be protected while the supplies were offloaded. 
The terrain at Nam Bac itself was unfavorable. The airfield needed for resupply was sited in the valley within artillery range of nearby hills. Those hills would have to be occupied by Lao troops. Lair concluded by stating that he thought offering the Vietnamese a fixed base like Nam Bac to assault was a recipe for disaster. 
No matter whose the responsibility for the defeat, the annihilation of the Royal Lao Army tipped the balance of power in Laos towards the Vietnamese communists. Indeed, the Royal Lao Army was left with only six of its 11 makeshift Groupe Mobile regiments intact. 
Givens Hill, also known by locals as Patterberry Hill, is an unincorporated community in Houston County, Texas. 
This article about a location in Houston County, Texas is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Burrangong Shire was a local government area in the South West Slopes region of New South Wales, Australia. 
Burrangong Shire was proclaimed on 7 March 1906. The Council offices were located in Young, but the shire did not include Young. 
The John F. Kennedy Preparatory High School (JFK Prep for short) was a high school in St. Nazianz, Wisconsin which operated from 1968 to 1982. Formerly the Salvatorian Seminary, in 2008 it was acquired by United Ministries, Inc. who manage it as The St. Nazianz Christian Center. 
After Oschwald's death in 1873, the community began to decline, and in 1896, after a visit from Fr. Francis Mary of the Cross Jordan, the land and operations were turned over to the order he had founded, the Society of the Divine Saviour, or Salvatorians. The Salvatorians established a seminary on the premises, and had St. Ambrose Church built on the grounds in 1898. 
Seminary enrollment declined in the 1960s, and in 1968, it was closed and re-opened as a nonsectarian, coeducational college-preparatory school named after John F. Kennedy, the first Catholic U.S. president. A high school operated by the Parish of St. Gregory, which had opened in 1953, closed in 1969 and many of its students enrolled at JFK Prep. 
In 1973, Fr. Melvin Tracy, who taught enviro